Unfortunately, the frustration of being Dr. Goldberg's patient is a repeat of the experience I've had with so many other doctors in NYC -- good doctor, terrible staff.  It seems that his staff simply never answers the phone.  It usually takes 2 hours of repeated calling to get an answer.  Who has time for that or wants to deal with it?  I have run into this problem with many other doctors and I just don't get it.  You have office workers, you have patients with medical needs, why isn't anyone answering the phone?  It's incomprehensible and not work the aggravation.  It's with regret that I feel that I have to give Dr. Goldberg 2 stars.
Wing sauce is like water. Pretty much a lot of butter and some hot sauce (franks red hot maybe).  The whole wings are good size and crispy, but for $1 a wing the sauce could be better. The hot and extra hot are about the same flavor/heat.  The fish sandwich is good and is a large portion, sides are decent.
After waiting for almost 30 minutes to trade in an old phone part of the buy back program, our customer service rep incorrectly processed the transaction. This led to us waiting another 30 minutes for him to correct it. Don't visit this store if you want pleasant or good service.
Very disappointed in the customer service. We ordered Reuben's  and wanted coleslaw instead of kraut. They charged us $3.00 for the coleslaw. We will not be back . The iced tea is also terrible tasting.
I will start by saying we have a nice new deck. That is where the good part ends.\n\nWhy two stars if we have a nice deck now? Well, it all started in May when we had a man named Al come out and talk to us about the process. He was a true salesman, I'll tell you that. Not a straight shooter, but an excited salesman that wanted to sell... And we bought into it.\n\nHe told us they were backed up with the harsh winter and a lot of jobs, but they could probably start by June 24th. Mind you, this was the end of May we met with him. He said they would have to do a survey of our land and get a permit from Dormont before they started. We felt confident in going with them, and booked it.\n\nHere's where things fell apart. Weeks went by with no word from them on the process. Finally I called and left messages. Al finally got in touch with me and the conversation was utterly confusing. He must have not understood me because he just kept talking in circles. So I hung up not knowing what was going on. Finally I called back and the admin told me that the survey could take a couple weeks to come back. I wish Al would have told us that.\n\nSo our June 24th date came and went. We finally got our survey. And they were quick to bill us for it, but no word on where we were in the process. I called back a couple times with no real answers from the admin. Apparently they were now waiting for the permit from Dormont.\n\nA month later, I was frustrated and asked to speak with someone at the company. I spoke with someone who told me that Dormont usually takes a week to process the permit, but we were now going on a month. He told me he would bug the guy about it and we finally got it. \n\nI completely understand that waiting on the permit is not their fault, but why no communication about it? Just call me and tell me they're waiting for the permit, but they'll work towards asking Dormont what the hold up is. Seems simple.\n\nFinally we get the permit and work is supposed to start. Tuesday comes and they have to wait for approval from Dormont on holes they're digging. So holes are dug and equipment is put in my backyard and then nothing happens for two days. Where did everyone go? Who knows, because I wasn't informed! \n\nI was upset and contacted the company owner, Dave, by email. I told him how frustrated I was about the lack of communication. He wrote me two sentences that  said \"there will be acres there tomorrow morning to finish and most will be done tomorrow.\" Well, that didn't happen.\n\nThen two other dudes show up two days later and did work for about three hours and left. The main guy comes back the next day and says they did it wrong. So apparently the part about how they wouldn't need access to my house changes to they're drilling bolts into my house to secure he deck. \n\nFinally, the second week into construction, my tiny 10x11 foot deck is done. It was upsetting that they left the deck dirty, and all the dirt and cement they moved around wasn't cleaned up. I even asked them to fill all the holes they dug up and didn't use, and they only filled up one. When you create a construction project, isn't it just good business to clean it up and make it look nice? Didn't happen here.\n\nMy main point is, contractors have a reputation for not being the most trustworthy. Why be that company? Why not be an upstanding company that consumers can trust? My main issues with them were that things were not communicated to me properly up front, nor was the ongoing process communicated to me. Then they left everything unfinished in my eyes, leaving the site dirty. I understand things happen and things get delayed, but just email or call me. It's not that hard to keep me updated, it is 2014 with a million ways to be contacted.\n\nEven though I have a nice deck (after I clean things up myself!), I would not recommend them to anyone.
Hoofah.
Average run of the mill store.  Associates are young teens and they really don't know where anything is.  Luckily I am able to get around to find everything.  Found my puppy treats and moved on.
Two meals, on the recommendation of a friend who lives near the place, and after the second trip, I was compelled to write. 'Rocky' would definitely describe the experiences.\n\nOn the first trip, I went to try their (at that time)raved about Reuben. And YET to find a true good Reuben in da burgh, I tried it.\n\nWell, they were out of the proper bread, and the guy had to run to the store to buy the closest thing he could find, which was not the proper bread, and instead of one of their 'raved about' Reubens, I received two mini-Reubens, which basically took the guts from one Reuben, and spread it out onto two sandwiches on regular sized bread. I ate it. It wasn't great, but they swore it was because they'd run out of the bread. Bread or not, it still wasn't great. The atmosphere was pleasant in that 'blue collar bar' kind of way, and the staff was very nice, but not a winning pitch on the Reuben.\n\nThe second trip was after a long day of moving furniture with the same friend. Sat in the back room, instead of the bar, which felt more like a restaurant, of course, with the big screen TV covering the sports of the moment.\n\nI was in the mood for dinner this time, and after a scan, decided on fried chicken and mashed potatoes with the salad bar. My friend ordered one of her faves, the breaded pork chops.\n\nWe hit the salad bar, which was uber-basic. Three soups (mostly vegetable loaded, which left me out), basic iceberg lettuce mix (very probably out of a bag), a few veggie toppings, and three or four dressings. It was a basic salad, no big deal. More or less an appetizer filler before the meal.\n\nThe mind-blower in this trip was the ordering of the fried chicken dinner. Our waiter looked like a 19 year old gas station attendant, skinny little blonde guy with a sweet but incredibly naive face, and an air of vapidity, which was confirmed when I placed my order. I asked what chicken pieces came in the dinner, and asked if it was possible to only get dark meat. I never imagined how confusing a question that could possibly be. It literally took him two trips back to the kitchen to 'ask', and the child honestly had no clue what 'white meat' and 'dark meat' meant. The first answer he came back with was that the chicken came in a pre-portioned prepared bag, kind of Kentucky Fried Chicken style...which didn't answer my question, thus prompting the second trip. \n\nAfter the second trip back I heard the cook holler 'Tell him I'll fix him up'. \n\nWell, the chicken was prepackaged dreck like you'd find in the freezer case of Walmart, tiny and not good, and the potatoes had that slight tinge of chem-spuds flavor, laden with some kind of chopped up green (parsley?), and a side of that basic brown gravy served up in 5 gallon buckets.\n\nThank goodness for the basic salad bar.\n\nEven my friend admitted that her pork chops were different and not what she'd expected. They also appeared to be from a freezer bag.\n\nThe irony was that the boy who didn't know white meat from dark meat, was chatting with some other customers...about baseball...and he was a genius about the mindless sport of baseball. Ahhhh da burgh.\n\nThird base? Nah...why bother when there are so many other options around. Go on in a grab a beer and chat black and gold if you happen to be in Carnegie...they can help you out all types of ways in that area. Just don't go hungry if you actually have tastebuds.\n\nFrom what I understand it 'used to be' really good homecooked food. But apparently, mama has left the kitchen.
My first time going to Barb's Country Junction and I really wanted to like this place, I really did...however, I didn't.\n\nThe food was decent, some was above average and some below but it was overall decent. I got pancakes, bacon and eggs. The pancakes were really good and fluffy, the home fries were simply okay and the eggs were not cooked well. My son had a burger and it was good. The coffee at this place was brewed to perfection which a appreciate. I would give the food 3/5.\n\nThe service was subpar for sure. While our waitress was a really nice girl, she wasn't on top of anything at all. Had to ask for coffee refills, had to ask for silverware, for napkins...etc. She got the order messed up and so on. I give the service 2/5.\n\nThe inside of the place had some country charm as you'd expect but want particularly cleanly. It also had a leaky roof in several places which had buckets collecting the water. A customer even tripped over the buckets and fell. I give the interior 2/5.\n\nThe prices were decent. I fed my whole family breakfast (3 of us) for $23. I give the prices 3/5.\n\nSo in summary, you can get okay food here for a rather cheap price but it is not a great place to dine in by any means. There are better diners in the area that I will patronize in the future rather than Barb's.
Okay, so hopefully you haven't been enjoying happy hour @ Riley's Pour House before you read this or you might not be able to follow the lilting Irish owners. \n\nTo recap: Murphy's Pour House from 1979-1985. Sullivan's Pour House from 1995-2002. Paddy's Pour House from 2002-2012. And, bagpipe please, Riley's Pour House opens March 1 of 2012. Still with me?\n\nIt's a tiny long bar just like the old Irish pubs. No more smoking allowed. Hurrah!!!  Same lousy service. \n\nMy guess is that the entire place needs (no, strike that .... demands) an automated food/beverage ticketing system. None of the cooks, bartenders, or waitresses know who ordered what nor what ticket belongs to which table. It's actually pretty funny if you're not a) hungry or b) thirsty. \n\nI really really want this place to do better. We need more Irish pubs and local old time watering holes. \n\nGet it together, Murphy's ... er, I mean Sullivan's....er, I mean Paddy's or is it Riley's? ;  ).  Whatever the case, they have cold Guinness. And Irish music.  And fun patrons.
Far away from real Chinese food. Doesn't even taste good as American style Chinese food.
I used to order takeout here once every month or so. The food tastes average and the price is good. It's your typical low-end Chinese place. \n\nThe last (and final) time I ordered here I just so happened to be picking up my order while a health inspector from allegheny county health department was making his rounds. While I was waiting on my food (which took much longer than usual) the inspector was pointing out violations. He also requested a copy of a certificate that the man behind the register was unable to produce. The inspector looked at me like I was crazy for waiting on my food despite the obvious poor conditions.  \n\nAs for the rest of the place - it's always been kind of dirty inside. The carpets are just FILTHY and the walls match. There are always children's toys scattered about the floor because the owners children are always there, so be careful not to trip. \n\nThe workers do seem like nice people just trying to make a living but when it comes to cleanliness Don Don is lacking.
I bought a three month membership last year, mainly to attend the Silver Sneakers classes. I was in my early sixties and hadn't exercised in a while. I tried the evening classes but they were very crowded and difficult, so I tried a morning class for seniors. I like to stretch out before my class actually starts, so I went to the tail end of a yoga class. The women in this class were very nasty to me and told me that I wasn't welcome to stretch out in their class. I never went back thanks to the attitude of the other members. I didn't feel welcome here. I complained to the manager, who said that I was welcome to stretch out in whatever class I wanted to, but the hostility of these yoga students was very evident. Do they think that this is their private gym?
I have to say that I write this review with much regret, because I have always loved PaPa J's. But my recent experience there has changed my mind a bit. \n\nFrom the minute we were seated, we were greeted by a server that was clearly inexperienced and didn't know the menu. As I said before, I've been to PaPa J's a good handful of times so I know the menu decently well, but the server couldn't explain any of the questions I had about a couple new dishes I was thinking about trying. I swear this guy must have just looked at the menu for the first time a few minutes ago.\n\nBut it wasn't just the knowledge of the menu. It was one thing after another with our server. My wife asked for a glass of water 4 times until she finally got it (at which point the meal was over, so we didn't care at that point).  I mean come on, for a restaurant of this calibre and price is it too much to ask for a glass of water? There was no one filling up water.\n\nMy biggest complaint, however, is what happened with our meals. My dad and I both ordered the trout special (trout with roasted red peppers and lump crabmeat). Instead, the meal that was delivered to both of us was trout with a heaping pile of spinach and mushrooms. Not what the special was at all.  And by the way, that item is on the menu as a regular item so whether or not the mistake was made by the server (which, we are sure it was) or the chef, who knows for certain. Not to mention, though, that a good server wouldn't have served us that regardless. \n\nBut before you think we had an unusal experience that was all due to a poor server, let me continue. When we informed our server of the mistake, he didn't really believe us until he checked his order sheet, and then he blamed the error on the chef. At this point, the meal had been sitting (because it took us forever to flag this guy down again) so the trout was basically cold. The server then said he would have the meals re-made. So, he took the meals back to the kitchen. Meanwhile, of course, my wife and mom are eating their meals and my dad and I are sitting there with no meals. Also keep in mind that my wife still had not gotten the water she had been asking for, and my iced tea had been refilled with a soda (yes, believe that or not). All the kitchen did was scrape their \"mistake\" off of our fish! They didn't remake anything. Our fish was served to us again with little pieces of spinach and mushrooms sticking all over it. Quite frankly, the fish wasn't good at all. I honestly would have rather had a fish sandwich from McDonald's that night. The server never did anything to try to make our experience better - he knew we weren't happy, but never offered anything such as dessert on the house. I'm not looking for a handout, but our experience was just plain awful that night. The guy never really even apologized for the mistake. Normally, I may have asked for a manager, but at this point I was ready to just get out of there (plus, we had to be somewhere else that night).\n\nMy opinion... for the money, there are many other restaurants I would rather eat at.
Coming here you get the feeling they haven't changed much.  The tables, the decorations, the menu.  All the same.  Does that make you a little worried?  Yes.\n\nI ordered the mushroom ravioli and it was... oily.  Very very oily.  The actual ravioli was okay, enough mushrooms.  but it was oily.  Did I mention that?  \n\nAmbiance, like I said, left much to be desired.  I don't think I'd have this place on my list of \"musts\" for downtown.  Much better restaurants to visit!
Service in this place is poor because of lack of acknowledgment since people working there are \"just\" working . They have nice decor,nice bar and good bread. Consider where this place is ,the prices are really really high . Nothing is served on the side with main dishes ....
Although the first impression through the door is charming and the aroma enticing  as you enter this restaurant- much can be improved upon for the prices asked for the dining experience. Our group of 7 had called a week ahead and were seated in the back of the far dining room, right by a door where clinking pots /pans and  dishes were heard throughout our meal, as well as a Darth Vader type noise coming from the ceiling vent. Our waitress was not knowledgable of all menu items, and three of our  very simple requests did not come out as ordered. ( dressing on the side of a salad,  less feta on an entree and no oil on another entree) The waitress blamed it on the cook, but did offer to get one entree changed. Also we were asked if we wanted pine nuts, feta or Gorgonzola on our salad and then were charged 2.00 extra per item in addition to the salad price (6.99) which brought the salad up to 10.99 ! Outrageous !\nThere is so much possibility for ambiance in this restaurant , but they miss the mark on service and atmosphere. I will most likely not return. Very overpriced for the quality and service.
Papa J's is expensive and inconsistent.  The ambiance is nice but it doesn't justify the prices.  There are better restaurants in Carnegie.
Man has this place gone down hill.  My husband and I went a couple of weeks ago.  We had salads and pasta.  Both were on the verge of inedible.  With a single glass of wine, I felt downright robbed at the $50 price tag.  Seriously, I could have easily made what we had with jarred sauce and boxed pasta at home. Classico is better.  And the service was pretty absent to make it even worse... seemed she knew it was terrible and didn't want to deal with it.  Seriously, I'd rather eat at the OG.
Some how even though the food at this Eat'n Park is down right abominable, the smiles and laughter is always there.  How can I stay mad when the prices or so cheep? Myself my boyfriend and his nephew had lunch with milkshakes and me having a coffee it was $31.00\n\nOn this particular occasion the fire alarm went off and rang and rang and rang loud and long for over 15 minutes before the fire department got there realized they didn't have key to turn it off and than another 10 minutes later finally shut it off...only at Eatn' Park.\n\nMy baked potato was hard as a rock, I had ordered two pieces of baked cod and only received one. \n\nThe waitress was very sweet and attentive and really attempted to build a rapport with our lil nephew which I thought was sweet.
If there was ever a \"get your coffee and go\" Starbucks, this is it. Right in the center of the Waterfront, this Starbucks has no sofa, comfy chairs, only table seating. I love the baristas here, But I don't like the location of the building.
This Starbucks is teeny-tiny!\n\nSeating inside is VERY limited.  This is a Starbucks to grab and go and continue your shopping at the Waterfront.\n\nBaristas are friendly and fast.
I'm not a huge fan of this location. I think that it was oddly built- the small, alley-like front makes it difficult to get past people on your way to/from the bathroom or tables when it's busy. And there's hardly any tables to sit at. Furthermore, people tend to clog the front on their way in, which makes things particularly difficult (especially in the winter weather). The staff were pretty impersonal to be, but maybe that was due to the high traffic of the place and the time I was there. And the coffee that I had was cold- I'm sure it was probably the bottom of the batch. I'd probably only walk in here again if someone else suggested it before or after a movie or while we were shopping in the area.
For someone who straddles the line between sometimes craft-er, this store can seem vast and confusing.  There's rows and rows of baskets and bedazzling jewels and paper and...oh my...scrap booking!  When I want to find boring old felt....it's like...where do I start?  \n\nI'm in a hurry, as always, and I rush in and the first thing I look for is an employee.  No one to be found.  I could call out and my voice would come echoing back.  I run between rows of paper, wood and gosh darn scrap booking....no felt!  Where do I find felt!  Where do I find an employee!?\n\nFINALLY, I find one after 15 minutes of wondering around.  She's incredibly nice and leads me to the felt.  This is not the first time I've been hard up to find help.  I tell her she was hard to find, and she tells me that they're \"low on payroll\" and can't have any one the floor BUT HER!  In that WHOLE store, JUST HER!  That's ridic!\n\nNot a month ago I was, again, in a slight hurry and stood in line for about 15 minutes to check out, with 2 employees at the register and 6 people per line, I gave up and walked out.  \n\nHey Michael, do you pick up what I'm putting down?  You're not making any money because your costumer service SUCKS....in fact, there's no service to be found!
The one good thing I can say about Michael's is that they have a wide variety of hobbies and crafts included in their selection. They've got items for woodwork, painting, knitting, kids crafts, scrapbooks, you name it. The problem is, the variety of products for your particular craft is probably dismal. They've got lots of cool items all over the store that you're convinced that somehow you need. (Because it is soooo cute, and you could TOTALLY do something with it. Right..?) The store feels cluttered because there is so much stuff everywhere. However, if you're looking for something specific, good luck. It's not even a matter of the product being difficult to find in the store. It's that when you find the right section, there's either nothing in stock, or they simply don't even carry what you need. \n\nI stopped in for crochet supplies, and the yarn selection was laughable compared to many other craft stores. I ended up going elsewhere for my stuff anyway. \n\nPlus the prices at Michael's are significantly more than other area craft stores. I usually only stop there if I'm already at tend Waterfront. I'd recommend checking other craft stores first. Unless you need glitter. Especially fine glitter. Michael's has the best glitter selection/quality of any store I've ever been to.
Well... as Steak 'n Shake locations go, this isn't the best one around--but it is burgers and fries that are open 24-7.\n\nThe milkshakes are good!\n\nPROS: \nAlways made fresh, when you order;\n\nCONS:\nGreasy (but its burgers);\nTakes longer than typical in drive thru (but that's bc they're made fresh!);\nService (on a scale of 1-10, 10 being awesome) is a 4.
In general I do like Shake N' Steak, but this location is a hit or miss location!  You never know what kind of quality or service you're going to find here.  A friend and myself went a few weeks back after a movie and it had to be one of the worst trips there EVER!  You can't entirely blame the waitress since she was the only one there for the entire place...poor scheduling on the manager's part. However, while she can't be accountable for the slooooow service, she was accountable for both orders being incorrect.  The burgers were over cooked and the fries were soggie and the milkshake was runny at best...\n\nBy far my worst visit to Steak n' Shake!
Rather typical SnS.  Had a good lunch crowd.  Milkshake was good but not as good as EnP down the street.  It took to long to get the burger for some reason, 25 minutes, I realized cooked to order but this is a little long for SnS.  Ordered the Guacamole Steakburger and it only had a small portion of Gauc...not your usual amount..kitchen was not up to speed on portion sizing for some reason.  Definitely did not look like the picture on the website.  Oh well!
This place is s l o w....like so slow I have got up and left after waiting 30 minutes and not even being acknowledged by a server. The food is okay. Def not worth the wait. Milkshakes are just okay as well. Booooooo.
I really like the chili. Burgers are fair and salads are pretty bad. Pretty hard to mess up a side salad. As others have said you never know what kind of service you will get. Store is usually understaffed and cleanliness is fair. The staff is usually disinterested with customers and sometimes outright rude. All in all what you pay is what you get. Cheap and crap service.
The food is good. Unfortunately the service is very hit or miss. The main issue seems to be with the kitchen, the waiters and waitresses are often very apologetic for the long waits and it's pretty obvious that some of them avoid the tables after taking the initial order to avoid hearing complaints.
This place teeters between a 2 and a 3 star review.  I've had pretty good experiences inside, it's usually the drive-thru where things fall a part.  \n\nIt's the rare place I can get a Frisco Melt well, the ONLY place I can get a Frisco Melt!  and that steak burger alone is worth the risk, Walk In OR Drive Thru.\n\nJust take a gun on Weekends, you'll be fine.
Nice staff but apparently there is little manager oversight around 3:28am.\n\nI do like this place.  It must be nice to work somewhere that allows you to choose your own tasks.  Like smoking, sitting and texting.  I'm fine with cooking my food being fourth on the \"to do\" list because there is no where else togo really....\n\nWhy didn't they answer me at the drive through? I think they wanted me to come inside because my girlfriend and I are really really really good looking.\n\nThis was annoying but understandable.
It's okay. Food is cheap but portions are small. For example I order the chicken tenders, and I got 3 little tiny tenders, and a decent amount of fries. Also the restaurant is not really clean either.  This restaurant is not my number 1 choice.
Another store which has gone the way of the Dodo bird. Actually there was nothing basement like about it. What will be done with the empty space that is the question?
$9.75 for a red bull and vodka? I'm sorry, I thought I was in Pittsburgh, not New York City. Sing Sing, a dueling piano bar, is fun, but it would be a hell of a lot more fun if I could have more than one watered down drink before I warbled my way through \"Paradise City\" with the rest of the crowd.
In my opinion, Sing Sing is really not worth it. It gets expensive because you drink, maybe start to sing a few lyrics, drink some more, think of a song you wanna hear, put $5 and title of said song on a piece of paper, you drink, they play it, everyone else is trying to get their songs played so you put $10 on your next sticky note...and so on and so forth. I wasn't really into it when I first got there but as the night went on and lager went in I started to warm up to the place. I feel that if I have to drink in order to have a good time, it's not worth it. But again, that's just me.\n\nThe 2 stars are for the piano players, who are entertaining and very talented, and the Rock Bottom brews they serve.
This place has gone significantly down hill.  I've gone to Sing Sing about once a year for the last 6 or 7 years.  When we started going there you couldn't get a seat unless you got there early.  It was always packed.  However, each year the crowd seems to get smaller and smaller.  Crowd is an important component of a piano bar due to the interactive nature of it all.  I was there last Saturday night (8/4/12) and there was about 20-30 people there.  Very slow and boring.  It appears the crowd is no longer allowed up on stage, taking a lot of the interactive fun out of what this place used to be.  This was likely my last time at Sing Sing.  Save your $7 and skip this place.  A real shame because this place was once a lot of fun.
I went here with a bachelorette party. We had reservations, which was good because it was packed that Saturday night. The performers were very talented, but the acoustics were strangely off.   The theme that ran through the whole show was, to quote some phrases they kept repeating, \"you bitch, you slut, you whore\" and  \"twinkle twinkle little slut, why don't you take it up the butt\" which one of the pianists wrote on the mirror at the back of the stage... You get the idea?  Perhaps if I had not been the designated driver, alcohol would have made these jokes funny the fifth, sixth, seventh time. Or maybe not.
I usually have nothing but good things to say about this place. I've dealt with Fran and others and have had very good experiences. However, this time was very different. I called to find out how much they might charge to install some brakes and rotors that I had, i was reffered to Mark, the mechanic. I made the appointment with him for Tuesday Sept 30th, he quoted me between $179 - $200 for the work (though the first person I spoke to quoted $150-$179) and told me to bring it at 8am and it would be finished the same day.when I brought it on Tuesday, Septempber 30th at 8 am, Mark forgets that i even made the appointment with him (or didnt bother to make a note of it) saying, \"oh, I thought you were supposed to bring this by yesterday\". He says I should expect this to probably be done before 3pm. \n\nI soon recieve a call from Mark at 10:25am, where he tells me the charge will actually be $240 (for four hours of labor + $13 worth of materials, before even getting started to see how long the job would actually take) and that the car would be ready by 3pm, if not possibly before that. Also for good measure he decides to randomly throw in, \"oh, and we don't take checks\". \n\nThe next phone call is at 3:50pm to ask if i actually need to have the car back today, I tell Mark, \"yes, of course\". (I was expecting to be ready by 3, if not before like he said) When I express that I definitely need it today, he says that he just has to finish this one side and it will be ready by 415. This leaves me with barely enough time to get a bus and get over there before they close at 430. Honestly if what he had to finish on my car could easily be completed between 3:50 and 4:15, i dont think he would bother asking if i still needed to have it that day. As a result I feel that he may have rushed something while putting my car back together, because now something feels slightly off with the feeling of how the cars is aligned or the way the car drifts at times.
This place is overrated. A friend and I were looking forward to a beer and some good bar food- instead the wings were terrible and the beer was good but overpriced. There's nothing wrong with this place I just don't understand the clout around it. There should be no clout.
There's lots of potential here because of the wonderful character and ambiance of this place, but the food was average at best.  We were there on a Pens Playoff night and there were 2 people working all the tables in both rooms.  Our food came to us cold and unimpressive at that.  Our orders were somewhat mixed up.  The potato skins used a really cheap artificial cheese that was not very appealing.  I tasted a slice of pizza, which is definitely the best thing they offer.  The crust was delicious and homemade.  If you are going to order something, I would go with the pizza.  We also ordered the chicken wings which were pretty good, also.  If you are looking for good food, Homestead better choices at Blue Dust or Tin Front.
I've been to Duke's three times now. When I first came to PGH, a lot of locals were telling me that this was a good place to catch a game, drink some brews and get great food. Most of that is true, but the bad has mostly outweighed the good.\n\nThey have an excellent new tap system. Last time I went, they had Thirsty Dog Leghumpper on draft, and it was perfect. The system really elevates already awesome beer. Plus, the selection is awesome. \n\nIt is a sports-themed bar, so you can expect drunk locals, loud TV's and plenty of yelling. I'm sort of into that, so it doesn't bother me, although I do think their staff is not well equipped enough to work among the chaos. Service is often slow, and they give the waitresses ZERO training in the beers that they offer. This is not a good place for trying something new, as they can't tell you a thing about it. \n\nThe biggest downfall of Duke's, though, is the food. I've had three different, but equally simple, dishes there; A Burger, a Cheesesteak and Chicken Tenders. The first was flavorless and cold. The second was passable, but nothing special. And the last were absolutely awful. Honestly, the batter and size of the chicken made me so ill, I had to call it an early night. I ate two of the 7 tenders (SEVEN!) and had to quit. \nTheir fries are very good. And so are the wings.\n\nI'd say Duke's is a good place to drink, but that's about it.
D&B is nice once in a while but the food is insanely unhealthy. They are also really clever about designing the psychological context in ways to extract money from their customers. You feel a bit milked afterwards. Also much fatter.\n\nYou pay for games using credits from mag-stripe cards. This lets D&B give their games arbitrary prices and makes it harder for you to really know how much you are spending. Menus for drinks and food have no prices. $6.05 for a Banana Split cocktail? $3.40 for a Michelob?  I have no idea whether that is expensive but not showing the prices is clever because they can price their things and not have to obey pricing psychology (like anchors and so forth).\n\nWaitstaff hassle you repeatedly to order desserts. Oh, and the dining room has plastic demos dessert trays to get that thought going in your mind as you walk to your table.\n\nThe games are all violent shooters or racing games don't appear to have changed much since 2002 when I last went to D&B in California. Hope they can find more innovative arcade games in the future.\n\nNot a pleasant experience, but at least it's different from going to an ordinary restaurant.
Dave and Buster's is an enigma, is it dining, a bar, or  playground for video game lovers? Let me get the bar part out of the way first, it's overpriced, and they try to get you to buy a glass to jack up your bill. \n\nNext, the food. Just like all the chain places at the Waterfront, there are sandwiches, burgers (yes they have a blue cheese burger, who doesn't?) pasta, salads, chicken fingers, yadda yadda. \n\nThe games, I swear over three quarters of the games have been there since 2000 when the place opened. I guess in ten years no new games have hit the scene.\n\nOverall Dave and buster's is unique to the Waterfront, but it's time to update the menu, update the games, and get into the second decade of the 21st century.
Not much of a review for this one, but just a few tidbits of info...\n\nPool (on Friday/Saturday) is $14 per hour\n(I'm pretty sure its $10 through the week)\n\nMixed drinks are way too pricey for the location.\nThe food is crap.\n\nThe games are fun and the pool tables are nice (they're the big tournament style/size, not the shitty bar-room, tiny pool tables).\n\nThat is all.  :)\n\n(the pricing is based on my recent trip.\nWe shot pool for a few hours, I had a bar tab (that wasn't out of control) and my night ended up costing me $60
When did Dave and Buster's become a daycare?? Everywhere you look, there are signs that say kids must be accompanied by an adult, but apparently no one was honoring that at 6PM on a Saturday. I couldn't even walk through the place without someone shoving me. AHHH!\nI get that Dave and Buster's is an arcade and that you're going there to play some games, maybe eat, and kill some time. When I last went there a few years ago, we there for my bachelor party, and while I'm sure we got into some shenanigans, I don't remember children running wild there. We were having adult beverages, playing games, and having a good time. This time, it was ridiculous. It isn't Chuck E. Cheese, yet that's how parents seem to be treating the place.\nOn top of that, the customer service sucked. The place is gigantic, with tables and serving areas everywhere, yet on a Saturday at 6PM, the hostess told us (after interrupting us three times to chat with the other hostess) told us it would be a three hour wait, despite the fact that there were empty tables all over the dining room. I suspect this is a ploy to get you to play games and spend money until you're table is ready, but the food at Dave and Buster's is not worth a three hour wait on any day.\nThe hostess told us we could be served right away if we went to the midway and found an empty table, so we attempted that. Most of those tables were empty with usually one or two adults at a giant empty table filled with coats who informed us that they needed the table because their kids would be back soon after playing games. Next, i engaged in the most rudest thing I've ever done- I began stalking tables where people were finishing up. I would walk up to people paying their check, ask if I could have their table when they were done, and they would inform me that there were already two or three people who asked them and I should get in line.\nFinally, we found a table and proceeded to spend two hours eating dinner. It wasn't because we ordered a lot of food- it was that the waiter took forever to bring our food out. He seemed to have no problem getting us fresh drinks, until we drank as much as we could and then asked for water. After that, he seemed to come around a lot less. \nI had the build your own chicken tacos, which comes on a giant plate with all kinds of fixings. The fixings were fresh, but the chicken was cold and dry, and the tortillas were dried out as well. For $14, it wasn't worth it. \nAfter dinner we proceeded to play games, which entails shoving people to get through areas and waiting in line to play anything. \nAll in all, I didn't like my experience at Dave and Busters. I remembered it being a fun place to go and unwind as an adult. but between all the kids and the crappy service, can't recommend this place. If anyone asks me to go back, I may elect to stay home and poke my eyes with a fork.
Not being from the area, I traveled an hour to come here from Uniontown, PA. I was excited! I haven't been to this Dave and Buster's since I was younger and was ready to go back and play me some games! I went with my cousins, mind you, we hadn't ate all day and were very hungry. So, we decided to do the Eat & Play Combo, naturally. Here's where it gets bad. First of all, we get a very snobby hostess that shows us to our table. Then, we wait...and wait...and finally after about 25 mins we get a waitress. Her name was Ashley. We had plenty of time to decide what we wanted, so we quickly put our order in. Next, we were sitting and talking, waiting, we had empty glasses and our waitress had never even come around to see if we needed refills except for one time. She said she'd come back right away with our refills...yea, right. 20 mins later we get our refills. Mind you, our food still hasn't came yet. I see other people getting their food that had come in after us. I was frustrated. After waiting 45 mins for our food, I asked to speak with a manager. One of the servers who I asked replied rudely with \"Well, he's really busy right now. I doubt he'll be able to come out and talk to you\". Finally, 15 mins later...that's one hour, folks. We get our food. What do you think the next problem was? Yep, the food was cold. I was completely fed up at this point, and told my waitress how disappointed I was, especially after driving one hour just to have this terrible service. The manager never came to speak with me, and we didn't even receive our meals for free. The only compensation we got were $10 game cards. Woopty-doo. The only thing good about this place is the games, but the prizes you get for your tickets are all junk and worthless. So, in conclusion...I DO NOT RECOMMEND THE WATERFRONT DAVE AND BUSTERS OF HOMESTEAD, PA. It was horrible, and I will not be returning for a very long time!
My boyfriend and I are in our 20s, and have visited this D&B multiple times. After our visit yesterday, however, I don't think we'll be back. When we arrived we were greeted by a long line of people waiting to buy game cards. At first there were 2 extremely slow workers trying to do this, then one left while the line was still out the door! The girl that was left was more than incompetent, and was taking extremely long to fill these game cards. We stood in line for over 20 minutes before being told that there was another attendant in the actual game room. Needless to say, the line in the game room was just as long, and they still only had one girl in the booth. It was a Saturday! After we finally got our cards we had to wait yet again to get a beer. 2 bartenders on staff while the bar was completely full. It took us almost an hour before we actually could start gaming. The floors were filthy with trash, and the bathrooms: repulsive! I had to use the restrooms twice during our visit, and not only did both bathrooms I used have no toilet paper in them, but there was TP all over the floors, and the sinks were less than cleanly. My boyfriend mentioned that the guys restroom was no better, as it smelled like pee and the paper towel dispenser didn't work. All I have to say is get your crap together. We could see a difference in the type of crowed that was there on Saturday compared to what it used to be, and I'm I have no doubt it's due to the poor service and attention to cleanliness. For how expensive they are they need to staff better on weekends. It's a shame how quickly this place has gone down hill and we will NOT be returning anytime soon!
Ok! Let me tell you about my bad experience first. I went to D&B last night for a post wedding party - which, side note, is a great idea!\n\nIt was around midnight and the bar wasn't really populated. There were three bartenders and only one was actually making rounds to see if anyone needed anything. The two other bartenders were chatting on the far side of the bar that no one was sitting at. Kind of counter productive if you ask me. \n\nI stood there for about 5 minutes, which for a busy bar is fine but when I am the only one with my card out then, it just seems a little ridiculous. I made eye contact with the one girl twice and gave her a smile and she literally turned away. I finally had to walk to them to get their attention.  I was standing right in front of them smiling and they didn't ask if i need anything. I finally said, \"Are you working?\" and they gave each other a weird look. I felt like i was the crazy one. I asked for a beer/got the beer.\n\nIn between that time, the other bartender brought food over and set it down. She took a fry from the plate (right in front of me) and then served it to someone on the other side of the bar. What the hell! I felt like i was in some grimy bar in out in the sticks - not an established D&B. \n\nI was just really turned off from that experience. \n\nThe good is that D&B provides a different type of entertainment when you want to mix things up. I remember going here with my grandparents when I was a kid and it was the best treat ever! We would eat at the restaurant and then spend hours playing games. This place holds some really good memories for me. \n\nIt's a shame that my experience last night has spoiled the high standards I held for it.
I used to love D&B when it first opened in the Waterfront, but it has gone down hill over the years. The games are not as fun and do not give you as many tickets and the prizes have gotten cheaper in quality. It takes a whole heck of a lot of tickets for you to even get a pencil! The atmosphere is okay but it used to be so much better with the funnest games and diverse groups of people! Now, it is run down and many of the games are app related games (Fruit Ninja) and 3D Experience rides. With such \"games\", you can't even earn tickets and they take a lot of tokens! Last time I went, back in the winter, many of the games were broken, which made for a negative player experience. I would go to D&B to play some games again in the future, but it is no longer one of my favorite places to go due to the decline of fun games where you can earn tickets.
My sister and law wanted to go here for lunch so all the kids could play games after we all had some lunch together. This place is huge and was moderately clean except the bathrooms. All of the food looked great on the 16 page menu. When our food came though, everything was below average. They have a huge selection of games for the kids to play, but you pay dearly to play games here. The food is  overpriced and the drinks are drastically overpriced.
SUMMARY:\nIf I was in the area and no one had a better suggestion for where to go, I might come back for beer and appetizers.\n\nGOOD:\n- Decent beer...\n- Original pretzel appetizer.  You take chunks of soft pretzel and dunk it in spinach cheese dip.\n- Huge portions.  Most of us had leftovers.  The RB Appetizer Sampler was multi-story and way more food that we could handle.  The half order of ribs looked like a full rack.\n- Attentive service with quick seating and frequent drink/water refills.\n- Amusing name.\n\nBAD:\n- Lots of food choices... burgers... steak... chicken... salads.  Lots of drink choices... beers... wines... mixed drinks.  I guess this could be seen as good, but it takes a while for everyone to pick something and since no one's awesome at everything, you could tell right away that nothing distinguishes this place.\n- None of the food was super awesome.  Nothing was awful, but nothing stood out in any way.  I've had better beer, appetizers, and a better main course at plenty of breweries.\n- Kind of dead on a Monday night with 3/4 of the place empty.\n\nCome if you want bar food, but keep your expectations low.
Lately, the Rock Bottom is hit or miss. The beers are always good and the Uppity Jagoff IPA is one of the best India Pale Ales I've ever tasted. The low point lately has been the food. I will never forgive the idiot in management who took the chicken quesadilla off the menu. That said, I ordered the lobster roll and when it arrived, the bread was as hard as a brick and cold. The filling was okay, but the lobster flavor was masked by over spicing. I suggest you eat somewhere else and imbibe at the Rock Bottom.
I always feel like I am constantly bashing breweries for their food, but in my opinion, I feel the bar is raised for places like this. It seems there are so many breweries out there that offer great beer, and slack off on the food. Unfortunately Rock Bottom is one that falls into that category. Let's be honest, when you go to a brewery, you want the full experience. If it was only about the beer, I'd go buy a growler and take it home. \n\nSo, about the beer....EXCELLENT!!!!! The Jagoff IPA is with out a doubt one of the best IPAs I have ever had! They only I can think of that I think is better is Dogfish Head, but that's a matter of opinion. The beer selection is constantly changing, and they always have some excellent seasonal beers. You can't go wrong, there's bound to be a beer everyone will like. \n\nAs for the food.......it's pretty much a crap shoot. Sometimes it's good, sometimes it's terrible. My biggest problem is there is absolutely no consistency when it comes to the food. One time it's perfect, then maybe it's cold, or it's burned, or it tastes completely different from the last time you had it. Unfortunately, it seems there is zero attention to food quality. \n\nThat's pretty much it. This place fixes it's food consistency, and it's a five star place. Till then, it's hit or miss!
I must admit, I do like the brews.  I also like the white cheddar mash potatoes.  Other than that, meh.  The food is pretty forgettable.  Another \"brewery\" that sadly fails to be anything special in the food department.  With the restaurants upping the ante on 8th Ave, you may want to kick it up a notch Rock Bottom.  But how would anyone know to?  It's a chain.  Whomp whomp!
I went to Rock Bottom this past weekend, and it was \"nice\" to see that nothing has changed in the year or two since my last visit. While the beer is pretty good, it has never outweighed the fact that the service isn't good and the food is average, at best.\n\nIt was even difficult to get beers at the bar...we tried to have the girls order, thinking they'd have better luck...when that failed, the men tried...that didn't work either. If we hadn't REALLY wanted a cold beer after a comedy show at The Improv, we would've just left. It definitely wasn't busy enough to be noticed and ignored by the bartender, so I can't overlook it. Of course, the service has always been spotty at Rock Bottom, so it was hardly surprising.\n\nCombine the weak food and poor service with Rock Bottom being too far from home for a night out just to drink, and you get the exact formula that's kept me from going there in the past...and will keep me from going often in the future.
Slow service\nBelow average food \nIll pass
Rock Bottom is a chain brew pub one that, in my opinion, is just \"OK\".  The restaurant is rather large with lots of seating and a pool table. They have many of their own brews that you can sample but to tell you the truth none of them are that good. I have had several of their beers and all of them have been forgettable. \n\nTheir food is pretty much like their beers, forgettable. I have had one of their burgers and their pizza and they really weren't anything to write home about.\n\nI feel they will impress those who have never been to a brew pub but I would probably describe them as the Chili's of Brew Pubs. If you are in homestead and are looking for a burger and a beer it might be a good choice for a bite, or at least until the Burgatory opens!
Went here last night to meet folks for a friend's birthday party. Docking one star due to a few unfortunate things that happened, otherwise I'd be fine giving this place a 3.\n\nOur waiter was very attentive and kept our water and soda cups refilled, the food was decent overall - I had a plain ol' burger and a delicious berry sangria - and the place overall had a nice vibe to it and was pretty comfortable and fun to be in...you'd think this would just be another average place not-great-but-not-bad and I'd be ready to go on to the next review right there.\n\nHere's where I ran into problems. I'd checked the website in advance to try and plan my meal since I do my best to pick items on menus that aren't, say, 2,000 calories in one sitting. Their website advertises that they make skinny drinks; when I asked my waiter he said it was possible but that they did not normally do this and that it's a hassle for the people at the bar, so he didn't recommend it. Then why tell us on your website that you'll do it??? \n\nAdditionally, while we had checked in advance when we made our reservation about bringing a birthday cake and the restaurant's ability to handle us lighting candles, apparently there was a break down in communication; we never got the candles we had asked for, and in fact the poor waiter struggled to even find a lighter before realizing there were no candles available. Obviously whatever error occurred wasn't the waiter's fault, and we definitely thanked him and tipped him well for doing the best that he could with what he had.\n \nOn a final note, this is also one of those places where if you ask for a medium rare burger, they will overcook it; I've started ordering medium rare on purpose specifically so that I get a medium cooked burger instead of medium well or well done.\n\nFinal verdict: go for the brews if you must, and the food's nice enough. I was admittedly left a little underwhelmed.
So after an evening of enjoying a comedy show at the Waterfront, we headed to Rock Bottom for some late night grub.  The place was pretty busy, we had to walk around the bar area for several minutes until a nice couple told us they were about to leave and we could have their bar table.  As nice as this was of them it was awkward standing over them as they finished their drinks paid their bill and left.  \n\nSo finally seated I look over the drinks and being the huge IPA lover that I am I went with that and it was indeed a good choice.  The hubby had the Red Ale which was also rather good.\n\nThe service was OK, not the best not the worst.  But moving on to more important thing, the food.  Talk about missing the mark hugely!  I ordered the mini street fish tacos.  You get four mini tacos with a marinated in lime piece of fish, and tomatillo salsa.  They were just strokes away from inedible.  I love fish tacos, I mean it is such a simple concept so why do people have such a hard time executing this dish? The shells were hard and literally split at the bottom when I picked them up.  The sour cream sprayed all over the plate only made them messy and the poor fish was just so overcooked.  If I wasn't so hungry I wouldn't have eaten them at all! Lesson learn on that.\n\nThe husband had the BBQ Chicken Pizza.  It had beans and corn with roasted red pepper on it along with some sour cream.  My husband is usually the type that will order these lovely specialty pizza's and ask for them to remove all the wonderful unique toppings!  For instance, he would usually just say, Chicken BBQ and cheese, nothing else!  I refused to let him do that this time, because I was really intrigued in the combination of ingredients on this pie.  And boy was I jealous when it came out.  It blew my crappy tacos out of the water!  Should have stuck with something simple.  \n\nFurthermore I could care less if I come back to this location.  The beers were good but hell you can get a decent IPA just about anywhere anymore.  And the underwhelming food sealed the deal.  I know this is a chain, but it still doesn't have to stink...
The food is standard American fare--a bit overpriced in my mind--and the beers range from mediocre to very bad.  The K\u00f6lsch is the only decent beer of the bunch.  The service is good, but the wait for food or a table can be quite long (generally 20-30 minutes even for just beer and apps).  I've been to the one at the Denver airport as well, but I was stranded and had free meal tickets, so okay-but-nothing-special pizza from Rock Bottom it was.  Since it's a recognizable national chain, I think of places like this as more of a tourist brewery rather than a true Pittsburgh craft-brew experience.
The beer is good but the food is nothing to brag about at ALL. I've tried many things on the menu, and if you have developed a \"foodie\" palate, don't even bother, because you will be very disappointed. If you feel comfortable with chain restaurants and their lack of innovative touch (which, nothing wrong with that!) you will most likely enjoy Rockbottom. The only entree I did enjoy were the lobster and shrimp enchiladas (minus the repulsive beans and rice) and the asiago crab dip as an appetizer. Otherwise, you are better off skipping it.
The place does what it does best - Comedy.  The food, however.  Blah.\n\nFirst off, If you go to a show, please note there is a two item per person minimum.  This means that from their extensive menu of overpriced bar food and drinks, you are REQUIRED to choose two items each.    \n\nSecond, the sodas are NOT FREE REFILLS!  I learned that one the hard way.  Get water. \n\nThird, before tipping your server, please make sure she hasn't already taken her cut out.  Even after paying for two very bland, overpriced meals and way too many Diet Cokes, I thought that my bill was rather high.  Upon further inspection, I noticed that my server had taken an 18% gratuity.  The menu explicitly says that an automatic gratuity will be taken out for parties of six or more, but there was only two of us and we weren't even drunk.  I found this tactic awfully presumptuous and left her tip at the 18% even though I typically tip well over 20%.    \n\nOverall, I don't like the idea of being required to purchase food just to see a comedy show.  I can see why they do it, but if I were required to buy a crappy popcorn and overpriced pop every time I went to the movies, I would be far less inclined to go as I am not inclined to go to the Improv again.
The Pittsburgh Improv is unfortunately another great idea hamstrung by the details of mediocre execution (some specific examples at the end).\n\nThe setup is nice, a delightful--if a bit sterile--reproduction of what you'd think a comedy club should like if you watch enough TV.  The interior is clean; the seats are comfortable; and it's an OK atmosphere to see a show and laugh.\n\nIt's too small, however, to attract many of the best acts, which limits its ability to ever become the central hub for Pittsburgh comedy.  Most of the big names that have recently come through Pittsburgh--Jim Gaffigan, Louis CK, Second City--all perform elsewhere (though they managed to get Bob Saget, to their credit).\n\nBut the biggest problem is the food and drink.  They're very up front about their mandatory two item minimum, but the forced service requires that you spend extra money and get interrupted by waitstaff at least several times during the show.  The prices are well above what I'd consider reasonable given the quality, and I'd begrudgingly--or even happily--just shrug off the cost the same way I would a stadium concession stand markup...but the food is bad.  You're forced to either (a) buy extremely overpriced drinks (3.50 for a soda, for example, with no refills--or ten dollars for one with refills), or (b) buy moderately overpriced food which you wouldn't want in the first place.  I thought the ten dollar chicken sandwich looked reasonable, until a few bites in I decided I'd rather just throw away the money than keep eating it.\n\nStill, I think this place has a lot of potential; the core idea is very workable; and they do attract some really good comedians.  Two stars for now, with high hopes for improvements.\n\nA few specific drawbacks which could be VERY easily fixed:\n1 - A lot of the drinks didn't have prices on them.  I know this isn't uncommon, but at a venue where every question you ask interrupts not only your own show-viewing experience as well as the experiences of your neighbors, it's an incredibly poor decision here.  Make everything on the menu exceptionally clear.  It's not that hard.\n2 - Put the drink prices on the website too.  An Improv representative has personally responded to many of these Yelp reviews, and she once said \"Our menus and pricing are listed on our website, which makes for easy planning!\"  I'm calling shenanigans.  Not all the prices are on the website, which makes for difficult planning.\n3 - Reminding me to tip my server during the show AND adding an automatic gratuity to the check makes me feel like you're trying to trick me.  It's kind of an unprofessional way to say goodbye to one's customers.\n4 - Since the $3.50 soft drinks don't come with free refills, the servers shouldn't ask \"would you like a refill on that?\" or anything of the sort.  They should ask \"would you like another one?\" instead.  They should also respond to requests for refills by saying \"we don't offer refills, but I'd be happy to get you another one.\"  Just because there's a 10 dollar refillable soda option on the menu doesn't mean people all figure it out.  Most patrons don't even bother reading the beverage section of the menu if all they want is a standard beverage offered almost everywhere (like a cola or diet cola), and the reading difficulties imposed by the darkness make them even less likely to browse the offerings.
My husband and I went to do something fun. The comedy was great!  The food, however, is mediocre at best. In addition, we were seated in the last row, and 10 minutes into the headliner they sat someone else at our table, so that they were in front of us. I could not see a thing. When we received our check, they had added an 18% gratuity without permission or notification.  I will not be returning anytime soon.
We came to the Improv for the first time on Friday night for my wife's work holiday party. We arrived early for dinner and drinks from a predetermined menu. Dinner started with a salad of clearly bagged, almost brown iceberg lettuce, with some croutons and frozen-then-thawed looking tomatoes that were pinkish at best. I took a few bites of this unappetizing poor excuse for a salad, and I can tell you it was downright tragic. Dinner arrived and since there wasn't any vegetarian options on this predetermined menu, we received a dish that was supposed to contain meat with the meat omitted. It was a huge pile of spaghetti in a bowl. It looked sloppy and tasted worse than it looked. The pasta was overcooked, and the tomato sauce was just watered down pur\u00e9ed canned tomatoes. I saw traces of onion in my dish but didn't taste them at all. I was so hungry that I salted the heck out of this abomination and took a few bites. Yuck. I didn't make a dent in this crapfest. For dessert we were given a choice of chocolate cake, which my wife ordered, and cheesecake, which I ordered. The chocolate cake had freezer burn. Inexcusable! It wasn't edible. The cheesecake was only a hair better, but it had obviously come out of the freezer as well. I know people aren't coming here for the food, but if you are FORCING them to order things off of your menu to fulfill some outdated requirements (two drink/two menu item minimum) then at least make some halfway decent food. It doesn't even have to be memorable...just not OFFENSIVE. Which it was!! Had I paid for any of this I would have made a huge stink, but I tried to be polite and push my food around and make small talk. \n\nThe comedians were good. The venue was nice-ish and we got to sit in the front because we arrived early for our \"event\". Not always the best thing in a comedy club (we only got picked on a little bit). But damn, I was hungry! I found myself fantasizing about all of the crappy Waterfront restaurants and how I'd rather be there...how I'd rather be heating up a discount microwave dinner...how I'd rather have a giant bowl of Captain Crunch...how I'd rather go back in time and eat spaghetti from my high school cafeteria...what a dreadful dining experience.\n\nMy car was also violated in the parking lot. I had an adorable German license plate on the front of my adorable German car which was stolen while I was eating hideous food, which was just the slap in the face I wanted when finally retreating to my car. I feel sick in so many different ways about this experience as a whole.\n\nThe Improv should consider outsourcing the food prep to a catering company. I truly believe that's the only thing that can save this place. Do yourself a favor and eat beforehand, and just order a beer. Well, two I guess. Other diners at our table complained about the quality of the cocktails so I'd steer clear of those. Unless there is a can't miss type of comedian here, I can't ever picture going back to the Improv. I'd give the comedians 4 stars, and the food ZERO stars.
So...we got here and seated by 635pm. Orders placed. Drinks served. Now it is 752pm. One of my party has still not received his chicken sandwich. I had\nMy shrimp diablo. It was as described. Spicy and good!!! But hour plus for a chicken sandwich is unacceptable. We also sent an order of chicken fingers back...dryer than sand. And my fianc\u00e9s chicken Caesar salad chicken was as dry as the chicken fingers. Barely edible, in fact, she didn't eat more than 3 pieces of it. Upgrade the food service and this place would be somewhat a lil better.
Barnes & Noble, it's like the Wal-Mart of bookstores.  Beating down the competition of other now defunct national competitors and mom and pop type stores alike.  \n\nI'm not quite sure whether I'm in a cafe, at a newspaper stand, a book store, a CD shop, a movie house or a flea market sometimes.  With all the tables and shelves that  you have to dodge it's a bit hard to figure it out.  Feels like the place should implode on itself and then reform into an audio book about coffee.\n\nI don't know about y'all, but I'd rather buy my books from a place that has more knowledge about the merchandise they are selling than a national chain like this.
I stopped here yesterday with Rob and Matt after golf to have a few drinks prior to seeing \"The Hangover\" at Loews across the street.  Incidentally, \"The Hangover\" is one of the funniest movies I've seen in years and worth the $10 to see it in the theater.  Okay, back to the restaurant the space itself is very nice.  There are plenty of hightops, plasmas and a few booths.  It's spacious and they have outdoor seating and open windows.  We sat at the bar and were greeted relatively quickly by the bartender who was tending a pretty much empty bar.  I ordered a guinness as usual, Rob ordered a long island iced tea and Matt had a miller light.  Make sure and tell them if you want a top shelf tea else you'll be getting the stuff in the plastic bottles.  I sampled Rob's long island tea and it was not that good way too much sours.  The next one he ordered was much better after a little guidance to the bartender.  The bartender herself was okay, not too friendly but quick enough with the pours.  I don't remember her name which is usually not a good sign.  We ordered a few things from the appetizer menu.  We started with the chips and salsa.  The chips were crisp enough, but not served warm and the salsa had some spice but the colors were a little off kind of looked like the color of pea soup.  Rob then ordered the philly cheese steak sliders.  I tried one it was okay I guess  the bun was warm and it was pretty loaded with cheese and onions.  He asked for a side of mayo and they said they were out, which is bizarre because there is a giant eagle a couple blocks away.  This pretty much sums up my experiences at the Bar Louie's I've been too.  They kind of do just enough for me to come back but rarely make any real effort with service.  Maybe I'm being too critical... I tried to order the baked goat cheese, but they were out... So, I settled on the hummus appetizer.  This was surprisingly pretty good.  The pita was warm and toasted the hummus had lots of flavor and the tabouleh was edible.  It's probably best to stick to simple stuff when dining here.  Matt had the hot wings which I tried one and it was okay, your pretty standard mass produced chicken wing.  All in all this place isn't that bad.  If you want to grab a drink before or after the movie and you're more concerned with convenience than necessarily friendly service and really good food than you could do worse.
I had the EXACT same experience as John R. Went here to get a quick bite to eat before seeing a movie across the street. The place was near empty and there were three waitresses. Got seated and waited on immediately. Ordered drinks, and it took them 15 minutes to come...no, not alcoholic drinks, two waters and an iced tea. This should have been a bad sign, but at this point we ordered food.\n\n20 minutes go by...we flag down our waitress, to let her know that we need to get to a movie in 45 minutes. She said our food would be out in a few minutes. Another 20 minutes, still no food, and our waitress is nowhere to be seen. We flag down another waitress, she says she will find our waitress, who we then notice is chatting with one of the other waitresses. She finishes her conversation and finally makes her way over to our table about five minutes later. She says she didn't even realize our food hadn't arrived (well, you never even checked on us, so of course you didn't). After speaking with the kitchen staff, she informs us that she \"definitely\" put our order in so it \"must have been given to someone else by mistake.\" Because they wouldn't have noticed that that WASN'T what they ordered? Seriously?\n\nThe waitress told us she could give us our food for take out and, since we were starving, we reluctantly agreed. 10 minutes later, our food and the bill arrived. All that was comped was the iced tea, and we got some free utensils and wetnaps. How generous! We shovelled what we could into our mouths, did NOT leave a tip (thankfully, we didn't have the added gratuity that John had), and sprinted to our movie where we covertly finished our smuggled food. Worst part? I opened the wetnap, and it was totally dry. Of course.\n\nHowever, I gave this place two stars instead of one. That's because my food, when I finally got it, was perfect. I had the Greek burger and it was huge, cooked exactly how I like it, with delicious toppings. I really wish I could come back here for the food but...hell no.
Let me just say that this used to be a place I loved.\n\nRemember when you'd go somewhere and have good food, great service and a general pleasant experience and then a few months you'd go back and have it all again? Well one day you decide to go back and you realized everything has changed in a way that you can't describe and the place is no longer familiar. To me, that is Bar Louie\n\nI can't say the food is bad. I had an order of the pretzel sticks for an appetizer and the cinnamon sauce tasted like water and the pretzels were stale. I will say I still ate them so shame on me. My  sandwich (the Mario) as always was very good.\n\nNow here comes the bad:\n\n1. There were fruit flies EVERYWHERE. I felt like we were eating on top of a garbage dump. At one point I had to get a new drink because one flew in my beer. I understand that the establishment is an indoor/outdoor place but there is no reason for 15 fruit flies to hover over my table.\n\n2. The place is enormous and they had one, very nice, but over worked server. The girl looked like she was about to have a heart attack because she never stopped moving.\n\n3. Because of number two our service in general was not good. I can't totally blame the girl she did the best we could. I mean. I've played Diner Dash on my iPad, I know what happens when a place fills up too quickly when you are the only one working.\n\nIt's sad when a place you love turns into a place you never want to go again. I think I'm being very generous by giving it two stars but because I used to love it so much I can't rate it that low. Part of me hopes it gets better, but like an absentee father it'll just let me down again.
This is one of those places where the presentation is nice, but the taste is too ordinary. Friends and I went here for happy hour (starting at 5pm). They claimed to have $1 draft, $5 mixed drinks, and half off appetizers. When we got there, we realized the happy hour special only applies to certain items, so pretty much the discount was pointless. We ended up spending a fortune on beer and mediocre appetizers. \n\nI only had appetizers here so I can't really judge them for their entr\u00e9es, but I will rate according to my eating/drinking experience.  I got the spinach artichoke dip. It was a little runny and the dip to chips ratio was disappointing. For a dip, it had way too many obstacles built in to it. I don't know what they did with the artichoke, but it was super fibrous...I felt like I was chewing grass. \n\nOverall, I would not recommend this place unless you have money to make it rain. Food was way too average for the high price.
I am normally a Bar Louie Fan - my husband and I LOVE the one in Tampa.  This location needs a lot of work.  We went on a Friday evening before a show at the Improv.  We were looking to meet up with friends and have drinks and a quick bite to eat.  We never got to the food part because of the level of service that we received.  We got there at about 6:40/6:45 so Happy Hour was wrapping up, but I would say that the bar was not even 3/4 full.  There were also plenty of empty tables.  This should have been our sign to run in the opposite direction.  But we grabbed a table.  I am not a clock watcher, so I am not sure how long it took us to get a server but it was at least 5-7 minutes.  Then we got our drinks at 7:04.  The only reason that I know is because I was looking at my phone because my husband and I wanted to get some apps ordered before the end of Happy Hour.  That went out the window.  When our friends for there; they ordered drinks.  We finished them and left.  The server was nice, that is not the issue.  The issue was how GROSSLY UNDERSTAFFED they were.  They had two bartenders on (I think) and not nearly enough cocktail servers.  The server apologized for the wait on the drinks, but explained it away with \"this happens at the end of happy hour because the bar get swamped\".  That is a sign that you need more staff.  I have never had this happen at any other bar before.  Get more staff.  We ended up passing up on food because we were worried about time, not the fact that we did not get HH pricing.  Even though, in my opinion, they should have honored HH pricing since we were ready to order food at 7:50/7:55.  We ended up going to the Improv and got food there.  Bar Louie lost a great deal of my money because their lack of staffing and they will never get our Pittsburgh business again or our friends who live there.
The food was okay. The noise level--with 10 people in a huge room--deafening. Awful acoustics!
Food is Shitty probably would be good if they had a cook that knew how to cook it correctly.  Staff is ok no complaints drinks are good as well
Eh, this place was okay but it was sort of a weird crowd/overall experience for a Saturday night.\n\nBobby and I came here after dinner and sat up at the bar. Tip: if you sit behind the taps, no one will bother to acknowledge you exist. When we moved seats, we were finally asked what we would like to drink after waiting for 5+ minutes in our original seats. It wasn't all that busy, either. Most of the people sitting at the bar were a bit older than we were. It seems that Bar Louie is trying too hard to be trendy with the decor/neon blue lighting/extensive martini list. Maybe I'm just salty about the wait.
Really the only thing good about this place is the happy hour. No one wants to pay $8 for a glass of wine that is a short pour and bottom quality.
I don't frequent Bar Louie, and I really don't plan to change that any time soon. I've eaten here and stopped in for drinks a couple times over the years and I just haven't been super impressed by the place.\n\nThe food has been decent - a few years back I splurged on an enormous fried chicken sandwich and definitely enjoyed it, glutton that I am - but their meals and appetizers alike have admittedly never \"wowed\" me. And while I enjoy their cocktails and would consider stopping in just for drinks more often, the problem is that things are way overpriced here. Even during the happy hour drinks are pretty costly, not to mention that I think most of the drinks I personally like don't qualify for the happy hour discount, which is disappointing. Once I stopped in with friends after a movie and one drink cost me $10 here. Not even a large one, either! Sorry, but I find that to be kind of ridiculous, especially since there's cheaper places to get drinks in the area.\n\nStill, the food and drinks are definitely a-ok albeit overpriced, so this place would be rated 3 stars in my mind IF I could hear myself think when I eat here. But good Lord, they're just so loud! I always leave with a sore throat from yelling to make myself heard. Not cool, Bar Louie. Not cool.\n\nSo while the food and drinks are fine enough the loud venue and prices mean that this is definitely not one of my favorite places - and given the other options we have at the Waterfront I don't expect to be back in any time soon.
It's fun, but not as fun as Kennywood. The boardwalk food is a bit too far from the wave pool and that makes for a lot of shoes on/shoes off events. The lazy river could be much better. I did like the water slides and the Potato Patch fries, as well as the scenic location.
Sandcastle Water Park in P-Burgh was just \"okay\" for me. I really think that this place is geared towards children more so than adults or \"family\" because there isn't much fun here for people older than 16. The water slides here were lacking. There were very few of them and the majority of them are boring. The last time I was there (not too long ago) there weren't any extremely modern slides like a tornado slide, so they really have some updating to do. \n\nThey do have an \"adult pool\" and bar area but it was so packed that it was hard to actually have fun in this area. The pool is very small, similar to one you'd find at a hotel chain. It has a hot tub area but it sits about 8 adults max. and people were fighting tooth and nail to get in. It wasn't too impressive to me. \n\nThey also have a lazy river at this park and, while I do enjoy lazy rivers, this one was so packed that it was hard to breathe. People kept bumping into me and touching me and it made me grossed out. \n\nThe one attraction that I did enjoy was the wave pool. It was crowded as well but large enough to fit everybody comfortably. The water was nice and clean (a big plus) and the wave action was strong. I could have stayed in there for the entire time we were at the park.\n\nOverall, this place is just mediocre. It doesn't \"wow\" me very much but if you live in the area, have kids, and are looking for somewhere to go in the summer other than the mall, it'll provide them with a lot of fun.
Meh, I've experienced better is an understatement.\n\nFriday's is like the \"fine dining chain\" for every yinzer in Pittsburgh...\n\n1.  When we were seated, it was quick which was a surprise.  Somehow this restaurant gets packed and I never understand why.  I was happy about that.\n2.  I ordered one of their \"skinny margaritas\", blackberry to be exact.  It was a nice size, however, at $6.00/pop, that was half of my food bill.\n3.  The waitress started off attentive, but after our food came out she was gone.  I ordered a turkey burger with pickle and mustard.  Loaded mashed potato on the side because I wanted heartburn ha!\n4.  Food came.  My burger had lettuce on it only.  Waitress was supposed to go and get our next round of drinks.  I had to wait to ask for my pickle.\n5.  The loaded potatoes were more like rubber than potatoes and not what I was expecting.  Disappointment.\n6.  The waitress then went into oblivion and only returned with our check.  \n\nNever again will I eat at Friday's.  I will, however, go should a happy hour arise...
This place.. Is ok if ur grabn something quick .. But they do have a great happy hour tho
I'm not opposed to chain restaurants but this TGI Fridays in comparison to some of the other ones in the area truly falls short of the \"chain\" expectation. \n\nI order the Jack Daniel's chicken and shrimp with just fries. The fries were undercooked and thrown haphazardly into the sauce holder. The shrimp was over cooked and just deepfried. The chicken was fatty and just tasted like it came from their freezer. Even the water tasted weird.\n\nFortunately, we had a very nice and charismatic waiter and all of the staff was very friendly. \n\nI'd recommend the TGI Fridays out in South Hills Village over this one any day.
I had a gift card so I decided to use it for a to go order. The food tasted frozen and microwaved. Nothing special just around average!
Went with 5 others for a weeknight dinner. The server was very friendly, but seemed a little overwhelmed. Maybe they were short handed.  The food was to me not even average. I ordered a burger, which very overdone and dry. Had to drown it in mayo to get moisture in it.  My friend ordered nachos and what arrived looked like they had broken some taco shells down the middle, then put cheese and one jalape\u00f1o slice on each piece. Imagine 6 half-moons of taco shell.  Not like any nachos I've ever seen, and more importantly not even the way they were served the three prior times my friend had ordered them.
I don't care what Cub and Bulls fans think, this Steeler and Penguins fan thinks deep dish pizza is not all that. First, the crust tastes like a biscuit, and biscuits belong nowhere near or on a pizza. I will give UNOs a thumbs up on it's flatbread, it's better pizza than some pizzerias In the area. When I look over uno's menu almost nothing excites me, this place is a dud. Guess what? Chicagoans don't know how to eat hot dogs either!
I really love deep dish pizza. The thick crust that is crunchy on the outside and soft on the inside. The spicy, peppery sauce that can singe your tongue. The mixture of ingredients just sliding down your chin as it bubbles out of your mouth. That being said, I really don't understand why people go to Pizzeria Uno. This chain has done to the deep dish pizza what McDonald's has done to hamburgers, Pizza Hut has done to pan pizza, Dominoes has done to hand tossed pizza, and Taco Bell has done to Tex-Mex; it has made it almost unpalatable. On our menu:\n\nFrench onion\nChicken bites\nPizza with pepperoni, hamburger, and romano\n\nLooking past the fact that the service was not the best or the fact that the food came out undercooked and tepid in temperature, the food just was not good. Don't get me wrong, this is not the worst pizza I have ever eaten, but this chain is a perfect example of what happens when something becomes so prescribed, overhandled, and overthought that it no longer resembles the original piece of art that tasted so good. \n\nI really never want to return.
Food was ok had a steak w/ shrimp side Ass mashed potatoes. Everything was ok not a lot of flavor.
Pizza ok on it's own nothing great . Definitely not worth the restaurant price.  definitely not like pizzeria UNO in Chicago. Are they even related   or are they just using their name and trademark.
The menu is outstanding but the pizza and beer is too expensive. For 2 personal pizzas (the size of pizza hut) 2 beers and 2 salads, we paid over $50 bucks. The personal pizzas alone were $11 each... If you want pizza and beer go somewhere else-pasta appetizers, or sandwiches... this place is good.
Was very disappointed with the food. It was overcooked and not seasoned very well
Nice place but some of the items on the menu are not available unless you get a 2 for 12 but that's not what the online menu states. And it's a salad come on..
Stars are for the food only.    2.5 rating\n\nGot there at 8pm on Saturday night, they told us it was an hour wait which was expected, but it only took 30minutes to be seated so that was a bonus.  Started off with the lettuce wraps and i used to be a fan of these but they just seem to bore me now(FYI-love the lettuce wraps at the cheesecake factory).  I had the Singapore rice noodles.  This was so so as i thought immediately that lu lu noodles and asian cafe are better.  The fried rice was disappointing and the vegetables tasted raw.   Some good notes were the Dynamite shrimp, plump, juicy, tangy with a small kick.    Sweet and sour chicken was just the same minus the kick. \n\nThe service was annoying.   We were there less than 45 minutes and it seemed like our waiter was in a rush to get us out of there.   Constantly asking if he could remove my plate.  I had to sternly say at one point that I will let you know when i am finished.  I found it rude especially since  there wasn't even a line at this point.  \n\nI think we will travel elsewhere following a movie.  The result never quite met the anticipation.
Sadly I've been here a few times because it's a crowd pleaser when my girlfriend's parents come down to visit. There's nothing really WRONG with it. The portions are big and the food is \"alright\" and the interior gives you the superficial impression that you're encountering fine dining.\n\nThe food is sooooo bland though. Everything you get at P.F. Chang's you can get elsewhere in Pittsburgh at a much lower cost and it'll be made with more precision and have better flavor. The honey chicken at P.F. Chang's was so mediocre all I could think about while eating it was heading over to Wai Wai in Bloomfield and getting a tastier order of it for 8 bucks.\n\nLast time we were there the server was horrendous as well. I don't think I've ever felt as awkward at a restaurant. He brought my girlfriend's father (Don) his unsweetened tea then told him he didn't bring sugar because he asked for it sweetened and then did not understand the concept of sweetening it yourself. He then got all huffy when Don kept asking for it and actually seemed angry at us. When he came back to take our order Don ordered for himself and his wife and before Janey (my girlfriend) and I could order he had already started to walk away. We actually had to yell out to get him to come back and finish our order. (not in an uncivilized or malicious way, either) After that he must have thought we were terrible diners (I don't think I've ever been impolite to someone who is currently at work, or ANYONE for that matter) and he showed it by being silent and plopping things down in a passive aggressive way. It was really embarrassing and every time he came by the conversation died.\n\nObviously the attitude of one idiot who can't hide his bad day well doesn't really have anything to do with the restaurant. But it's soooooo bland! Go somewhere else for Chinese! Look up Chinese on Urbanspoon and it'll give you a variety of good, local places to choose from at half the price.
The service was lackluster. Coffee was warm but delicious. Limited to one cup, apparently, as the waitress never offered a second.\n\nDaughter had sweet and sour shrimp. Wife had spicy chicken. I had wonton soup. Dumplings as an appetizer for the table. All arrived warm. The brown rice was dry as sand and the white rice was delayed by rice cooker problems. Also dry as sand. I guess that is how they serve it.\n\nThe base flavors for the shrimp and chicken were nearly identical. I had expected them to be more diverse. \n\nIn all, expectations were not met for what is advertised as upscale. I'd rather have the local Chinese cuisine which more flavorful, and much less expensive.
I really enjoyed my Mongolian beef and pork pot stickers, but \nThere was NO presentation of pfc mixing sauces. \nOne of the things that sets pfc apart from the run of the mill Non franchise is PRESENTATION and experience.  I was extremely disappointed by the LACK of presentation. \n\nReservations:\nOur party arrived about 15 minutes before our 5:30 reservations.\n\nAt 6:11 we were informed our reserved table had been given to another party . Obviously someone dropped the ball here.....\n\nWhen we requested silverware for the table. Our waitress blamed it on the hostess. Yes, theHostess should have provided silverware.. However It was unprofessional of our waitress to pass buck. As a Patron I could care less who's fault it is; just $@&&@in fix it. Defiantly took away from my pfc experience.\n\nMy Hot and sour soup is usally served with\"noodley\" things that I drop in the soup. We weren't given any \"noodley \" things . Not trying to be a jerk but all things being equal the pfc isn't selling food as much as they are selling an experience. This experience is what sets this restaurant apart.
Let me start by saying that I do like their food. \n\nLast night I went with my wife and two guests. The apps came out fast and were fantastic. Dinner on the other hand, didn't come out quickly at all. The rice was undercooked, and we told our server. He set the rice on the empty table next to us and forgot to bring a new order. By the time I was almost finished with my meal, another server came over and they brought back another bowl of crunchy white rice.\n(is that the way rice is prepared now?)\n\nI ordered the chocolate cake. I asked for a container to take half home. The server brought out a small container and when I asked for a larger one, she said we can just squeeze it in there, and started to flatten the cake. She then realized that a larger one would be better.\n\n4 people, not crowded...2 hours total.
ok so i've eaten here more than once but just thought to write a review on it. now, i'll be honest this is the only one i've ever been to, so i don't know if they're all the same but every time i'm underwhelmed. i get there, look at their giant selection and get excited. then i get my meal and remember that i've never had anything too great. don't get me wrong, it's not bad, but for how much they charge, they really need to step it up or at least give me a huge portion. just saying...
Our last few visits have left something to desire, One of the things I always notice is the demeanor of an establishments employees. These people look miserable, no one smiles or greets you appropriately, it's more like get in, get out, turn the tables,\n\nThe food has remained consistently good... when we can order it. the last time JB and I came for a quick dinner, the place was not busy yet we were passed by 6 frowning waitstaff without getting drinks... for 15 minutes we were left suiting at our table with our menus closed and sitting on the edge of the table (HINT, HINT) so we left and most likely will not be returning.
If you look at other reviews you will see that I am a very positive person, but tonight was an utter disaster!!  We sat at the bar and the female bartender  was miserable. We ordered drinks and she was unhappy that we did.  She spent 20 minutes sending text messages and took 3 smoke brakes in one hour while our drinks were empty. We ordered appetizers and they never came out.  She actually brought us our check and we never got our food. By the way we were the only people at the bar.  Finally a bus boy brought us our food after we payed. We payed before our food came because we thought our table was ready. We finally got seated by the windows. Do not sit by the windows because it was very cold. We ordered our dinner and drinks and guess what no drinks. After our food came we asked about our drinks and the waiter said he forgot. Nothing was comped and no manager was available. This PF Changs needs new management!! We will never return. I will give it 2 stars because the food was great, but the employees are absolutely miserably from hostess to waiters to bartenders. Steer clear until changes are made. It's not worth the headache.
I seriously don't know why people love this place so much, the food here is horrible. The rice is never cooked properly.. And it's not even Asian food. It's fake asian food. I never come here anymore.
I've had bad experiences here a few times now.  I wrote panera bread and haven't heard back.  Bad service all around!!!  Basically, we ordered our food, they ran out of what we wanted, so just decided to make us something else with out telling us.  When we got our food, we asked why they made us that instead of what we ordered---'oh it was the closest to what you wanted'.....hmmmm how about you tell us that before we pay, and how about you give us our money back.  Really, you don't get much for what you pay for at panera.  Its not very good at all.
Panera bread has to be the most inconsistent restaurant I have ever been to. I have posted two pictures of the strawberry poppyseed chicken salad. The first one looks delicious the second one looks like they could've used a smaller bowl. It did not even look appetizing.
The problem I have this experience compared to my last is that the examination lasted 3 minutes.  The vet checked the ears, teeth, and nails then called it a day.  \n\nI came home looked at his teeth and saw my pup had a \"slab fracture\"  which was still attached to the gum.  The vet didn't mentioned it during the \"exam\" other than telling me to buy a finger brush to brush his teeth.\n\nI was primarily there for a vaccination shot but if they're going to charge me for a examination, they should do a proper examination.  I just felt I was rushed out of there. \n\nI took my dog to another vet where they told me about the slab fracture, gave me info on how it usually happens, potential problems that it can cause, and recommendations on ways to fix the problem.
Watch out when it looks like something is on sale.  They mark a rack or table with a big buy one get one or 50% off sign, then only some of the stuff on the rack is on sale.
It's not that delish.
Much like every other Eat 'n Park (3 or 4 stars worth of chain-diner food), except the last five times I've been here, the service has been damn, damn, daaaaaaaamn slow.  It's always fun to see the staff smoking out back while I've waited an hour for some scrambled eggs.
The food is usually pretty good, however the service is almost ALWAYS very VERY slow. Most of the staff are pretty friendly and sweet but there are a few sour ones in the bunch that make the experience not as nice as it could be. Although they still technically do their job, you can FEEL very negative vibes from them and see how inefficient they are with the way they do things. It's a hit and miss. Unless you know one of the servers and their schedules. The low rating is mainly for the slow service and the handful of staff members who aren't very pleasant.
Eat n Park is usually decent.  This location though has HORRIBLY SLOW service.  Seriously, we never wait less than 10 minutes for a server to acknowledge us, and we live near the Waterfront, so we've given this location the benefit of the doubt numerous times.  Each time hoping that the last was just a fluke, new staff, or something.  It's not.  Doesn't matter what time we go.  It seems we are not acknowledged for several minutes, and then the service is mediocre at best.  Occasionally, we've had a stellar service, but it's few and far between.  Today, after waiting 15 minutes, then getting up to find a server in another section, we were informed that we were sitting in a \"closed\" section.  That server offered to serve us, but honestly, we left.  I told the hostess who seated us about the mixup, and got a blank stare.  I've never had this issue at any other EnP.  We left, drove to the Squirrel Hill location, and our orders were taken in the amount of time we wasted at the Waterfront.  Mgmt- you have a beautiful, prime location.  Get your hosts and servers on the same page!
God i hate eat n park. Only reason i have gone is for the salad bar because u cant find a decent salad bar in this city. Just about every entree iv had here is nothing more than rubbish, except maybe the cheesteak. Only go if u have little kids
Since both Marshalls and TJ Maxx are owned by the same company, I make sure to stop by both locations when shopping at the Waterfront. I generally find nothing or spend only $10 or so at Marshalls, while being enticed to spend at least $50-100 at TJ Maxx. The Waterfront TJ Maxx seems to have not only the same product as this Marshalls plus a whole lot more. All that to say, I consider shopping here a waste of time since I could just drive a block or so and be at a store owned by the same company that always has what I want and need. Sorry, Marshalls, but you're just OK to me.
I am bummed about this- I had high hopes. Here's a rundown of the evening:\n\nPros:\n- super friendly waitress, Stephanie, who maintained her professionalism and friendliness throughout \n- yummy elderflower and pear beverage\n- lobster bisque was nice and lobster-y\n- hot delicious bread\n\nCons:\n- oysters were sketch. And I don't feel good about that. Stephanie brought us an order of East Coast oysters to replace the West Coast ones that we sent back.\n- fresh grated horseradish had NO flavor or heat- what's up with that?\n- scallops were meh- came with weird veggies, unevenly seared, and no real flavor. And at a whopping $25 a plate, I expect some nummers!\n\nI doubt we'll go back- for those prices, I would prefer McCormick's or Ruth's Chris.
Service an atmosphere was great. I had the shrimp boil and it was very under-seasoned. Much closer to bland than anything.
The service was mostly friendly but I was disappointed in my meal. My meal was way over cooked. The soda was flat and the carbonation needed changed and I felt like we inconvenienced our server by asking for new ones.  Overall, I thought it was mediocre and I was expecting more for the prices.
Food was only ok. Had lobster bisque soup not to good. Had the shang Hai Seafood Sampler. The scallops were hard, over cooked. The samon was good. Shrimp had no flavor. I will say the service was the best. Our waiter was great!!
After further consideration, this store does not deserve a 4 star review. The Old Navy product has been pretty weak recently, which isn't the store's fault, but the severe lack of customer service doesn't help the situation. \n\nWhile shopping here on Friday, I was one of maybe 3-5 people in the store. I would practically walk into a sales associate but not even receive a glance or smile. No one working here seems to give an iota whether or not product is being sold. To avoid inconveniencing the associates, I will be taking my Old Navy purchases online in the future.
I don't see to many options in Pittsburgh for sporting goods. Dick's seems to be the big chain for sporting paraphernalia in this neck of the woods. Their selection is poor especially in the snowboarding and biking section. Maybe it's good for small children who want their first snowboard? It is a very average store with average products. I would like to see some attempt to carry more high end products. I am not into fishing or hunting live prey so I am not sure about these departments? I guess if you want some Under Armor products then this is the place to go because I see aisles upon endless aisles of these types of products.
I enter every sporting goods stores as a soccer player, runner, and sports fan, so my reviews will always be skewed towards those particular areas. With that said, this is probably the worst Dick's location that I've ever been to. The selection is very limited for soccer gear, which must be a testament to the lack of the local customer base seeking out soccer gear. It's mostly low-end youth gear, too, which makes it nearly useless to adults or even some teenage soccer players.\n\nThe staff at this location has always been really nice, though, and it's the closest location to where we live, so I still end up going there quite a bit for running and clothing needs (of course, we usually leave empty-handed as they don't have what we're looking for). \n\nThey do have quite an extensive fan gear section if you're looking to support the local Pittsburgh teams, but this store just doesn't have the overall inventory necessary to be considered a \"good\" Dick's location.
When I think BBB... I think the days of simply bringing your bike in for a quick and relatively inexpensive tune-up and a few fixes are long gone.    \n\nThis review is more for the repair end of BBB. In their defense BBB does appear to carry some amazing brands of bike (ie Colnago) that you just don't find anywhere else in Pittsburgh. \n\nAt BBB I was charged $250 for a tune up and a few other things. Granted this included installing a sew up tire (which I can understand would cost approx $50), Swapping out a left side (big ring) shifter on my down tube (this should have cost approx. $20 at most) and installing new bar tape (cost of tape $20 and $20 to install?).. SO WHAT\"S WITH $140 FOR A TUNE UP? Well the story goes like this:\n\nI bring the bike into BBB prior to the nice weather hitting Pittsburgh in hopes of trying what people have said is a great bike shop and getting my OCLV TREK 5900 ready for the season. Turns out I don't hear from these guys. A week goes by ...two weeks...I think that's ok I have two or three other bike I can turn to for a ride. Then I wind up going out of town for a week thinking for sure I'll get a call from them re: my bike is ready to roll...but no dice. So I call. Turns out a screw snapped when the mechanic was re-installing the down tube shifter and it had to be tapped out (is that my fault?). He says \"Should be ready in a few days\". So I come in a few days later to this mammoth bill. I ask if I am paying for the labor of taping out the screw? I don't think I ever got a straight answer? I look at the bill and can't see a good breakdown of the charges. Normally I would \"duke it over\" a bill like this but I figured...I had somewhere I to be 10 minutes ago and at least I finally have my bike. I would expect that for that money my bike could have been stripped down to the frame and totally gone over (overhauled). But it wasn't.  Well BBB I'll give you a star because the mechanic did do a good job in that my cycle shifts well and the tape job on the bars looks great (nice wrap). Plus I'll toss in a star for your outstanding selection of high end cycles. Maybe I would have rated BBB higher if I was in the market for a purchase instead of a simple repair?
Bought a bike there on my second time in the shop.   Glen is very knowledgeable but can be a bit overwhelming, annoying and pushy, I can see how he can be very helpful to the average Joe, but if you are in his shop you should have done your homework, as this place is not walmart, mid to high level product here. I would encourage getting fitted and even buying a bike there, but going back for service is a whole different story.  Same day service is unheard of here, even for the simplest of adjustments, no service is available at all on the weekends.  the first time I took a bike there to have a rear derailer hanger replaced and re-adjusted (I had already purchased and had the hanger) 11 days went by before I returned to pick my bike up after not being called.  I figured it was just a fluke experience and gave them the benefit of the doubt.  The second time. I took a bike in to have a damaged shift lever replaced with a new 7800 pair. I called after 9 days and they said it wold be 2 days more.  when I showed up 2 days later it still wasn't done, it took 2 more following that, 13 days total.  Stay away from their service department
Okay so I just moved to the outskirts of Duquesne, PA which is outside of Pittsburgh from Harrisburg, PA of all places. Where I am at, really there is no delivery but these guys did. They were nice and cordial and cheap but I have been spoiled by the pizza shop in Harrisburg, Downtown, run my an old world Italian guy named Luigi. That pizza is/was MILES better than this. This crust, while thin, did not have flavor and was hard. The slices were small for their 8 slice which I did like. The cheese was good. The sauce was meh. I've definitely had way better. 2 stars for being cheap and delivering.
Pizza is very hit or miss. When the owners are there, it's really good. When they aren't, you get pizza that is over cooked (more like burnt) and LONG delivery times. The pizza, even when plain, is very greasy. Way more than other places around. Usually pizza that greasy is caused by low quality cheese. Also they do not take credit or debit cards. There are better options.
The experience was not that great. The lady taking the orders was nice, but not helpful with what to order. The owner kept her back turn to us the entire time, based on the pictures and news articles I read about her I thought she would have been more social. To what really matters we got #2 sampler and order of jalape\u00f1o pierogies and the Ruben pierogies a lot of food for two guys. Really had no idea what to expect. Haluski was good, the pierogies came Luke warm and soaked in oily butter. Like the cab driver said you can find better. I'd pass on this spot.
They do great quality work. The only reason I did not give them five stars is for their lack of customer courtesy not once but twice. I am a very patient and understanding person, but being rude twice means you dont want my business and I tipped 20%.
It wasn't a busy night at the neighborhood, but you could have been fooled by how long the food took.  While it did take a while everyone was extremely friendly.  The food did come out hot, at least mine did, the rest of the plates were plate-warmer hot.  Everyone in the table resented me for \"holding back\" the table since they staff pointed out they were waiting on my burger.\n\nWhich hey works as a segway onto the burger.  Quesadilla Burger.  I knew that was a mistake but I did it anyways.  The patty was sorta flavorful.  The toppings were in the bland category.  Cheese went MIA.  And the tortilla were over-toasted and tasteless.\n\nA big blah overall, which is sad, since we've had a grand ole time and good food in past visits.
Called for an arrangement for pickup, told the person who took my order that I would be able to pick the arrangement up at 5:30pm.  She asked if I could get there any earlier, I said I would try my best, but I work until 5pm, so maybe not.  She said ok.  \n\nComes to be 5pm and I get a call from a guy at the shop asking where I was!  The lady who took my order wrote down that I'd be there at 5pm.  I explained that I never said that and picked the arrangement up a little before 5:30pm.  \n\nArrangement was just OK.  I specifically wanted a lot of orange flowers, which they did, but they added strange colors with the orange... and some of the flowers were already a little wilted.  \n\nEven though the location is convenient, I will probably go elsewhere for a flower order next time.
The order process went well and the delivery arrived in a timely manner. I saw a picture of the flowers my friend received and the arrangement  wasn't even close to what was pictured on the website...a lot more filler flowers despite ordering the premium arrangement. I picked this place specifically because of what they offered despite other cheaper places in the area. I am disappointed because I wanted the best arrangement possible for my friend who is going through a tough time. \n\nI will not order from this place again.
Meh. I've ordered from here twice and not really been enthusiastic about the results either time. Keep in mind that I haven't had pizza from this place yet!\n\nTheir steak hoagie is middling-good; nothing to write home about, but a pretty good example of the standard Pittsburgh pizza place steak hoagie.\n\nThe seafood calzone is another story. Something in it was so bitter I couldn't quite eat it; I'm wondering if it was the garlic or perhaps a leftover burnt taste from the oven. Whatever it was, it was gross. The shrimp weren't that good either, suffering as they did from that certain \"I taste like iodine\" flavor.\n\nThe advantage to R&B is that they're open reasonably late, given the location, but the phone service is rather surly and it always takes them an hour plus to deliver. Which would be OK if I didn't live a block away (normally I'd just walk and pick it up, but just for you, Yelpers, I subject myself to the vagaries of sitting on my rear end on the couch waiting for my food to arrive).
I stopped by here this past Tuesday in order to pick up a to go pizza.  My fiance, a friend and I were trying pizza from three different places and Luigi's was one of them.  I have driven by Luigi's many times before and for some reason had never stopped in but that did allow it to come to mind whenever I was looking for a pizza place I had not yet tried in the Bellevue area.  Whenever I called to place my order I was told that my pizza would be ready in about 15 minutes.  I arrived closer to 30 minutes later and was immediately confused whenever I walked into the restaurant.  You see there was a large dining room on the left that was full of people and I didn't immediately see the are where I would get my pizza from.  Finally after a few steps into the restaurant I noticed that the whole back area of the restaurant was where I needed to be and I made my way back there.  My pizza was ready for me and I quickly paid and was leaving whenever the cashier told me \"Stay out of trouble\".  I really hope that was a friendly sentiment and not one that was based upon my appearance or anything else.  The pizza itself had a medium thick crust with a bland sauce which is weird since I could see a ton of green herbs in it.  The cheese was just ok and nothing special while the pizza itself had a slightly sour taste to it which I did not enjoy.  Out of the three different pizzas we ate that night this one was overwhelmingly our least favorite which was evidenced by the fact that 3/4 of it was left after the evening.\n\nThe bottom line for me is that I will probably not head back to Luigi's in the future.  I just don't see myself making a trip to Luigi's between the weird experience (although not bad) that I had in the restaurant and the fact that there are much better pizza places nearby.
My Mom was up from Mississippi for Thanksgiving, and claimed to be in dire need of a manicure. I wanted to try somewhere in my new 'hood (Brighton Heights), so I turned to trusty Yelp for advice. Off to Star Nails we went. The inside was bright and tidy, the pedicure stations looked clean and newer, and the ladies were friendly. Unfortunately, the good feelings didn't last long. We each picked a color, and went to our respective technicians. The technician doing my nails as very nice and talkative, but just very inattentive to detail. I got no hand/arm massage, minimal shaping, and the polish application was exceptionally sloppy and thick. Her attempts to clean up the polish all over my cuticles were futile. Their actual technique was strange too, as both technicians had us dry our nails after the first coat was applied. My Mom and I left and almost in unison declared it to be the worst manicure we've gotten. At least the price wasn't exorbitant ($13 + tip each). Perhaps their other services are better, but I'll be giving the other nail shops in the area a chance next time.
Everytime I eat at this location I end up with a sick stomach.  I don't have that problem at other Arby's.  The dining area is clean and everything else seems ok but I always get a sick stomach.  Maybe they should relook at their food prep.
So I came to this Red White and Blue with high hopes of thrift store mecca, and I will get to how I left empty handed and in tears.  First, I'll walk you through my experience. \n This place is pretty large, and relatively clean, with a nice parking lot.  The racks are packed with clothes - and I mean, hard to move the hangers because there is so much stock, which can be a pro or a con depending on how you like it.  I found it a bit cumbersome since although the clothes are organized by type (dress vs. blouse) there is NO size separation.  In a place this huge, it takes quite a long time to find what you're looking for without the size separation.  But, I'm not one to abandon a bargain because I don't want to look around (after all, that is what its all about), so I gave a good 30 min-45 and got a handful of garments to try on.  (I would typically spend a few hours, but I was trying to spare a friend not as keen on secondhand garments).  With my carefully extracted finds I searched in vain for a fitting room, never to find one.  After asking the staff where it was, I had to take a seat and leave my jaw dropped for a while because THERE IS NO FITTING ROOM! \nI couldn't take this fact into my brain, and although there were some household items I wanted to go back and buy, I was too upset to continue.  (Sidenote: yes, I can understand how this can work for the RWB, but imho it is unforgivable, and I wish there was at least some warning before spending my time searching for a bargain when I couldn't even see if it would fit). \n\nI would recommend this store if you are looking for something specific secondhand especially for dishes, or older electronics, or even beauty products.  There was even a used Nikon SLR with a wide angle lens ($200 though)!  \nBut if you plan on buying a sundress, and don't plan on stripping down in front of your fellow thrifties, you'd better be confident in your purchase.  RWB is just like any other thrift store, and you can't return or exchange your items, so you'd be out of luck and out of money.
Prices not great for true thrifters. Staff completely useless. No dressing rooms. I simply have nothing to say about this place.
The home-cooked breakfasts at The Rusty Nail in Bellevue are wonderful, prices are reasonable, the wait staff are gems, and is often bragged about by Bellevue locals.  That said, two stars is all I can muster primarily due to the tiny, cramped dining area.  I've witness people at three tables being disrupted while they are eating so departing diners would have enough room to push their chair away from the table and pass by others just to leave.\n\nDon't get me wrong, I adore that Pittsburgh is a small, friendly city, but I'm not fond of getting elbowed in the back as the guy behind me cuts his breakfast steak and eggs, nor knowing his guest gargled with Cool Mint Listerine this morning (or worse, didn't) .  Yes, the tables are packed THAT close together.  And whatever you do, don't dare bring a large friend here to dine when it's busy unless you enjoy feeling like a complete 'jag off' for doing so on the way out.
I really wanted to like the Rusty Nail.  I love little local restaurants like this.  But it really is a very tight squeeze, to begin with.  They really need to pull some tables out of there to make more room.  We were right on top of another table with two very loud young children, and there was just no buffer.  And the food was.... just so bland!  I get that it was supposed to be homestyle cooking, but it just had no flavor.  To be fair, we did go for dinner, and I understand that this place is more of a breakfast joint, so I would be willing to try it again sometime for breakfast.  For dinner though, unless you like super-bland food, I probably wouldn't return for seconds.
Given that the Rusty Nail has been highly recommended to me as a good breakfast spot by various sources, I'm sad to say I was sorely disappointed. \n\nThey have a wide selection of breakfast options.  However, even with numerous breakfast specials listed, not one included eggs, meat, potatoes AND toast.  Yes, that's right.  I had to order the eggs, bacon and toast special with a side of the potatoes.  When my food was served, the portions were average except for the side order of potatoes.  I did greatly enjoy the potatoes, though, which I ordered deep fried.  My dining companion ordered the French toast with ham and enjoyed it very much.  \n\nWe were here on a weekday morning so we didn't have to worry about it being crowded.  The service was good.  And it's not that I thought anything was bad, it's just that, as the two star rating says, \"Meh, I've experienced better.\"  Given the plethora of choices in Bellevue, this will not be my first stop should I find myself on Lincoln Avenue for breakfast again.
I always see this place, and Saturday we decided to stop in for lunch. The atmosphere was pleasant. My boyfriend had the buffalo chicken sandwich, which he loved. I however, ordered the steak and cheese pita and was extremely disappointed. The pita was soft and fresh but the steak was terrible. It was very steak-um like and saturated with grease. When I picked up the sandwich grease poured from it. I'm not one to send back food, and that's my fault, but the waitress came by once as I was eating, over heard me upset about my food, looked at me then continued on her way. Needless to say I don't think I will be returning.
First time here and I wasnt impressed at all!  I should have gone to the dairy queen :-(
I made it back here about two weeks ago.  I must say the experience was night and day compared to the one at the end of July.  Whether or not it was an off night I do not know, but the place was loud and crowded, the service was bad, and the food was mediocre at best.  I should have just waited it out at Point Brugge.  I won't becoming back anytime soon.
I often have lunch at the nearby Point Brugge Cafe, but I decided to give Pino's a try today for a change of pace.  Bad idea.  My lady friend and I started with a pair of appetizers: greens & beans and \"Italian frites.\"  The latter, which the menu described as \"fresh cut, twice cooked, fresh herbs & roasted garlic,\" were basically just regular-ass french fries - decent, but nowhere near worth their $6 price tag.  The greens and beans were even more of a rip-off: 8 FREAKIN' DOLLARS for a smallish bowl of rather flavorless produce.  Talk about a profit margin!\n\nAs a main course we shared a flatbread with goat cheese, caramelized onions, and roasted red pepper.  It was pretty good, but my enjoyment was diminished by the FM radio that was blaring through the loudspeakers.  Who wants to hear car commercials while eating a meal at a \"nice\" restaurant?  Classless.\n\nConclusion: I'd rather wait 45 minutes for a table at Point Brugge than be seated immediately at Pino's.
Pino's appears to fashion itself something of a nouveau-Italian, smart casual neighborhood restaurant, and it's literally just that. Translation: the menu is uninspired and predictable. A relatively encompassing selection of appetizers and entrees revealed not quite a soul-crushing, but certainly a lackadaisical attitude toward ingredients, recipes and presentation, though the service was refreshingly excellent. Unfortunately, the only other reason you'd be dining in Point Breeze would be to enjoy the amazing Point Brugge Cafe just down the street. As a previous reviewer mentioned, I stopped in simply because the Brugge was full, but I unfortunately won't be making that mistake again.
I grew up just the street from Pino's and my family were probably its most regular customers -- we got take-out at least once or twice a week for many many years, and always enjoyed the pizza and hot subs. I've just been back for the first time in 6 years after moving away, and was pretty unimpressed... The decor looks nice, but the food was wayyyyy overpriced for what it was. $22 dollars for a plate of pasta, really? It claimed to be \"fresh pasta,\" but it was completely tough and chewy (not \"al dente,\" just undercooked), and not very large. I'm not sure when the restaurant changed, but I think it really missed the mark... People WANT a casual, friendly, affordable neighborhood place that they can bring the kids to. Why take that away?
Went here with a gift card from the restaurant week photo competition. \n\nWe were one of two tables there and a bunch of staff showing up during the meal. \n\nOur waitress was good, but that couldn't save the food.\n\nThe meal started out with some what I guess used to be foccacia.  I say used to be because it no longer represented anything other than long pieces of brick or bark very stale and tasteless.\n\nWe ordered the vegetable board which was probably the best thing we ordered with light and bright vegetables perfectly cooked and paired with two delicious sauces. \n\nThen we ordered the octopus which was fine, but very cold and the octopus had little to no flavor, being overwhelmed by the citrus in the dish. \n\nThe tuscan wings were ok, but they were really ordered for my husband who seemed to enjoy them. \n\nFinally the diver scallops.  This dish was indeible.  The scallops were very overcooked and the pea puree was so minty I was unable to eat it. We sent it back and they did take off half of the price (weren't expecting anything just didn't want to eat it). \n\nAfter that we decided against dessert and left.  I probably will not return.
My husband and I celebrated our one year wedding anniversary this past weekend and since we recently have moved into a new area of town, we made reservations here because word on the street was that it was good. Verdict? It was so-so. We had reservations at 7:15 and were seated promptly, which was fine, except we were seated OUTSIDE! Listen folks, it's COLD when the sun goes down. They have three tables set outside, I guess trying to squeeze out some more business. Our server was nice, but not attentive at all.  We were left waiting for things for 10-20 minutes at a time. Also, because we were sitting on the sidewalk, people and animals and cars kept sweeping by us. It took the waiter three tries to get our meal order because he had to keep stepping out of the way of people walking down the street. Wine was good. Food was ehhhhhh. We had the mussel and clam appetizer and when it came out, about 1/2 of the order was not edible and all the innards had fallen into the sauce, which by the way smelled like stinky cheese. My dinner and my husbands dinner was good, no real complaints there. Espresso and a S'more cupcake for dessert and I grand total of $134 later before tip? Definitely not worth it at all.  The best part of the night? Leaving. The worst part of the night? Associating this place with my anniversary.
Nice atmosphere with above average food. This restaurant has a lot of potential. The wait staff was far below average: They were slow, and we had to ask multiple times for things. They were not the most polite wait staff, and our waitress was either a little demeaning or very socially awkward.
We were huge fans of Pinos a few years back before the wine bar concept was adopted. In all honesty, we haven't been back for a year though we kept saying \" we have to get to Pinos!\" Needless to say, we were disappointed.  The place has changed and not for the better.  It seems in an effort to create a quaint wine bar, Pinos lost sight of the original draw and that was the food.  The menu has been scaled back considerably.  Though the food was adequate, it's not the same.  I came here because the food was amazing and with that no longer being the case, I doubt we will return.  Hopefully, things will change back to how they were.  Customer advice for what it's worth.  Refocus on great italian food not a wine bar concept.   Sometimes a liquor license is not the best investment!!!
This Giant Eagle truly is giant!  And believe me, that's about all it has going for it!  You would think that this means you can find what you want, and generally you can, but it also means enormous crowds, no matter when you shop here.\n\nYou know that a trip to a large, \"one size fits all\" chain grocery store like this is not quite the same as shopping at Macy's or Boscov's.  You know that it's pretty hard to give a place like this five stars.  Its purpose is purely utilitarian.  But good gravy, you'd think that a place like this could handle large crowds.  It shouldn't take you a half-hour just to get one item.  \n\nThat's what happened to me yesterday.  I would have been better off going to Cogo's or 7-11.  I might have paid a bit more, but I would have been in-and-out in under five minutes.  I prefer the Giant Eagle in Squirrel Hill.
I have to agree that this is one of the poor examples that Giant Eagle has.  Granted, it has the basics you need, and is 1 of the biggest in the city itself.  Finding things takes work.  My big gripe is that it has one of the weirdest and most illogical layouts that I've seen.  It actually takes time to find what you need as compared to most stores where once you are in there a few times, you easily find everything.  Parts of this store are diagonal and that causes you to go in every direction possible.  Here is a quick summary of the setup as it can be classified as a maze:\n\n1.) When you enter the store through the slow wide door, you go to the left and walk past the front registers to produce.  Normal enough.\n\n2.) From produce in front of you (a quasi L-shaped department), you take a quick left and go diagonally to the right to walk past the pharmacy.  Take a hard right down aisle 1 and then you hit the bakery.   \n\n3.)  From the bakery, you walk along a long meat wall.  Diagonally to the left, you'll find the service meat/seafood counters. And because how the wall goes diagonal to the left, the sign for Aisle 9 is facing diagonally to the right so you don't miss it because the 1 side is longer towards the back than the other. (Aisles 9-14 are almost twice as long as 1-8).\n\n4.) From meat, you have frozen straight back on a long back wall in its own cove.  A hard right (if you bypass frozen) brings you last to hot foods, the deli, and then facing in front of you, the Customer Service desk which is tucked away in a corner (not really visible when you walk in the store).\n\n5.) Once you pass the deli and customer service, take a hard right, then to the left (almost a U-turn) to the checkouts, and then you take a hard left to leave.\n\nMost of the other Giant Eagle stores are much more logical in how their aisles and deparment locations are set up.   You're not going every which way to try and find things.\n\nAlso, the service isn't that great as one of the other reviews said.  Given that, I would take Market District on Centre Ave or GE on Murray Ave over this store.\n\nHowever, for those who remember the Giant Eagle on Centre Ave at N. Craig St, nothing beats how BAD that store was.  There is a reason that store was nicknamed \"the dirty bird.\"  Compared to that North Oakland store that closed several years ago, Shakespeare St GE is light years ahead.
I cannot in my life understand why this Giant Eagle, of all the Giant Eagles, would get a five star rating.  From the moment you walk into here it's like someone has hit you on the head very hard and you walk around in a confused state the rest of the time you're in there.\n\nThe set up is ridiculous.  I mean, who wants to walk around in the freezer section and then go through a smaller than usual end of the aisle to see, SURPRISE, the meat section hidden off in an area where they could have knocked down the wall so you didn't have to do a little dance to get to it.  Aisles seem extra long in this store, you can tell that they worked with the space they had.  It's like when you are half way through the aisle and realize it's too late to turn around because it's the same distance to the end as it was to the beginning of the aisle, but you kind of just want to give up and sit on the floor because you feel like you've been walking forever.  \n\nHonestly, I only went here because I was at Target and didn't want to venture any further to complete my shopping.
This Giant Eagle seems more like a GetGo than an actual supermarket. As soon as you get in you want to get out as quickly as possible.\n\n You don't want to do any major grocery shopping here. For one, the prices are high. Secondly, this Giant Eagle does not carry everything you need. Who has time to run to another store? Just get your basic necessities here.\n\nAs for produce, it can be awful at times. Whenever I go to Giant Eagle Market District down the street, the produce is fresh and smells invigorating.  However, at Shakespeare, you are bound to find produce with wrinkles, open areas, mold and fruit flies- being sold at the same high prices. I can go to Trader Joe's and find much better produce for less.\n\nA pet peeve of mine is the self-checkout lines. Two of them are express lanes for items less than 12; the other lane has a belt if more than 12 items are being purchased. There should be TWO LINES but for some reason customers want to form one long super line, which holds up everything. The staff rarely sorts this out.\nThe customer service is average here and I don't expect it to get any better.\n\nI only go here if I have to grab one or two items. The best times to go are early in the morning or late at night.
I prefer this store to the Market District on Centre. It's just as overpriced and poorly laid out and maybe a bit grimy, but carries less products to sift through when you just need to grab some simple things, hopefully not produce. Parking is easy and you can hit up the unpretentious Wine and Spirits in the same stop. I think this plaza still exists to prevent impoverished people from venturing into the other newer fancier stores which are a mere half mile away and designed to appeal to people who think they are cultured and discerning.
I agree with other reviews, this store is poorly laid out and honestly makes no sense. Sometimes bigger is not always better. I used to head here often while living near Shadyside to stop at the Family Dollar & hit GE in one run. \n\nI normally only stopped here for a Redbox movie. My debit card got hacked at an outdoor Redbox at a Get Go so I'll only go to a Redbox that is indoor like this one. \n\nAnyways, I'd hit up the liquor store for some wine afterwards for dealing with long lines/wait & awkward clientele outside.
Ugh. Dirty. Long lines. Walked out without making purchase .
Food: There are countless options to choose from for vegetarians or carnivores, but the food is only so-so.  We've ordered takeout numerous times due to proximity, and nothing has been bad, but nothing has been special.  The general Tso's tofu and the Moo Shu vegetables are the best things we've ordered.  The eggplant was soggy and not great.  The portions are large.  Nothing is particularly spicy even if it is mentioned as being spicy on the menu.\n\nPrice: Tasty is cheap.  \n\nDrinks: N/A\n\nAtmosphere: Typical Chinese takeout place.  A photo of every single meal they offer is on the wall.  Located in the plaza next to Pizza Parma.  Decent location for that end of Shadyside.\n\nService: The employees speak poor English but can usually understand what you are askingt/telling them.  The food is usually ready for takeout within 10-15 minutes.\n\n(+): many options, cheap, ready quickly\n\n(-): food is nothing to write home about\n\nWould I go back again? If I'm feeling too lazy/broke to go anywhere else.
This place features everything you can expect from a standard hole-in-a-wall Chinese restaurant. There's zero ambiance, offers quick take-out and the service is rude. I decided to give Tasty a try because it's conveniently located on Highland Avenue and has easy parking.\n\nI ordered the Kung Pao Chicken and Crab Rangoon. Sadly, they prepared Kung Pao Beef instead. It's extremely disappointing to receive the wrong food. It's even more disappointing when the restaurant refuses to correct the order. While it wasn't what I ordered, the food was good...but there is better Chinese food out there.
Not Tasty At All.
I had heard lots of good things about Vento's. Unfortunately I did not get to experience these things. The service was slow and lukewarm. The pizza was expensive and not the same price in the restaurant as advertised on the website http://www.ventospizza.com/. Also, no credit or debit cards here.  You're directed to the ATM in the restaurant that charges a fee of $1.75.   I ordered ahead and although I had to wait for my pizza when I got there I received it cold and it just was not that good.  I also ordered provolone sticks which also did not taste good.
This was one of the worst dinners out I've had in recent memory. On the other hand, I wasn't expecting much, so I guess the place lived up to my expectations. I've been trying to think of a good way to describe their food, and the best I can come up with is as follows. Imagine a cafeteria pasta dinner you might have been served as a child away at summer camp, and you'll have a pretty good idea. In other words, the food is perfectly edible here, but boring, and nothing you would want to actually pay for. There was nothing disgusting about it, it was just extremely uninspiring. To be fair, I only tried the pasta, bread, salad, soup, and calamari, so maybe they have amazing pizza here... It's possible, although unlikely based on what I've seen.\n\nOn the upside, the service was friendly enough, and there were plenty of empty tables at prime dinner time! If you're hungry, you'll definitely be full when you leave.
I went to this place because I had a LivingSocial voucher. Even with this voucher I feel like I paid too much money. I think I could have had better food if I went over to the Giant Eagle across the street and heated up a Lean Cuisine. I do have to wonder why the owners would put out the living social deal when what really would help business at the restaurant would be simply to improve the quality of the food.\nThe only positives I can give are that it isn't pretentious and the waiter provided very good service. It was almost empty for a Monday at 7 PM, so if you are desperately starving, not able to go to better restaurants nearby or heat up food from your local grocer's freezer, this might be a tolerable food option.  Again, it is advisable to be desperately starving.
I took my car to Mike's auto body as it's recommended by Geico and is part of their easy claims and repair process.  This was a big mistake.  Like many of the reviewers here, I was initially told it would take a certain amount of time, and then, at the last minute, on the day I was supposed to get my car back, they told me it would be a few more days.  Their excuse?  The headlamp that came in didn't have a bulb with it.  Seriously?  Since this was the Geico rep telling me this I couldn't really argue, but I don't know why Geico keeps working with a business that repeatedly does this to its customers.\n\nI got the car back in great condition, cleaned on the outside, and the console wiped down inside.  All in all, just alright - go here if you're not pressed for time and you've got Geico, otherwise shop around.
Our cat recently came down with some health issues that we could not afford to address. He was in pain and we decided the humane thing was to put him to sleep. We went to the ARL and asked the receptionist there if we had any other options available to us. \"Well basically the only thing you can do is sign him over for euthanasia\" she said in the most uncaring, apathetic voice possible. We were heartbroken of course. \"Go wait by that door and someone will meet you.\" After a few minutes another woman came out and took the carrier. \"I'll bring your carrier back out in a minute.\" We said no, that's okay, keep the carrier. She said okay and took our cat to the back. And that was it. No kind words, no sympathetic gestures, no \"Would you like a moment before I take him?\" No \"I'm sorry.\" Nothing. For us this was one of the worst days of our lives but nobody at the ARL seemed to care, or at least have been trained to pretend to care, one bit. \n\nThey get a couple stars for offering a necessary service. But other than that, this place will only be associated with making a terrible day that much worse with their lack of caring or empathy.
This is a bizarre CVS, the kind you would only want to go to in a pinch, and maybe not even then.\n\nI went to this one with my husband a couple of times to pick up prescriptions, and the vibe from start to finish is so weird. Let's start with parking, which is in a lot behind the store. There's not a lot of visibility to the lot since it is on the back side of the CVS. Being that it is a pharmacy, there wouldn't be a back door or windows, so the lot has a feeling of dangerous seclusion.\n\nInside the store, everything I saw told me that \"this is a pharmacy that is in a rough neighborhood\": shelves are only about 4'6\" tall (presumably so workers can see what people are doing in the aisles); bizarre things are locked in cabinets with clear covers (regular brands of shampoo?!); beauty items regularly updated, weren't (I, er, have a nail polish problem; some of the products were about 4 seasons behind and quite a few polishes were separated); it feels like there isn't enough room for the products, which are disorganized and crammed onto shelves (reference the odd shelf height limitation).\n\nIf you can spare the gas and time, there is another a CVS on Center Ave within a mile or so or a Walgreen's (Penn Circ S+Trade St.) and a Rite Aid (Baum+Negley) within 1/2 mile.
I go to this CVS all the time, since I work in the neighborhood.  I'm not a huge fan of it - I go mostly due to convenience.  Their greeting card selection is kind of lousy - I don't think I've ever found a decent card here.  I keep trying, every holiday or birthday, but every section is just full of duds.  Also, a lot of stuff is locked behind panels that you need the employees to unlock.  Like, razor blades.  And body wash.  BODY WASH?  It drives me nuts that I need to ask someone to open that shelf for me.  It makes no sense.  Staff is hit-or-miss with friendliness.  Some people are cheerful, and some act like they want you to go away.\n\nGood things - I love their coupon rewards.  I guess that's for all CVSes, not just this one, but it keeps me coming back because I get mad style coupons like every other visit.  And I had a good experience getting a walk-in flu shot from the pharmacy from the friendly (and quite attractive) pharmacist.  \n\nI'm just not crazy about the vibe here.  It just seems kind of depressing, with the stuff locked up and the smallish store with kind of a blargh selection.  I would much rather go to other pharmacies, but you can't beat this one for convenience (for me, anyway).  And they have a parking lot, if that helps you.
The times I've been here, its been an OK experience. However, their store hours are absolutely terrible. Closing at 7pm basically means they're never open when I would need to go there. Despite this being more conveniently located, Walgreens and Target end up getting most of my quick-shop business, simply due to late hours at night when I need to cook, clean, realize I'm out of toothpaste, have a headache, need a last-minute birthday card or whatever.
The coffee was ok, but the service and ambiance left much to be desired. The place was dirty, with straw wrappers etc on the floor. The light fixtures were too modern to be considered cozy. There were four people on staff but it took at least 2 minutes for one of them to stop gossiping with the others and take our order.  I got the feeling that this place has had a lot of success and the owners have let things slide. It was ok, but in looking for a coffee shop to make my regular hangout, I would not go back.
This is not a review on this gym. It is a review on their customer/membership service. I just called there. All I wanted to know is what their monthly fees were. Simple right? Wrong. They want your name and phone number and the rights to your first born child and then they won't even tell you anything without you physically coming to them to \"talk\" about what's best for you. I took psychology classes, I know what they are trying to do by talking to you face to face. I am sorry, but I want a gym, not a drug dealer. I don't need you to try to shove your products down my throat, I want to go somewhere to work out and be left alone. (That's why I wear headphones and don't make eye contact). \n\nI just wish places like this would give you a straight answer about their membership fees without hassling you. I won't go here now, period, because I don't believe in these kind of tactics. Just be straight with people, is that so hard?
The food here is okay.  Wings, BBQ, Bar foods. The floor here is always super slippery.  It doesn't matter if I am wearing heels or sneakers.  I just don't get why the floor is like and ice skating rink.
The front serves as a good Pittsburgh sports bar. It's a particularly great place to watch the Penguins in the spring when they open up the front wall. There are lots of HDTV's and there is a good selection of beer. \n\nThe food, however, is bland and is terrible bbq, even for the northeast. I would not come here unless you want to watch a game that you cannot see at home.
I've been here quite a few times, and I always try to like it cause theres a lack of good sports bars near Pitt. They have a ton of nice HDTVs.\n\nEverytime I go, there is always a weird taste to one (or more) of the beers that I get. I was just there for the Pitt/Oakland game and got a Redhook. I drink this beer regularly, and something was wrong with the beer. Its definitely hard to describe, but something is always off (others in my party notice it too).\n\nThe food is hit or miss. I got the French onion soup last time. It was good. Nothing ground breaking, but solid soup. I've had the pork nachos and they were blah.
I found Buffalo Blues to be merely OK.  I thought that their prices were a bit high for the size of the portions, and their wings were rather small.  I actually liked the wing sauces I tried, though (red hot and spicy garlic).  Our server was friendly, but not terribly attentive.  \n\nI would probably only go again on an all-you-can-eat wings night.  For $10 I would certainly get my money's worth, and the quality of the food was OK.\n\nSurprisingly, lots of vegetarian options.  A vegetarian in our party was floored by the possibility of having every burger or chicken sandwich made without meat or meat products.
I ate at this restaurant last night with three dining companions.  We decided to sit in the bar area at a high table which had views of the ample number of TV's.  The beer list that they had was nice with about 20 different beers on tap and a nice selection of bottles.  I ended up having the Philly Shackamaximum with my waitress telling me that she preferred the Long Trails Porter.  It was served in a chilled glass and tasted pretty good to me.\n\nFor dinner we attempted to start off by ordering the Blues BBQ Pork Nachos.  We were told that they did not have any pork and so we were not able to order it.  At this point we were also told that they did not have any veggie burgers as well.  So we started out with the Chicken Chili Nachos.  They were pretty good and were covered with real cheese as opposed to nacho cheese which was to my liking.  For dinner I decided on having the Lovely Lisa's Salad since I love both blue cheese and granny smith apples.  Upon receiving the salad I dug in.  The chicken was cooked nicely, moist and tender, and there was a nice coating of blue cheese on the salad.  However there was a problem since there were no granny smith apples on the salad.  Whenever the waitress came back to check on us I asked about the missing apples.  She went to the kitchen and came back and told us that they were out of them and promptly left.  I am not normally one to complain but I feel like something could have been substituted in for the apples, or that I should have been told before ordering or they could have discounted the salad but none of that occurred.  It is sad that it happened too because the rest of my salad was pretty good but that left the proverbial bitter taste in my mouth.\n\nThe bottom line is that I have been here before and the food is generally good.   However, leaving a major part off an item and being told that the kitchen is out without any rectification will make me think twice before returning here again.  It is a shame because Buffalo Blues does have potential.
My coworkers and I had lunch here on a Friday afternoon, and it was a pretty \"meh\" experience for me.  We were seated all the way in the back of the restaurant/bar, in a room that I didn't even know existed, so apparently Buffalo Blues is bigger than I thought.  It's nice that they have some tables away from the main bar area.\n\nI went for the Hot Veggie Sandwich with sweet potato fries, in some kind of attempt to be healthy.  The sweet potato fries weren't too bad, with a good flaky crisp.  The sandwich left something to be desired.  It wasn't hot, first of all - I'd say the (slightly crumbly) bread had been toasted with the cheese, but all the veggie ingredients were cold, leaving an overall lukewarm effect on the sandwich.  The hummus spread didn't taste much like hummus, and was thick and pastey instead of smooth and creamy.  There wasn't a lot of exciting flavor,  It was just belly-filler, really.  I guess that's what I get for trying to order healthy here.  \n\nI just wasn't much interested in it, and I don't think it was worth anywhere near $8.  I better have a darn good sandwich if I'm paying $8.  Also, it was relatively small in size - I don't have a huge appetite, so that wasn't a problem.  But I guess I think an $8 sandwich should either be awesomely delicious, or big enough that I can take half home.  Buffalo Blues was neither.\n\nNot particularly interested in returning for any reason.
When Hotlick's died, Buffalo blues was born. It really is a Pittsburgh staple but come on....\n\nFood is really, really average. I love the ribs and wings, but it's about the same as any other rib place in the city, only they charge an arm and a leg for it. This place is for the people that feel that they are at a real rib place, but don't want to cross Centre or Penn Ave. to get real ribs. It, technically is in Shadyside so your Mercedes will be safe! \n\nThe ambiance: The restaurant is always crowded. Not just crowded, but packed with teens underage drinking, families with too many kids that overflow to your \"space\" and collage kids who also spill over from the bar. IT'S LOUD AS HELL!!! Forget about a nice quiet dinner. There seems to be no consideration for customers at all. Last time I was there, there was a St. Patrick's Day party (it was NOT St. Patrick's Day) that took over the whole place. Though the staff tried (nah, they didn't really try) to keep them in the so called \"party room\" I was bumped into several times, spilled my beer, and couldn't hear my wife speak. But as long as they got their money; they could give a crap. Oh and there are like 100 TVs to interrupt any conversation at your table.\n\nWant to sit in the bar area? Good luck. You will see a mix of drunk people, women who look like high-end prostitutes and college kids who are only missing a beer bong. Also IT'S LOUD AS HELL!!!!!!!!\n\nThe \"wonderful\" Staff: It seems like it's everyone's first day. To put it lightly; the staff suck! To be sure, you will be waiting for your your drinks, food and bill for a very, very long time. Expect to be there for about 2-3 hours. The wait staff are forgetful, inattentive and very sloppy at their job. It pains me to leave any tip for them. Most of the staff are hot, stacked, absolutely stupid and should be working at Hooters not a place where your bill will be upwards of $50 for two people. Be prepared to be met with this saying, \"Oh, like ohmygod, I am so sorry i forgot that, he he!\" (oh she's twisting her finger in her hair while she's talking). You will get bad service...period (in fact, I can't remember the last time a wait person actually wrote down my order, and they're idiots so no worries).\n\nThe food: Kinda good. Menu is huge, you'll find something you like. But I go there about 2-3 times a year for the food. It is way too expensive. Do not take a date there. Your average bill for a meal with actual proteins will run you in the high 40s without booze. There are so many bar-food places that don't claim to be high class that are just as good as this place. I grew up with the rib sauce and love it, but for your average consumer, skip it!\n\nThis place is a wannabe sports bar that tries too hard to be high end. Just watch out for the vomiting college kids with trust funds...they're everywhere!!!!!
Oh how the mighty have fallen. This place used to be good. Something happened and the wings are small dry and just generally bad. Since wings are supposed to be their thing this is pretty unacceptable.\n\nWriting this review makes me sad because it is a great place to drink beer and watch the game. The beer is reasonably priced but the food is just expensive for what it is. I essentially live across the street so I know I'll go back, but I hope some of these poor reviews will help them turn things around in the kitchen.
Good place to watch a sports game.  Beer specials were good. Food is very overpriced though.  The wings are about the worst I've ever had... and I've had alot of wings growing up in Buffalo, NY.
I have a love-hate relationship with this place...  \n\nI love it because it's extremely close to me (so, it's convenient when I'm craving a beer) and the atmosphere on Sundays is outstanding.  I'm a giant Steeler fan, but you'll probably find fans from all 32 teams in Buffalo blues, which gives it a fun and exciting feel during NFL Sundays.  \n\nHowever, I hate it because I believe the alcohol and food is overpriced.  The food wouldn't rub me the wrong way so much if I thought it was worth the price, but I don't.  Not even a little bit.  The only thing I have found to be delicious there were the wings; however, you can go to almost any other bar to get delicious and cheaper wings.  So, it's not really much of a win at all.  Also, I want to have a handful of beers during the games, but I don't want to empty my pockets doing it.  So, all in all, I recommend going once and awhile (mainly on Sundays) for a beer or two, but other than that it's not worth much of a visit.
The location is convenient but I was not a fan of the food. I had shrimp and Chinese veggies and crab Rangoon. They cut the veggies way too big and the sauce was bland. I won't go back for food but the crab Rangoon was ok. They didn't give any sauce. You have to ask for it. That sucks.
This is an average Chinese buffet. The food was not bad, but not impressive neither, plus some cheap American food. The food was a little too greasy even by American Chinese food standard, and my stomach complained soon after I left that place. To me, that's a no-go signal.\n\nOn the other hand, they seemed to have a non-buffet counter next-door, perhaps the food would be better there.
I had to get new tires mounted and balanced and when I went to pay, the guy at the register actually says something to the effect of \"Do you have any idea what this is supposed to cost? So, I could charge you $400 and you wouldn't know the difference?\" Joking or not, why even go there?
The Kelly Strayhorn is a good idea which is poorly executed.  The facility has problems:  the stairs on the house are too narrow causing trips, the bathrooms don't really have the capacity for over 300 patrons, etc.\n\nBeyond the facility you get to the actual 'poorly executed' idea.  The staff is extremely un-knowledgeable about the subjects they are producing.  For instance none of the programmers on staff have any training in performing arts, they are all visual arts people playing at another field.  As a result they don't even know what they are really producing and any experienced person in the field can tell.  \n\nThe sad part about this is they REALLY try.  They throw staff and new ideas at every opportunity.  Don't expect great performances here, expect a talked up mediocre performance.  \n\nAudience follows content and they don't have content or the staff that is knowledgeable enough to know better.  Check back in in a couple of years.  This apple is too green to eat much less pay for.
I arrived on a Thursday afternoon at 5pm when there was absolutely no other soul in the bakery (except for the staff). My pumpkin pastry with carmel topping was alright. I also tried the key lime cake and sour cream and apple cake. The key lime cake was definitely the best of the three.\n\nWhile I've been to better bakeries, I will definitely be back. I have heard stories of wonder and delight from other friends.\n\nThere is a small seating area with tables and a water dispenser for diners.
I've had a wide range of experiences here.  Let's just say, when I first moved here, one of the employees gave me poor advice and ended up totally screwing up my title.  It's been a tremendous ordeal to get it fixed.  Another employee tried to help me fix it and screwed that up too.  Now I'm working with a third person who seems very competent and committed to helping me solve this problem, but even she is like \"I can't believe those other people told you to do that....they made this so much harder than it needed to be.\"  My thoughts exactly.\n\nWork with Barb, if you can.  She knows her stuff.  I don't quite trust anybody else to help me properly.  Also they're only open from 830-4 (or is it 430?) so you pretty much have to go before work, or on Saturday.  And I will be going in tomorrow at 830 until my car title saga finally comes to its conclusion....\n\nAlso, parking is free in their lot.  And if you are a AAA member, I think your fees are lower, or something like that.  I do have AAA, so it makes sense for me to come here - I can't say what the experience is like for non members.
There were zero other people here aside from my friend and I.
i was here for a concert the other night. apparently, there's much more to the venue than the side we were on where the stage was, but it was a pretty small area for a pretty big crowd. ok, so we arrived shortly before the opening act and ordered beers. $4 for a yuengling bottle isn't ideal, but whatever. we snagged a table with stools near the door before too many people got there. by the time the opener was over, the place was packed shoulder to shoulder, and whether we stood or remained on our stools, it was nearly impossible to see the stage.\ni liked that it was an intimate venue, but that many people packed into such a small space, with expensive drinks, and not even a good view? not the best venue i've ever been to...
Fish out of water here when it comes to hardware related things.  I mean I know how to swing a hammer and push a button to start a machine, but all the other stuff...meh.\n\nI've only really gone in here to pick up paint, so I'll focus on that.  I feel bad for the lady that works the paint counter.  Each time I'm in there she always seems to be by herself with a line of customers all wanting there base paint tinted.  I don't believe there was ever a time I could just walk up to the counter and have my paint mixed for me.  Give that woman a hand.
Fairly mediocre, even by the relatively modest standards of Home Depot. Unfortunately, this is probably the best you're going to do for hardware in most of Pittsburgh.
Tried using the online order store pickup with the hopes of increased efficiency.  fail.
A few hours before the event, we happened across the ad in the City Paper and decided to give it a shot.  We were excited to get there as the event said we would be making something, there would be food and music, demonstrations, live music, and a gallery.  Booking our reservations for 6pm was quick and easy over the phone; $60 for a couple.  Upon arrival, we checked in and were asked if we wanted to purchase another item to make; we were confused because we assumed that we would each get to make something.  In the end, we chose not to spend the extra $15 to make another garden float/ornament; aka a hollow glass ball.  \n\nWhen our 'instructor' met with us, he was very friendly but it was loud and he was very hard to hear.  He ran through everything at lightning speed and in the end, all we got to do was blow air in a tube for 10 seconds.  Had the first attempt not popped, I wouldn't even have been able to do anything!  From a teacher's standpoint, there were many other steps in the process that we should have been able to participate in; I would've been happy to sign a waiver if that is part of the issue.  Within 15 minutes, our ball was done and we were shuffled out so another couple could have their turn.\n\nWe then worked our way downstairs to the food and drink and there was an assortment of beer, wine, sparkling juices, veggies, fruit, cheese, and some deli meats.  The assortment was nice, as we were able to snack on the healthy side, but the beer was still warm.\n\nThe gallery was nice to walk through with work on display from so many talented people, the live music added to the ambiance, and the demonstrations were interesting to watch.\n\nIn the end, it was nice experience, but were severely let down by the make-it/take-it section of the evening (the part we were most excited for!).  It really started to bug us, when later in the evening, we saw an older couple getting to do more of the steps in the process (mind you, we aren't young kids, but young professionals).  We would have liked to have a small 'info talk' about the steps that will take place, why they are that way, the tools used, maybe some quick science behind it, then get to work on the item.
Worst pizza I've had in Pittsburgh. I ordered from here last weekend. The pizza (pepperoni) had no flavor and the crust was way too chewy. The Buffalo wings were cooked well, and were tender and juicy, but they had almost no sauce on them whatsoever; luckily I had some wing sauce in my fridge in order to save them. \n\nMaybe it was one bad night, and I can give them another chance later, but based on my one experience, I can't recommend this place to anyone.
Ahh, the only place near the train station that is open past 9 PM, isn't overpriced and/or full of people who are way too jolly for such an early hour. I got a slice of cheese pizza and onion rings. The pizza was decent. There was nothing flavorful about the sauce and the grease would not stop oozing out of the cheese. I felt sick before I got halfway through it. That reminds me - the slices are HUGE, and are $2. The onion rings were extremely basic - I gave most of them to a couple of drunken girls who debated about what to eat for half an hour.\nOne irritating thing I overheard: as a girl was trying to place an order, the cashier kept interrupting her to say things like \"we don't have those anymore\" or \"no, we can't cook wings dry.\" Sounds like the menu and staff needs to be updated.
This was one of first pizza places that I've tried inPittsburgh. It was about 5 years ago. I don't have a clear memory of that time but I have Parma pizza phobia ever since... So go figure...
I've should have known better than to order a salad from a pizza joint.  I also should have known that I shouldn't have cheated on my diet.\n\nI figured I'd choose today to be my cheat day and order with everyone else at work for take out.  I opted for the Popcorn Chicken Salad.  Sounds tasty, looked tasty, and yes it even tasted tasty.  Iceberg lettuce, grape tomatoes, cucumbers, red onions, french fries, popcorn chicken, and three types of cheese.  \n\nI have to say that even though I was saying yes, my body was saying, 'OH hell no!'\n\nI'm regretting this decision now as I am sitting here in discomfort.  Not sure what on the salad made me feel this way.  But I'm not liking the effect I'm getting right now.  Could just be karma turning around and kicking me in the ass for eating what looked healthy but was really nothing more than the equivalent of a fried chicken sandwich combo meal from a fast food joint.\n\nI'll think twice before the next time rolls around to order from here.
I think the only thing I appreciate about Whole Foods is entering the store and seeing their fresh cut flowers.  Let's see why.....\n\nI attempt to drive to Whole Foods only to be caught in a line of 5-6 cars attempting to get into the parking lot.  (I guess I'm not cool enough to ride Pat Transit from the South Pittsburgh home).  When I find a place to park, after the Lexus SUV (HA!) pulls out, I find that they didn't put their cart back.  \n\nSo I enter the store and admire how their design is very appealing to the eyes (how DO organic oranges get so ROUND and so ORANGE) and everything is stacked so neatly.  Then I read that a pound of these oranges are $1.99...  Then I go to the meat section, which I don't even eat, to find that the prices are double those of Trader Joe's or even Market District (see future review).  So I walk around and debate to see if I should buy Clif Bars and Naked Juice (which happens to be on sale) because LORD KNOWS I don't need bulk-blanched-almonds.  But then I decide to buy \"fresh\" CHUNKY peanut butter because it would be fun to try.  (When I get home later, however, I bought Valencia peanut butter, whatever the hell that is, and cannot stomach it.  Gimmie my Jif.)  So while I am waiting in line, I see the  bikes (those rebellious urbanites moved from Quiet Storm) and wonder if my money is better spent elsewhere.  \n\nRegardless, I whole-heartedly (no pun intended) support organic and sustainable farming, but I'd rather go to the farmer's market or drive a bit further out of the city to go somewhere real to buy my \"whole food\".  And at least I put my cart back.
I don't know, maybe I'm not clear on the concept of Whole Foods.  Don't get me wrong, there's nothing really wrong with shopping at Whole Foods.  Whole Foods does have wonderful merchandise, but...\n\nI have found that I can buy a lot of the same organic things and environmentally safe cleaners at Giant Eagle for less.\n\nThier wine and beer selection, supposedly quite remarkable in other states, well remember, this is Pennsylvania.  You can't buy those things at the grocery store.  \n\nI can get just as good quality meat and produce in the Strip District.  Sometimes, even better quality.\n\nI guess the benefit of Whole Foods  is that you can find a lot under one roof and don't have to spend a lot of time and gas going to different stores.  I'm not slamming Whole Foods at all, but I actually like Trader Joe's better.
I loved Whole Foods in Ohio.  It was calm and quiet and had lots of pretty organic produce.\n\nHere?  Well, first of all, the parking lot is a death-trap full of upscale SUVs who have no idea how to drive courteously.  (A few pointers: use your turn signals, wait your turn, drive slowly in a parking lot, and put your cart back!)  My blood pressure skyrockets the second I even try to pull in here.\n\nSecondly, the whole store seems weirdly dark.  I don't know if it's the high, exposed-ductwork ceiling or what, but it's depressing.\n\nThirdly, they offer plenty of bulk beans and nuts, but few varieties of rice.  \n\nThere are a few good points, though.  The sushi (at least the vegetarian varieties) are good, and the desserts are delicious and beautiful.  The salad bar and prepared foods always look good, and the staff is friendly.  But I still try to avoid Whole Foods as much as possible simply because of the insane parking lot.
Whole paycheck is a fitting name.\n\nThis Whole Foods is decent for regular items but their prepared food prices have gotten really high as of late.  \n\nI used to shop here for almost everything but their common products can now be had at almost any other grocery store for less.\n\nWhole Foods had it's day as a unique place to shop with hard to find organic produce and products. \n\nNow it's just more expensive.
Worst parking lot in Pittsburgh. Bring popcorn to watch middle-aged, self-important mouth breathers gun their BMWs at one another to illegally park in the handicapped spots .If one didn't know better, one could mistake the parking lot drama for a permanent, outdoor performance art installation (allbeit an extraordinarily douchey one). Snotty clientele, over priced prepared items, no longer have a monopoly on ANY product in Pittsburgh. That being said, they do have a great selection of produce, probably the best in Pittsburgh, but you'll pay dearly for it. 1 very large, organic, honeycrisp apple you ask? Try $5, for real. If you want to sum up Whole Foods, just remember it's a place where you can literally spend $5 on an apple. Also, the CEO John Mackey voted for MItt Romney (http://www.nytimes.com/2013/01/20/magazine/john-mackey-the-kale-king.html?_r=0), so if you think you're shopping in a mecca of neo-progressive, pre-utopian bliss, think again.  Waste of time AND money overall.
Great selection of vegan, vegetarian, raw milk, prepared foods, bakery, cheeses and aged beef. Very expensive, trader Joe's and Market district come to mind as a cheaper alternative. Parking at this particular store is a nightmare.
MEAN CUSTOMERS -ALOOF WORKERS+GOOD FOOD = CRAZY!\n\nOfficial Rant of an Angry Woman:\n\nFirst off - I shop at \"Whole Paycheck\" cause my household eats organic and whether I like it or not WF has the best organic food prices in my neck of the woods. IT'S STILL GOD DAMN RIDICULOUS EXPENSIVE but I take my family units nutrition and health seriously! WORD!!\n\nDownhill from here...\n\nTHE CUSTOMERS AND PARKING LOT ARE MORE BAT SHIT CRAZY THAN MENTAL HOSPITALS I'VE WORKED AT!\n\nI have watched more rich bitch elderly women NEARLY murder pedestrians and crash into cars trying to park their Lincoln Continentals in that parking lot than I'd ever care to witness!\n\nAlso - I am a mother with a young child and have been SHOVED by above mentioned rich bitches while reaching for products out of the freezer cases WITH MY CHILD IN MY ARMS! I briefly entertained SHANKING said bitch but alas prison orange is not in my color wheel!\n\nThe customers are the worst human beings on earth (::thinks about self, shakes head, laughs...except me of course::). YOU KNOW WHO YOU ARE SHADYSIDE HAGS! You treat the employees like dogs - like one level above dirt. If I worked there I would hang myself in the cheese section! The customers are the worst cross section of Pittsburghers ever!!! \n\nThat said- I understand why the employees are like stunned fish - keeping things close to the vest so that RICH BITCH SHADYSIDE MONSTERS don't feast on their flesh in fits of rage!\n\nBUT I WOULD LIKE TO POINT OUT...one female cashier who shall remain nameless SHIT on me and treated me like a tree killing whore when I handed her one Internet print out coupon on a single sheet of computer paper - she ROLLED her eyes and PAINSTAKINGLY tore my coupon out of the paper and then folded the unused paper and placed it in her pocket! I am a tree hugger getting judged by a tree hugger! FUKISUMA you! I'm a mom trying to do right for my family - feed them healthy -GO TO HELL!\n\nIf you see a woman and child dressed like Rambo and Baby Rambo running through WF screaming and wielding gallons of milk - it's me trying to survive another trip to WHOLE PAYCHECK HELL!
Oh Whole Foods, you are so so very overpriced.  I so so wish you were not, because I love the idea of the place.  But I just cannot bring myself to do my normal grocery shopping here.  I can't bring myself to spend the big bucks!\n\nThe place is always packed and you're usually left bumping into people left and right.  You may even get a nasty look, yikes!  The parking is atrocious, with only probably only 75 spots for a pretty popular store.  And have fun just getting into the parking lot from Centre.  Okay, I'm going to a negative place right now....\n\nI stop in here one a whim when I'm out in the area if I'm really craving sushi, because it's way better than the Giant Eagle's sushi down the street.  It's still not he best fast sushi (Giant Eagle Waterfront), but it does the job.  Again, they're almost $3 more than at GE.  When I run in to grab sushi and usually ad Odwalla by bill comes to almost $20!  I'd rather eat a fast meal at Qdoba...sorry...I said it!\n\nMy feelings can best be summed up with this....http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2UFc1pr2yUU
I am a big fan of the Whole Foods company in general.  The store back home (Omaha) had a wine bar, espresso bar, gelato, sushi and udon stand, a GIANT cheese counter where you could sample...I could go on.\n\nThe Pittsburgh Whole Foods is small, and almost as overcrowded as its parking lot.  Two-thirds of the time they are out of what I came for.  I'm sorry, but if I'm paying THAT much for groceries, I want a stellar shopping experience.  This WF is mediocre at best.
I'll be honest, I just don't get it.  When it comes to eating I do not adhere to any particular mantra or dietary restriction like vegan, organic, vegetarian, ethical, etc.  If it's edible and it's within my palate's liking range then I eat it.\n\nFrom that perspective this place just gets two stars.  Some items were higher priced but the value added (from organic to vegan certified) would I guess justify it if you had to have it.  But the items that do no fall under any of those premium-restriction value types are still just as highly priced.  So it feels like 90% of their inventory is priced at a whole-store experience premium.\n\nTheir prepared meals section was marvelous, and their cut fruit section was like I had died and gone to heaven.  But that's about the only two sections I probably would have been willing to open up my wallet.
I think Whole Foods and Giant Eagle Market District are competing for the title of most annoying place to shop. It all starts with the parking experience, which is ridiculously horrible at this location - very poorly planned. And then, there's the prices - Giant Eagle being quite expensive compared to similar grocers in other cities, Whole Foods obviously has to get a one up on those; it's inherent in the scheme of selling premium \"natural\" goods. Whole Foods does have better lighting and layout than GE, and yes, a more discriminative selection of products, especially for people with specialized diets, like vegans (me) and gluten free adherents. The house baked bread here might be worse than GE (tough contest) - often under baked and thus soggy in middle and crusts tend to fall off; making gluten free-dom seem appealing. And I don't even need to talk about customer demographics, because you've all seen Rachel C.'s link!
This club is now officially closed for good due to redevelopment in the area.
Walking into Jimmy Tsang's was like walking into the Chinese restaurant that was on Hawaii Five-0 - it puts you back in time to the 1960's and the food is reminiscent of that era also.\n\nHot & Sour soup was highly americanized, not very hot or very sour.\nWonton Soup was a very large portion and good.\n\nEgg Rolls were large, slightly greasy but the filling was flavorless, not very good.\nCheese wonton's were okay but the old grease used to fry them in over-powered the flavor.\nChinese Flank steak was tough and chewy in a soy style sauce thickened with cornstarch, a little too salty and greasy but overall it was good.\nFlaming chicken was chicken breast with sugar peas, bamboo shoots and baby corn in a white/clear cornstarch chicken base sauce, that lacked much of any flavor except slat - it was just okay.\n\nTea tasted like American Lipton brewed in large quantities in the back than served in a generic tea-pot.\n\nThe place was clean service was good, prices are very good, but the food was just average.
Hey, Jimmy! Cigarettes are not a replacement for tea bags! The early bird special is cheaper because it is mostly cabbage and the tea tastes like second-hand smoke.\nI had the same dish previously, without the special and it was fine (hence 2 stars and not 1). I'm going to avoid this place until I get a craving to drink tobacco.
I was determined to let this one pass (experience was not worth commentary) until I made a disturbing discovery...\n\nI made a reservation for inside. They sat us outside. That turned out to be preferable to us because the tables that WERE available inside were very close to others. The patio was spacious and decorated with busts, slightly preferable to the inner cheap.trendy.interiors.com shit. Have you seen the terrible bathroom wallpaper borders? Probably not, as the ladies room is a very dim place; don't expect to be able to notice that your botox implant is crooked. Anyway, It was HOT under the Space-Ray heater on the patio, making for a sweaty and ice-instantly-melted beverage winter night. The food was alright with some interesting flavor pairings, but it was certainly not quite worth the price. The bread was the best I've had in Pittsburgh. Our server made it seem that everything she was doing was somebody else's job, in fact, it was mostly other people who delivered, which made it confusing in terms of knowing who to ask for things and whether or not to factor some of the fine service into the tip that presumably goes mostly to the primary server who was sub-par for upscale dining; our question for the kitchen left unanswered, \"the host is supposed to do that but I will...\" Run on. When I described the qualities I was looking for in my wine choice during beverage inquiry, she just stared blankly and waited for me to decide. The wine list did not include descriptions. The gal who delivered the wine thankfully did describe it before popping the top and it was determined that I did not want this cheapest option before me! She described another bubbly that sounded and was, according to my own tastes, delightful. \n\nI was so very satisfied with the sparkling sensation of the meal that I sought it out at the Wine and Spirits store. This was the moment that my minor disappointment in the value of my special-occasion dinner at Casbah turned into a feeling of devastating violation. I am talking about a 400% markup on the retail price of this wine. If you want to do your own math: at Casbah the 1/2 bottle of Gruet Blanc Du Noirs cost $35, while a WHOLE bottle at W&S is priced at $16.99. You can bet that I will choose to enjoy this wine elsewhere, like Avenue B (byob), next time. \n\nCasbah is lacking the quality service, honesty and original ambiance that should accompany creative food at moderately high prices.\n\n**Update: I recently saw a full size bottle of the Gruet on a restaurant menu for $30; Casbah, take a tip!
Disappointing. \n\nMy bf and I went for JUST dessert and wine, which we told the hostess ahead of time. The waitress was very curt and disrespectful. We were rushed to order (even though there were plenty of empty tables and it was NOT closing time). She did not offer suggestions or advice.\n\nWe ended up ordering the flourless chocolate cake. The cake was extremely rich (but delicious!) and the portion was just right for sharing after dinner. The marscapone was silky and paired perfectly with the cherries on top.\n\nThe waitress kept coming back to see if we were done and ready for our check. After we got the check, she was in a hurry to get us out the door. I am completely dissatisfied with the service and will not go back to this restaurant simply because of it.
I came here with a friend for her birthday, and the food really isn't particularly special.  Portions are decent, and I guess the prices are reasonable... if they had better food. \n\nThe outside of restaurant makes me think that the inside will be just as square and boring, but the inside patio area was pretty nice actually.\n\nOverall, I just wasn't very impressed with the food.  If I was offered to eat this food for free, sure, I'd take a helping, but probably not seconds.
1. Sat outside on patio metallic chairs and tables, when we made reservation expecting to sit in the restaurant, not outside! There was no information about this. If the restaurant inside seats g is full. Then they should mention to the customers making reservations that they will be sitting outside!!!\n2. Food is mediocre at best! They even screwed my order. Asked for risotto and got some pasta, not sure what.\n3. Asked for two cabs, someone at restaurant changed it to one big cab instead which could not hold all of us so we had to wait for another 25 mins for another one!!\n Would not recommend to anyone. Enough other good restaurants in Pittsburgh to go to. They have to have paid their way into magazines rating them highly!
Sharia don't like it, and neither does Becky. \n\nBoy and I went to Casbah on a warm Tuesday evening. The restaurant wasn't busy, and we were seated in the inviting outdoor patio. Our waitress was very pleasant and extremely informative about both the drink and food menus. \n\nWe shared a bottle of Mission la Caminade (Malbec, French). This was a very good, medium-bodied wine. \n\nMany yelpers have raved about Casbah's bread and pesto. I don't get it. I've had much better sourdough elsewhere and the pesto wasn't anything to write home about. \n\nI had the asparagus soup with crab for an appetizer.  The soup was served cold and tasted fresh enough, but something was off, and I barely ate half of it. \n\nI ordered the orecchiette pasta as an entree, which was served with grilled chicken and cranberries in a goat cheese cream sauce. I am upset to report that this tasted rather bland. The cranberries were the only spark of flavor in the dish.  Boy ordered the ricotta cavatelli pasta, which was in a marinara sauce with sausage and ricotta. I am sad to report that this too was tasteless. The ricotta was dumped on top and added nothing to the dish. \n\nWe glanced at the dessert menu, after spending so much on food we didn't enjoy, boy and I decided to cross the street for ice cream, instead. \n\nOverall, Casbah has a nice atmosphere and service, but their food quality doesn't match the price tag.
Good food, great service, but high prices.\n\nMy date and I shared 2 appetizers, a salad and each had an entree with the recommended wine pairings. Bill was $115 without tax--pricey by my standards for this experience. The new tuna tartare appetizer was the highlight of our night. The bruschetta with fig and grape butter, prosciutto and blue cheese was good, so was the beet salad.\n\nWe were disappointed with our entrees. My roasted duck breast with spinach and gnocchi was not hot. My date had the salmon with potato fennel puree, which she said tasted fishy.\n\nMake sure you aren't seated inside the tent where patrons are eating on a slope on outdoor metal tables--this is not my idea of a good dinner at this price range.\n\nAlthough I would come here again, there are certainly much better restaurants in the city. I would rank Casbah below Eleven within the Big Burrito group of restaurants.
Though Casbah has been around for ages this was our first time dining there. In short, the restaurant itself was nice and the food interesting though a little on the pricey side. Service started out great but for some reason our entrees took forever and our waiter more or less abandoned us. If I'm spending a $150 on dinner for 2 I expect some sort of explanation on why we are having to wait 45 minutes plus between our appetizer and the entrees. At a minimum, I don't want to have to flag down the server to order another drink and for god's sake don't make me ask for a refill of my water.  If I was only basing my decision on food I'd probably go back but all things considered there are too many other restaurants in Pittsburgh where I can get amazing food AND an amazing dining experience.
Tonight's review: it started with a table for two stuffed between two other tables. Yes there were five other more comfortable two tops available. We asked and after some sighs were granted our seemingly offensive request. Punishment was fast...we sipped our water, were provided a refill but no offer to acquire other beverages. With plenty of time to review the night's menu, we made our selection. My request was well done Salmon (heart issues require well done) the chef's feelings were clear; as I sawed through the salmon I thought it could possibly be a message. I again had offended by my request. I like Casbah and the other BB restaurants but tonight I should have selected a friendlier more customer focused establishment. YES I will return and still recommend Casbah. Oh we did finally get to place a cocktail order.  \nM
Made a reservation on opentable for Friday at 6pm.  It wasn't packed at all but the hostess decided to sit us outside without asking where we'd prefer to sit. It was really hot that day so it was pretty uncomfortable. \n\nI immediately noticed that a lot of CMU undergrads worked there. While I was dining there I saw 3 CMU classmates. \n\nI started off with the gazpacho and it was very tasty. We were also given some bread with a lavender goat cheese spread. The spread was ok. \n\nFor the entrees I got the roasted pepper cavereccia that had crab in it and ricotta cavatelli with sausage.\n\nFor the cavereccia I thought there was going to be big chunks of crab but I was disappointed to see that the crab was shredded into small pieces. The pasta was a little undercooked and the sauce was ok.\n\nThe cavatelli was extremely oily. The more you ate it the more you saw the pool of oil it was swimming in. I had to wipe some of the oil off the pasta. \n\nLastly I had the dark chocolate raspberry bread pudding. It was pretty good but I wish there were more raspberries in it. \n\nService was pretty good and the decor outside was nice, although, it got really stuffy in the outdoor tent. \n\nThis place is pretty expensive and based on the food I wouldn't go back for that price.
While I have always had a great experience with my food, I feel the need to update my prior review based on my experience at brunch today.  \n\nWhen my food came out, there was a very visible hair on my plate. I was with a large group and did not want to make a scene, so I mentioned it to the server who immediately took my plate away. The manager on duty came out to apologize, which I did appreciate. However, I was a little surprised because when they brought my plate out about 5 minutes later, I could tell that it was the same exact plate. \n\nFirst off, it was not even warm, so if they made my meal on the spot you would think it would be hot, or at the very least warm. I had also substituted bacon for the sausage that normally comes with the entree, and if the chef had made a new plate on the spot, he would probably have sent it out with the sausage (or with a side of bacon again), which he did not (they had served my bacon on the side when they brought it out initially).     Everything was in the exact same place on the plate. I wasn't going to cause a scene, so I pretended to enjoy it, but did not. I was quite repulsed.\n\nin my last review I had said that Casbah was my favorite restaurant in Pittsburgh. I had mentioned that the Cassericia dish was my favorite but that they had removed it from the menu the last time I tried to order it there for dinner. I received a response from someone at the restaurant that she was not sure why I would think that because it is still offered, and I explained that the waiter told me it was removed from the menu. \n\nI'm not really sure what happened here, but I can tell you this... I don't think that Casbah is my favorite anymore. In fact not only is it not my favorite, it has taken a plunge to the bottom of my list of places to eat. \n\nFor me, if you expect to eat at a top restaurant, the service should be top of the line, and it has just been too inconsistent for my taste. No thanks Casbah!
It's good when they are on, but they are so inconsistent you never know what you are going to get.  The coffee machine looks like it hasn't been cleaned in the last century which is off putting.  Generally, I wouldn't recommend it unless you are in the neighborhood and desperately hungry--you MIGHT catch a lucky break and be there on a good day.
Quiet Storm is, perhaps, the most expensive vegetarian diner I have ever been to, even by big city standards! Cash-only makes this even more difficult. Tofu wings appetizer was simply not very good; and I usually love these things! I tried the gyro wrap which was also a big disappointment. As far as I know, gyros are supposed to be pretty meaty, but this was mostly lettuce with sporadic chunks of seitan and cucumber,along  with dreaded diced unripe tomato. The wrap was dry and upon looking at the menu again, I see that the sauce that it probably requires costs an extra $.50. The tortilla itself was very white and seemingly unnatural compared to those found at most veggie establishments. My beverage was good and affordable--ginger lemonade. It was sweet for my tastes, but I am sure most people would have thought it perfect. I'll keep Quiet Storm in mind as a coffee shop, only.\n\nF.Y.I after splitting the cost of the appetizer with a friend, my lunch cost me $17--ouch! I did have half of the wrap leftover and ate it later as a salad with my own dressing. It was quite good that way and I might recommend that QS rethink the Gyro presentation if they want to continue using so much lettuce.
i was super excited to try quiet storm when i moved to pittsburgh because all of the reviews i read were fantastic.  however, i have visited multiple times now continuously hoping for improvement and each time i've been disappointed.  let's start with the good things.  QS has a great atmosphere, it definitely helped the transition from austin.  very chill \"hippie\" vibe.  however, the servers although friendly can  sometimes be a touch \"hippie-elitest\".  the food was alright.  their homefries were quite tasty but little else has tantalized my taste buds and i have tried many things.  i do love their thai dressing, very yummy on the salads.  will i continue to go back?  probably, wishful thinking is  a good thing.
The menu looks awesome and the dish concepts are good except everything that comes out is disappointingly bland. Thank god there were bottles of hot sauce and salt on the table. The best part of the meal was the peanut butter chocolate milk shake. The burger and \"spicy\" Cajun soup were very mediocre.
Why do vegetarian restaurants think we need \"fake\" meat, this I do not understand.  I had a primavera sandwich which was just ok, but the patty on the roll was just as perplexing as the \"mystery meat\" you get in your elementary school cafeteria. My sandwich came with a boring pasta salad and some tortilla chips out of a bag.  Otherwise the atmosphere was fun, and the wifi was free if you ask for the password.
I've been back to Quiet Storm many times. I can accept the hit or miss service since it's pretty cheap and casual. That's not really an excuse for bad service, it only somehow softens the blow, but why be mediocre? \n\nThe environment is comfortable (unless you sense the servers don't want you there). The music ranges and is appropriate for the environment. It's never too loud or aggressive. Free wi-fi helps and the milkshakes are slammin! The food is inconsistent, but often good. The Black-a-dilla is my favorite. \n\nI really want to like Quiet Storm, but it only merits 2 stars. Their food, service, and hours are inconsistent. It seems they often close early. \n\nOwners, please stick to your business hours. It's not like you're open that late to begin with! Perhaps everybody wants to go home, I don't blame them for that, and you may have run out of a few things, but try to imagine the disappointment of trekking out there to enjoy your favorite shake or snack and then being turned away.  \n\nOR, If you believe this is an acceptable business practice, it would be less infuriating if you simply changed your hours to '9am - until we feel like it.'  This way there are no set expectations and we can't really begrudge you for it. \n\n...My vote is to just stick with the hours you created.\n\nThanks!
Yes, I know.  I'm probably one of the few people that has rated this place with two stars.\n\nBut let me explain.  My friends and I wanted to try this place out and had high hopes.  I haven't heard of many vegetarian/vegan places in Pittsburgh so I expected to have some awesome vegetarian food.  However, from the get go, our host was absolutely terrible.  He did not look us in the eye and was just overall awkward.  There was obviously room in the restaurant for the four of us but he had to \"look in the back\" to see if there was room.  One of the other servers eventually sat us in a clearly empty table that we could have picked out for ourselves.  Our first host came back, reiterated the same thing the server told us, but never gave us menus.  I had to go out of my way to ask for menus about five or ten minutes after we had been seated.\n\nTo be fair, our assigned server was very nice.  She was friendly and approachable.  But of course, our food came and mine was cold.  The potatoes in the hash I ordered was stale, old and cold and had such a small accompanying serving of bread.  Also, our utensils weren't given to us until after our food was served.  I know I may be sounding like a little bit of a snob but utensils should be expected before the food arrives.  Not to be completely biased, the rest my party had decent food.  It just wasn't anything special.  Definitely not worth $12 for brunch.\n\nNeedless to say, I will not be coming back to this place.
So I admit my boyfriend and I actually didn't know it was vegetarian/vegan until we had ordered our food and looked more closely.\n \nWe went this past weekend and had brunch. We each had thai coffee which was ok, not stupendous, not horrible. He ordered the veggie burger, and I had the chocolate oatmeal pancakes.\n\nHis burger was unseasoned and fairly cold, my pancakes were okay...but to be honest really lacked flavor (the taste of what I imagine cardboard to be came to mind). I don't discriminate, I'm all for veggies and vegan food, but just because those are your ingredients doesn't mean you can't cook things well and add seasoning.\n\nI am intrigued to go back because the apple cheese panini sounded possibly better than what we had.  \n\nI will note that ourwaitress was very sweet and friendly, but the food was just lacking in flavor so much that it's really deterred us from going back.
I've found the service here to be pretty terrible. Servers can be pretty careless about taking care of simple things and my friends have had similar experiences. The food is really pretty good, but if the overall service sucks, then well, it makes it hard to enjoy a tasty meal. Sorry Storm, you need to improve this.
Andrew here said it best: \"...  food served by workers who mostly don't seem to notice they're working, and when they do, only respond snarkily.\"\n\nIt took me 40 minutes to get a sandwich here, and when I complained I didn't get an apology, just a snarky remark \"well you can see we have a small kitchen\"
I'm still not convinced that this is a vegetarian restaurant. It just has to be a parody of a vegetarian restaurant. Like, every time I start reading the menu I think Ashton Kutcher is going to pop out and tell me I've been Punk'd.\n\nA small disclaimer: I am not vegan or vegetarian and I never will be. I love meat. But I also love vegetables and fruits and pretty much the entire food pyramid. And these things can be combined to make tasty vegan food. But \"Texturized vegetable protein hydrated with seasonings\" is not food to me. Yep, that description of their \"chorizo\" comes directly off their menu. Eating vegetarian does NOT mean you need to subject yourself to these highly processed \"foods.\"\n\nLess processed substitutes like tofu, tempeh, and seitan are used as well, but they are mostly treated as a stand-in for meat. I guess if you are a vegetarian that misses eating meat, this may satisfy you. However, as an omnivore, why would I eat a faux-BLT when I can eat a real one? How about instead of trying to imitate the flavor and texture of meat, we actually come up with creative combinations of vegetables, fruits, and legumes that are delicious in their own right. What a concept! Have you ever eaten a vegetarian dish and thought, \"Whoa, I can't believe I actually like this better than meat\"? I have! But don't expect that feeling here. It will be more like: \"Umm...I guess tofu mixed with nutritional yeast is kinda reminiscent of scrambled eggs?\"\n\nTwo stars because I really like the drinks here. The ones I remember trying were the ginger lemonade, the Mexican hot chocolate, and the root beer with a shot of espresso. They have some really wonderful sounding tea options that I wish I could try, but I generally avoid this place because of the food.
This place is a train wreck. Quiet? No. Storm? Yes. Loud, slow, bland food and annoying service are only a few of the complaints that I have.\n \n1. The Vegan / Hipster / Metal thing has got to go. All I kept on seeing through the kitchen window was the armpit hair of the cook wearing the Mot\u00f6rhead tank top. I am a huge Mot\u00f6rhead fan, but when I go to an overpriced restaurant I don't want Lemmy to be making my food.\n \n2. The food is bland. Shoving a bunch of brown rice and black beans in a tortilla does not automatically make the food vegan and there were very few things on the menu that were 100% vegan.\n \n3. The service was pretty bad. Our appetizer came to the table with our main dish and the entire time we watched the staff eat their dinner in front of everyone at the counter. I am pretty sure that three different cooks made our order, as the cooks were tag teaming the line while they were eating.\n \n4. Last, but not least... the volume level in the place was numbing. The guy working the counter kept on slamming the ice cream freezer door every time he made a milkshake, the music was some sort of Bjork style electronica that I am pretty sure was written to induce migraines and there were about 6 hippy couples letting their kids run wild.\n \nI have been to plenty of vegetarian restaurants in my travels and Quiet Storm does not even come close to the top 10. I think Pittsburgh deserves better.
In all fairness, I went to this place after stuffing myself at Vincent's Pizza Park.  Still, I know a good pizza when I see one, and this place is totally passable, but great or even good it is not.  My friend and I were given our pizza in a box although we were planning on eating on the premises.  Still, it seemed like we were not wanted and decided not to press the point.  We walked across the street to a parking lot and saw a Pizza Perfecttta box and some leftover pizza littered on the ground.  In the end we didn't finish our pizza and assumed that many people in the past have been hastily handed their pizza, pushed out the door, only to walk across the street, eat mediocre pizza, and decide it wasn't even worth the energy to pick it up and throw it away.
DO NOT ORDER THE HOT WINGS!! If you enjoy eating hot sauce flavored gravy paste, then by all means these are the wings for you. If not, stay away. My boyfriend and i each ate one and couldn't even finish the rest of our dinner. Don't waste your money!
Got the rancho and the Greek, not so bad but I probably won't go back... Too heavy for me...
I was a bit disappointed with the pizza I got. I ordered the Milano special pizza, which had pepperoni, bacon, sausage, bell peppers, mushrooms, olives, tomatoes, etc, and the popcorn chicken. The order itself arrived within thirty minutes which was great. Although the pizza tasted decent, the crust was not crispy at all, the slices were pretty floppy. They also skimped on the toppings a bit. I was hoping for a more loaded pizza. I'm not watching my weight--I can handle it. As far as the popcorn chicken goes, it was too salty, even with the honey Dijon dipping sauce. Probably not ordering from here again.
Ooooppss...update time.   Got the regular (steamed spinach and lasagna) from the hot bar on my way to work.   So, I'm on my dinner break sitting, chatting it up with a co worker while eating.  I see something white in the spinach just before putting it in my mouth.  WTF is that!  OMG, it looks like one of those fat ass worms we'd  pluck from the greens in my grandma's garden.  I threw the fork down and my co worker says...\" you're seeing stuff.\"  Um NOT!  I sat there digging through the spinach determined to find that damn worm.  Thirty minutes later  SHAZAM...found it. Ugh, my coworker spread open the spinach leaf.  EEEkkkk, it was bigger and fatter with black spikes poking out.  FUCK!  Call the manager at Co-op and he says...\"Bring it in for a refund, thanks for being so nice about it...We usually just see worms in the fruits.\"  Geez, thanks for that lil tidbit.    This happened last week around the Sept 14, 2010.  Guess that means it's really organic, huh?
just got off the phone with a lady from construction junction.  normally, i have had the best experiences there. . . all have been very cooperative and helpful.  but, i guess they are so successful that they are becoming arrogant.  here's the rub:  my hubby sent me a picture of a chandelier they had; i did not see the picture until 30 minutes later; by then he had left the store.  i called to BUY the chandelier over the phone.  this has been done before (we WERE construction junction junkies).  the lady adamantly refused to help me. she adamantly refuesed to even listen to a description of the fixture!  she gave the following excuses:\" well, if you have been here in the last 12 years, you know how this place works\";  \"I can't go back there and try to find out what you want\"; \"i am the only one on the floor\"; \"this is first come, first serve\"; \"if your husband comes in and it is still here, then we'll sell it to him\"  \"how will i know which one it is - we have so many back there...\" .... i could hear the smirk in her voice as she enjoyed blowing me off. . .  i even offered to send her the picture my husband sent me via email - she refused.  keep in mind, i wanted to pay for the item.  my husband cannot go back to construction junction today. . . most likely the item will be gone. . . it would have been nice had this  sales agent been more helpful - especially when it was clear how badly i wanted to buy the fixture.  she did not express any concern whatsoever for my requests:  (like, so sorry, i can't help you at the moment, please call back and i'll try to accomodate; give me a brief description and i'll try to find it... etc.).  sometimes, even if you can't accomodate someone, it's how you say it that makes all the difference.  construction junction will implode if it begins to treat its customers indifferently.
Sub-par setting quality, infrequent wall resetting, inconsistent grading, poor climate control, poor air quality (no chalk filter), silly rule where they make everyone wear paper wristbands before entry. + 1 star because they are finally installing air conditioning.
There are some really good things to say about the climbing wall, but overall I was quite disappointed.  I wanted to like this place, so I'll start with the positive aspects.  \n\nFirst of all, the gym in pretty cheap.  And the bouldering area is really quite good.  To be honest, this should only be a bouldering gym. There were a lot of different volumes, nice routes, some top outs, and a good cave area.  Even a small crack with a few problems set on it. \n\nIt seems like whoever is in charge of setting the boulder problems really has some talent.  I might be back to bolder once in a blue moon.  The other climbers here were pretty cool, so the place might have a good vibe/community aspect. \n\n\nNow the downsides.  The staff wasn't very helpful.  The rules regarding the top rope area are nonsensical, and the only reasoning offered up was insurance. I wanted to belay for a friend, but he wasn't allowed in the top rope area unless belay tested. Belay testing also cost $5, and I hate when gyms charge for a test.  It's poor form. \n\nThe ropes aren't doubled up, and with the short wall it gives way too much pull.  They require you to clip into daisy chains on the ground.  I wanted to lead climb, but there was no one at the gym that could give a lead test. The TR routes were really hit or miss, a lot of them just confusing and not fun. They aren't rated properly, just easy, medium, or hard. \n\nThe walls are painted plywood, so smearing is basically impossible.  Further, I question if the holds have ever been cleaned.  Some of them are so polished to the point that it's dangerous.  \n\nThere's only once changing room, and overall the place isn't very clean.  I believe there is some potential here, but it seems to be mismanaged and on the whole, a missed opportunity.
Lamb burger was outright bad(tasted off and charred). We shared and together only ate half. The filet was decent but not $25 worth of decent. Waiter was kind and the ambience is romantic but at the end of the day the food just wasn't that good. There are lots of great byo's in the city and in my opinion, this isn't one of them.
I was underwhelmed with our dining experience. We are just learning Portuguese for an upcoming trip to Brazil and were excited about the option of using some of the vocab we had learned.\n\nMenu was somewhat limited, although we didn't try any starters which many of the other reviews state are the best offerings on the menu. I ordered the seafood stew and my husband had the chicken dish. The stew had seafood: clams, mussels, shrimp, scallops, and some type of summer sausage, but not much else. The broth was oily. My husband's chicken was prepared adequately; however the rice it was paired with was extremely underdone while the veggies were over-cooked and mushy. \n\nI might go back once more with a bottle of wine for appetizers only but for the price I will dine on entrees elsewhere.
Cafe Zinho is a cute little restaurant tucked away on a street corner in Shadyside that serves up Portuguese food. Everything looked great on the menu, but execution was flawed through out our meal. Also, their dishes are not really Portuguese.\n\nFor appetizers, we got chicken livers and portuguese bread pudding with mushroom cream sauce. The chicken livers lacked flavor, which is unfortunate because chicken livers on their own are not very tasty. The bread pudding was pretty good though.\n\nEntrees were, on the whole, not impressive. The lamb chops were obviously over cooked (we ordered medium rare, and the insides were almost fully cooked). The duck breast which people raved about online were tough and the sauce was too sweet. The seafood stew lacked flavor. The lamb burger was also overcooked.
I am a jack of all trades and a do it yourself-er at heart. While in college I worked as a promotional photographer for my very dear friends salon. As a barter service she always did my hair for free! !0 years I had this deal going on. As you can imagine I was pretty spoiled and didn't want to start paying to get my hair did. I began coloring it myself. Now as a licensed skin care specialist you pick things up from the cosmetologists working with you.\n\nI killed it, fried it and melted it. My hair was in dire straights! I have dark hair but I love being a red head. Marcia Cross red to be exact. Whoops! Lightening that many levels should not ever be done by a novice. What can I say?  I'm stubborn that way, and think I can do it all! \n\nI reached out to Emilio for help! I have to say that after many hours of laying down color he managed to make my hair healthy again and I left feeling like a movie star. A red headed movie star! I was flipping my hair all the way to the parking garage and even did a photo-shoot later that evening. Yes I did a photo-shoot because I needed a professional head shot for my work portfolio.\n\n\nI don't know if I'm being too harsh but my hair did turn out much darker than I had wanted it to be. I know sometimes it is hard to predict the outcome when mixing chemistries. \n\nThe other problem I had was the price tag, or the surprise when I went to pay. $250.00 for a color correction! I know this is normal sometimes when fixing the damage but it is also crucial to give your client some kind of idea on payment. I had gone in for color estimated at around $70. I think they did a decent job but for that money It should have been closer to what I asked for. Needless to say I haven't been back but would recommend in a jam.
I recently had semi-permanent lashes put on for my wedding at the WEXFORD Izzazu salon. Upon completion, I thought they looked a bit odd, but figured I just wasn't used to them yet. The next day was my wedding day, and my bridesmaids and I got our hair and makeup done at the downtown Izzazu salon. The makeup artist (who was great) said they looked terrible (which they did- they were uneven and there was white glue all over them) and had to remove them and reapply. They are supposed to last 2 weeks, so removing them the next morning was very unpleasant and I ended up losing a ton of my real lashes when everything was said and done. This added 1 hour+ onto my appointment and I ended up barely having any time for pictures before my wedding. I would steer clear of Izzazu for semi permanent lashes!
I have lived in the area of Page's Dairy Mart for about 40 yrs. I have always enjoyed the ice cream until\" this\" day. I ordered an artic swirl (chocolate ice cream with chocolate chip cookie dough) I have ordered this same item over and over again. When I took first taste, no chocolate chip cookie dough pieces, second taste, same thing, third taste, same thing and so on for approximately 5 or 6 tastes. I took the cup with remaining up to counter and asked them to remake, I was denied told it would waste \"their\" money, nothing about mine, what I had ordered was more expensive than plain chocolate ice cream. They dumped what was in the medium cup into a small and handed back to me. Well it wasn't even a medium desert, since it fit into a small cup. I even tipped the girl $2 when I first received my desert. I will never return, to make any other purchases. I will however return to express my disdain to the owner when I can find him there. I hope he reads this.
Seated in the bar after having made reservations a week in advance. That, paired with a mediocre menu and overall experience, gives this two stars. Save your money and stay in town. I would probably send you to the (gasp) Olive Garden before I referred you here.
My boyfriend & I went to Alla Famiglia for our (late) Valentine's Day dinner last night. We don't go out & splurge like this often, so we were really excited for a special dinner. The food was out of this world (bread & sides, salad, pasta alla vodka and veal chop Milanese), but the service was absolute garbage. I've seriously been treated better at a TGIFriday's. We waited, pretty much unattended to, at the bar until 8:20 for an 8:00 reservation. Once seated, I practically had to beg for a wine list. We called a cab at the end of our meal and decided to get drinks & wait back at the bar. The cab was taking forever, so we called a different company. As my boyfriend was talking with the cab company, a waitress walked by. We heard her walk into the kitchen and loudly announce to the rest of the staff, \"UGH, those people at the bar are JUST now ordering a cab.\" It was 10:30. On a Saturday night.\n\nI don't know if it was the fact that we were some of the youngest patrons in there (early/mid 20s), but we felt talked down to and disrespected the entire time. Maybe if we were in our 50s like everyone else, they would've treated us like adults.\n\nWhen I plunk down $160 for one of the most highly-recommended restaurants around, I expect to be treated like I'm spending $160 at your restaurant. Despite how great the food was, I won't be returning. SO disappointed.
Well, the delivery was fast at least. Everything else was yucky. Avoid!
Our experience not so great.  We have mortgage as well as basic free checking and savings with Dollar in Squirrel Hill.  Mortgage application process was brutal.  Starting with the advertised rate of 2.85% being suddenly not available when we decided to lock it in; got 3.01%.  Automatic deduction of mortgage payment was required to secure this rate and it came out of the required Dollar checking account on the first business day of the month.  Free checking is free ... until.  Beware of Funds Availability policy.  We deposit a check monthly at the end of the month.  In August, the end of the month was a weekend and Labor Day was on September 1.  So our check did not get deposited until 9/2.  Mortgage payment hit on 9/2. It was paid, but we were charged $36 insufficient funds due solely to Funds Availability Policy.  After doing this first, Dollar then merrily hits us with two more $36 charges on smaller checks that would have cleared had they been processed before the mortgage payment.  Had we NOT been required to submit to automatic deduction of mortgage, according to our monthly statement, we had at least 10 days grace to make the payment, so Dollar's requirements and policies trapped us into this situation.  Moreover, there was over $3000 in the associated savings account that was ignored.  I called to protest, and one of the $36 fees was waived.  Then I was offered the \"deal\" of overdraft protection from the savings account for an annual fee plus a $10 transaction fee should this situation ever arise again.  Needless to say, I declined this deal and transferred the savings to the checking account where it sits until I find another bank and then fire Dollar.
I was thrilled to finally find a yelp review with 4 stars and only one dollar sign on Yelp in the South Hills. Moving from LA recently where for some reason EVERYTHING is more expensive... except nail salons! Now, I am by no means, a spa rat but I do like to pamper the toes every now and again. So one afternoon when I had some spare time, I gave them a try. I was totally underwhelmed. From nail polish in the front with dust on it (how long have they been there?) To sitting in a spa chair with ripped upholstery I felt neither pampered nor impressed. I MIGHT have looked beyond such things because of the affordable price till I got home and realized that my nails hadn't been cut short as I had very clearly asked nor had she taking care of an ingrown toenail. A week later I had to cut my own toes and ruin my all right looking pedicure. This place doesn't feel clean or inviting. The decor was junkie and old and cluttered. I will say that everyone was very friendly and they did take me right away when I walked in. I was really pulling for you, Future Nails. But sadly, I don't see you at all in my future. 1.5 Stars
If it wasn't for how fast and affordable the place is It would have no stars at all. I got a fill and a fix because I broke a nail. First off they didn't cut down my nails so now they are obnoxiously long. Second off they are so thin I feel like they are just going to crack off.  Not to mention it seems very dirty.. I was very uncomfortable the whole time I was there. One of the nail techs was constantly hitting on me. I will not be returning again.
Had chicken salad. Was good but very pricey. Their pizza is about 20-30% more expensive than any comparable pizza in the area. And since the pizza is just mediocre it is definitely not a good value so I'll pass!
My first trip here was on a Sunday at 4pm. I was surprised to see I was the only customer. We were met by friendly staff took our choice of seat and gazed at the menu. I wanted a verity so I picked the 2 pancakes, 2 eggs, toast, sausage or bacon.\nI ordered my eggs scrambled and sausage links. I also ordered home fries and a glass of white milk. I could smell my food cooking as I waited anxiously ( I was starving)\nMy food was ready in about 8 minutes and looked tasty.\n\nAll in all good bargain and equal food quality I'll give them 2 stars.\nLike a Pirmantis it would probably be better if I had been drinking.
I recently bought my first motorcycle (a 2001 KTM Duke II) and found Bohn's when searching online for KTM dealers. I went in with the intention of buying a jacket, helmet and gloves. Their store is pretty nice inside, and they have a good selection of gear (mostly dirt-oriented though). \n\nI wasn't quite sure what I wanted, so I asked a lady for some assistance in picking out a helmet. She was helpful, and recommended a jacket that would be usable in different types of weather. However, a friend who was with me said he had a different type of jacket (which they also sold), and she commented that the \"hated\" that jacket and that the liner was \"nothing more than a glorified garbage bag.\" Ok...\n\nWe also talked to a guy at the register about a '96 KTM 300 MXC that my friend just bought, and asked a simple question about a clutch cable. The guy seemed totally disinterested and clueless, and I'm not really sure if he even knew what a clutch was. He ended the conversation by saying that my friend should just throw his bike away because it was so old. What!?\n\nEven after that, I still bought a jacket from them and ordered a helmet I liked that they had assured me would be in later that week. I then got a call from them a few days later saying that the helmet was no longer available, but that I could pick another style. I then just ordered the helmet online and went back the next day to get a refund.\n\nI wanted to like this place, but between the thinly-veiled insults and seemingly clueless repair staff, I don't think I'll ever return. Their prices and selection are pretty decent, so if you are in the area and know what you want, it might be OK to stop by and pick something up. If you have any alternative, though, I would avoid this place.
The service here can be hit-or-miss, but more often than not, I don't have problems. Usually, when my friend and I stop by, we're waited on by the same server, and our food comes up relatively quickly. It's always fresh, too. Unfortunately, when they get busy, it creates problems because they don't have a stock of anything prepared, which in turn creates delays. Their cashiers have a habit of walking away from the counter in the evening, leaving customers waiting for however long it takes them to notice someone is standing there. While I understand that they have to clean up the restaurant for closing, there should always be someone to watch the counter.\n\nAs a side note, their drive-thru speaker went down about a month ago and still hasn't been repaired. It creates delays at the drive-thru window for placing orders, especially later in the evening due to above mentioned cashier habits.
Someone please change the cooking oil!! With the construction on Rt. 51, it has been a very long time since I decided to put up with the craziness that makes up this intersection. A nagging for fried fish however, sent my daughter, and me to this LJS. Mistake number 1 was ignoring the deserted parking lot. Mistake number 2, was placing an order at the drive thru, and eating our 2 piece fish and more dinners, after the smell of old cooking oil put a damper on our nagging for fried fish.\n\nThe service at the drive thru was friendly, the girl at the window friendly, but the smell of old cooking oil, not so much. Not a soul in sight at this LJS. Yes, there are other places to get great fried fish, and after our experience, perhaps it's time to let this LJS walk the plank off our list. The fish was edible, not the usual crunchy, crumbly LJS fish. The hush puppies were soggy from either drowning in old oil too long, or sitting under heat lamps too long. The fries, endured the same sad torture as the others. Cheap, yes, but not worth the money, or Rt. 51 traffic anymore.
I had heard a lot about their food and decided to check it out one night after purchasing a Groupon. This review is strictly for the food. It was not good. The hummus was okay, and our main plate seemed to be microwaved. \n\nThe bar ambiance seemed cool though. So if you are looking for a bar atmosphere, I'd probably rate this 3.5 stars. For dinner, not that great.
Unfortunately, I was not all that impressed with Bernie's.  It's a shame it's the only real photography store in the city, but they could definitley do better.\n\nAs part of a black and white photography class, I needed to pick up film and photo paper, among a few other things.  While Bernie's had everything I needed (and lots of other supplies) I didn't feel all that appreciated for coming in.  I spent a couple hundred bucks and felt like I was being shuffled out the door as quickly as possible.\n\nI will give the one guy at the counter some credit because a woman right before me asked to get a roll or two of film developed in just barely an hour.  I could tell he wanted to get to it quickly, but still felt like I was hassling the guy just being there.\n\nI hate to see real camera stores shut down, but unless I'm in a pinch I'm probably going to order supplies online from now on.
Up-charges most of their products that you can find on B&H for way less money. Sales person treated me like I was a very inexperienced. Not a bad place if you're in need of camera gear without a moments notice, but overall definitely order offline.
Visiting from San Francisco. Food was mediocre at best. Bland is the best description.  Sausages and  Weiner Schmitzel were unremarkable. Best was the sweet & sour cabbage that accompanied. But also served were over-boiled 'daily vegetable' of snap peas, asparagus, and red peppers.... to the point that they were losing their color. Good beer. Yes it has old photos of days gone by... but really there seemed no joy here now...
Great atmosphere of a neighborhood pub, good German beer selection, but food was less than mediocre.  Won't be back. Weisswurst was very bland.  Sauerbraten was dry and tasteless.  Spaetzle was, well, not tradidional German Spaetzle.  Schnitzel and purple cabbage  were the high points, but then again, it's hard to screw up a fried veal cutlet.
Let me preface this by saying that my understanding of goulash came from what my mom called goulash.  Goulash in the Contrucci household was made of elbow noodles, beef and spaghetti sauce.  I guess you can't believe everything your parents tell you right?  \n\nSo going in here, I was thinking, great...mom's goulash!  What was set in front me looked NOTHING like what I was used to.  It was a mish mosh of veggies,noodles, gravy and some random unidentifiable food items.  I usually eat whatever is put in front of me, so I wasn't scared to dive it.  Sadly, I just didn't like it.  I thought it was actually not very appetizing at all.  I know, I know, this is like \"world famous\" goulash, but I was NOT into it!  \n\nWhat I was into was the German Potato Salad.  I love it, and honestly, I feel like I never get the same version of it anywhere in the Burgh.  This was a no frills version, with scallop sliced potatoes and a thick vinegar sauce.  Maybe a bit too much, but not enough for me to eat it all!  \n\nWould I go back? If someone else really wanted to go there, but I wouldn't suggest it nor would I go on my own.  Oh well, on to the next one right?
Not sure why my review was flagged but I can assure that I,m not an employee or another restaurant making trouble for a competitor, just an average consumer that lives on the Northside .\n         When will I ever learn. I really want to like this place. It's a cool building with neat old fashion feel to it. But the food is mediocre at best.The last time I was there I got what they called German goulash. I have had this made for me by real German cooks so I have a good idea what it's supposed to taste like and this isn't it. It was made from pork instead of beef with frozen peas and carrots. The gravy wasn't a rich and savory, it was canned or packaged with I don't even know what spices in it. When I complained to the waitress she said that most people don't like it either. She asked me if I wanted something else but I was in a hurry and ate the meat after I scraped the gravy off of it. I have been to this place 1 or 2 times a year and I have had undercooked potato pancakes, greasy rubins and cold sausages. The only thing I can say is really good is the spinach salad with warm bacon dressing. It is a bit over priced for the size, but it is always really good.\n\nSunday brunch\nA neighbor talked me into going here for the brunch and I was glad she did. For an all you can eat brunch they do a nice job keeping things stocked and fresh. The omelet chef was very good making stuff just as you asked him for, yum. The sausage is great and the bacon is cooked in a range of doneness that everyone can find. So, for dinner and lunch my original 2 stars stand but the Sunday brunch is a solid 4 1/2 stars.
I have stopped going to Max's for regular meals because the food isn't so good but a friend likes to go for Sunday brunch.I find a good portion of the food is acceptable for the brunch,except the food is not kept hot or even warm on the buffet. Cold kielbasi and sauerkraut is a turn off even though it would be great if it was warmer.  The chef that makes the eggs and omelets to order is really good and the sausage is the best. The bacon and the chicken needs to be cooked a little longer as they are always half raw.\nSo much of what they have would be good if it was kept at least warm. Since they have it in chaffing dishes, I've found that the food comes out cold from the kitchen. Makes you wonder just how safe the kitchen is.
This used to be the best German food in town. I have seen a gradual decline in the food over the past several years. The gravies have changed and the Max's Goulash (one of my favorite dishes) has a different sauce (strangely dessert sweet) and change in the protein. The sides are still great, but the food used to be so much better.
Max's was good, but I've had better.\n\nThe restaurant is located in a tired part of town. It isn't in a bad area, but I'm not sure how I would feel eating there after dark. When you walk in you walk through the tavern portion of the restaurant, which is dark and gloomy. We were escorted to the rear of the tavern, which is covered in B&W pictures from the 40's, which gives it a old world tired feeling.\n\nThe menu choices were standard faire for a true german restaurant. I had Max's Goulash, which said it came with spaetzle, but it is piled in the bottom of the bowl and not on the side, which was okay. The goulash was too vinegary for my tastes, but it was okay.\n\nMy wife's Jaeger Schnitzel was good, but I've had better at Das Wald Cafe (http://www.yelp.com/biz/das-waldcafe-newport-news).
I cannot believe Max's is going from 5 stars to 2 stars for me.\n\nYou have to understand, I love this place.  Over the years we have had so many family dinners here including my sisters rehearsal dinner, that it's almost become like eating at a relatives house.\n\nBut now that relative has gone senile and needs to go to a nursing home, and they can't cook anymore.\n\nFor the past two years, every time we come here we say, \"This just isn't as good as I remember.\"  For starters, the food is always served cold.  Don't believe me?  I hope you enjoy tepid knackwurst and cold mashed potatoes.\n\nBTW, to whoever makes their mashed potatoes, you have to boil the potatoes before you mash them.  Yesterday they were undercooked, gritty, and gross.\n\nIn fact, all of the food is becoming gross.  My friend got the roasted beef and what came out looked like a cold cut covered with a congealed beef gravy that had bits of carrots in it.  wtf was that????\n\nI'm done.  This place has gone down hill.  You need a new chef, immediately.  Max's is a North Side institution but there are so many new, better restaurants opening up that they really need to up their game.\n\nPS--thanks for the nausea and hurling about 6 hours after dinner.
I was very specific when I made my reservations several months ago. I needed a non-entrance level room away from noise. We were given a room right off of the hotel Foyer. It is mid-night and a party rages just outside my door even though I have called the front desk asking for their assistance. Right now I would prefer to be in a Motel6.  This room was relatively not cheap, it should have at least been cut-rate given out only as a last resort.  The next time I am in Pittsburgh it will not include a stay at The Priory, which is a shame because besides this issue it is a nice place. But if you are considering staying at this hotel why take the chance. While the party continues and I am getting no help from the front desk I am tempted to lower my rating to a single star. But, hey, I can always catch up on my sleep tomorrow night.
booked through a third party site and they tried to stick us in a queen room even though they had plenty of kings available. definitely gave attitude about it but \"upgraded\" anyway. he wanted to charge me the difference but I refused. just bad service overall. no one to help with bags morning or night. even the day front desk person was short with us and rude. I couldn't wait to get out of there. the room was clean and charming. the area is definitely rough. I wouldn't stay here again.
First I would like to say the Pasta Too of old had good food, this was just average.  The italian and mushroom steak hoagies weren't that great.  The steak was so chopped that it kept falling out of the bun.  The pizza wasn't that good either.  The prices are higher than the food was good. $6.25 for 7\" italian and $7.50 for 7\" mushroom steak. So not worth it but I guess they figure they can get from the people who work at the hospital and with all the new housing going up.  I will not get anything from there again.
Small, overcrowded, unfriendly staff.\n\nThe food is okay - typical Italian fair that could be better seasoned. \n\nThere are much better options nearby, but in a pinch, it's decent.
OK, so based off the recommendation of my date, I thought  that I would like Legends North Shore but I left dinner disappointed and in need of a mint to mask the over abundance of garlic (salt) that I had consumed.\n\nThis restaurant is in a prime location on the North Side and has plenty of opportunity to capitalize on the growth in the area. That said, allow me to jump into some of the minuses:\n\nBeans and Greens appetizer - I love beans and greens, but was shocked by the amount of garlic the chef added. Actually, I don't think it was garlic...I believe it was garlic salt (a huge no-no) Don't get me wrong, I love garlic, but there was so much that it killed a simple, rustic dish.\n\nBlackened Shrimp Pasta - My date and I shared this dish. This dish tasted as though an entire container of garlic salt had accidentally been dropped onto the plate before being served. The shrimp and pasta, however, were cooked well. Had the chef backed off the garlic he would have presented a more edible dinner. i was not in the mood to send this dish back to the kitchen, but did call this out to the waitress once our meal concluded.\n\nThe restaurant is cute, in a great location, and service is friendly and prompt. These are all important things to me, but quality and taste takes precedence.  Unfortunately, Legends just didn't do it for me.\n\nWould I go back? Most likely not. There are far too many other Italian restaurants in Pittsburgh that I would like to give a try.
It's close to my neighborhood, hence the 2 star. \nbut seriously, it's like Walmart stuff at Whole Food's price. for the same item, it charges substantially higher (~40%+) than Target -which is not even known for cheap grocery.  \nI still go there because it's close, and I go for specific items on sale so it's not bad. But overall the store is way too pricy - for no good reason! which is probably the reason it gets on my nerve the most! over the years I've frequented many pricy groceries: Andronico's (CA), Morton Williams (NY), Wegman (MD), and Whole Foods everywhere - and these stores all had one common quality: they carry nice stuff! When I want to cook pretentious gourmet food, they have every ingredient ready. I don't expect every store to be cheap and carry good stuff like Trader Joe's, ergo I was never the one to oppose stores just because they're pricy. But this one is just pricy unjustifiably. You can over charge me on truffle oil and duck confit, but I'm not happy to be charged double on corn syrup and canola oil. Same brand, same item, nearly double the price. even the CVS downtown don't overcharge as much so don't say this is for the location. This is the definition of a rip off.
This Giant Eagle is one of the few that only use the Giant Eagle name, but is owned independently of the Giant Eagle company. It is a franchise, which may explain why it is such a dump.\n\nTo shop here, you first have to get into the store, which means dodging bums and people selling EBT cards just outside the store. \n\nOnce inside, you have to find a cart that has all 4 wheels, travels in a straight line, doesn't make squeeky noises, and isn't wet or filled with trash. \n\nThen go to the produce department. Whenever I go to the produce department of any other grocer, I notice some of the produce has fallen on the floor, and some has rolled under the shelves. I'm almost positive that this produce is collected and sent to the Cedar ave Giant Eagle.\n\nThis store is not clean.\n\nTo its credit, they still have people who bag groceries for you, and the staff are decent, especially considering the demoralizing nature of their work environment. The location is also very good.\n\nIf the Cedar Ave Giant Eagle wants to improve, it needs to hire security to keep the parking lot clear of panhandlers, get new shopping carts, get rid of the self-checkout registers, improve their produce department, and have an overnight cleaning team. Until then, they will keep pushing me and everyone else to shop with their competition.
I hate to agree with the other poor reviews of this branch, but this is definitely far from the best Eagle in the city. I'll say upfront that I never felt unsafe the three times that I have been here. However, the quality of the produce from my experience is pretty poor. The lines are always long and take forever to get through. Furthermore, the stuff in the bakery and goodies are below par. I'd recommend stopping in another Giant Eagle if you can. However, this location DOES have a Redbox, which is nice.
I've had a lot of bad experiences at this store. The employees have been rude so much that I just expect them to roll there eyes when I get deli meat. Lines are long, and there's always a crowd of people hanging out front begging for money, cigarettes, or trying to sell their food stamps. \n\nI have filed a complaint with corporate about this store before and I was contacted by a manager. I do have to say, that this manager really, sincerely cares about this store and customer experience. I talked to him for 20 minutes and he was polite and friendly. His name is Mr. Youngblood, and he urges you to ask for a manager if you're having a bad experience.\n\nProduce selection is terrible, there is not a meat counter in store, and it's just feels dirty. \n\nThis is the only grocery store on the north side, so it's not as easy to \"just go somewhere else\" sometimes when you get off work, you don't want to drive 10 minutes to go to Kuhns on mcknight.
I went here on a Saturday night with a few friends.  They had  a DJ so there was a cover of $3 - boo!  I'm really adverse to covers unless there's something really great going on and considering I had never been in this place before, I was taking a chance.  For those that know me, I'm not the gambling kind.  \n\nBut I thought ok it's just $3 so it's not like I'd be going broke.  The music was fairly loud which made it difficult to talk and no one was dancing.  It wasn't overly crowded which made it easy to get drinks.  \n\nAm I glad I checked this place out - sure, but have I been to better dance clubs/bars - yes.  If you're in the area and looking for something to do, then check it out, but I wouldn't make a special trip to go here.
Get me some Peanutzz!! We decided on a whim to try something different for a bar and this place indeed was. Saturdays there is a cover for the DJ which was $3. This didn't seem so bad to me after coming from other cities where the covers are $15 and $20 and higher but I feel like the place could use the money. Peanutz is a small venue. The bar area is narrow and cramped then to the left of it there is a dark area where the DJ is along with some tables and then the stairs to the bathroom. If you weren't at the bar then people were just sitting at the tables starring at the DJ or at you... Maybe one or two people were dancing to the music. I thought the music was awesome though - a mix of old school and underground hip hop. Beers were so cheap - I think we paid $5 for three draft beers. Woot!! However some folks were smoking and the bathrooms were gross. My jacket took a few days to air out the smell of the smoke. I won't be returning even if Peanutz offered some peanuts.
I am a pretty easygoing guy. I would've overlooked the fact(s) that:\n\n1. Jim Beam is your only bourbon. \n2. For some reason two drinks came out to $9.90.* \n3. Even with only 10 people in the bar, the music was absolutely deafening. \n4. You charge a $3 cover for no discernible reason.\n5. Rolling blunts is apparently kosher inside the bar, but sharing, not so much.\n\nHowever, I can't let this slide: your claw machine is BULLSHIT. That is the weakest claw of all time, and there's no chance it is EVER picking up anything in that cage. I feel violated, and I want my dollar back. \n___________\n\n*I think that's some sort of weird PA tax thing.
To start, the bathrooms are DISGUSTING, with that being said I would never EAT anything here again.  This is a neighborhood bar for me.  I've been in here a handful of times, the crowd is never rowdy or out of control.  The bar area is clean and the restaurant has a very nice mellow atmosphere. I normally only drink Coor Light drafts which are 2.75!!! that's a lot of beer for less than 3 dollars.  I have had the wings in the past, before I saw what a disaster the bathrooms were.  They fry their wings to order and they come out hot and fresh. \n\nThe patrons are a older work crowd, not too may youngsters here.  \nI have enjoyed myself here and will probably be going back again this weekend.
I really wasn't thrilled with our meal here. The service was fine, although a bit slow for a not-so-busy Wednesday night. We started with the breaded zucchini, which was about 90% breading, 10% zucchini. The breading was much too heavy and you could barely taste the vegetable.\n\nI had the parmesan crusted chicken with pasta, which seemed to be coated in the same breading they used on the zucchini, still too heavy and altogether flavorless. The chicken was cooked perfectly though, it just needed some spices and salt and pepper for goodness sake. The pasta was cooked well and the sauce was fine though. My husband was not thrilled with his pasta primavera, which was, strangely enough, very spicy (though the server did warn us about this beforehand, to her credit) and again, not much flavor and many of the veggies not cooked thoroughly.
The food is good and the portions are large.  The service is terrible.  The servers are just \"too cool,\" to show any sort of hospitality.  No personality or spark.  I don't know if they hate working there or hate serving people.  It's puzzling.  Why be in the service business if you have a bad attitude?  I have been here a couple of times and it doesn't change.  They just look at you blankly, like they don't understand what you are saying.  I've never had a staring contest with a hostess before.  It's bizarre.  I wonder if they are all on Xanax...
I feel bad about giving this place such a meh review but every time I go that's exactly how I feel when I leave. Atria's is one of those places that I've never had any type of memorable service experience or food experience for that matter.\n\nI can't say the food is bad, but it's not really great either. I will say the service is always so. It's almost as if they don't realize you have other places to go; you can just sit at their restaurant all day. On the upside the busboy's and girls are hounding your table filling your water glass after taking a sip. So if you're a horse you won't go thirsty.\n\nHonestly though. you are better off eating the park. I mean who doesn't love Manny's BBQ?
The food is acceptable. They have a pretty wide range, but narrow the menu on Pirates game days. I tried the seared ahi tuna. It was good, but nothing memorable. The location appears to be the best thing about the place. Sitting outside on a warm evening, looking at the city skyline and seeing people walk around before a Pirates game is an interested dinner experience. But don't go for the menu.
I wasn't expecting 4 star service. We walked in and had to wait 5 minutes before one of the servers noticed us since the hostess wasn't at her post. He took us to the banquet room and seated us at the last table in the front. The tables had plastic table cloths that have seen better days ours had holes in it and still had some caked on super stain sauce in one area. Then we waited 20 minutes before our waitress came to greet us. She took our drink order and our dinner order. (pretty simple since it was a prix fix menu with only choices for soup or salad and a choice of ham or turkey and either Apple or Pumpkin Pie). She brought the drinks right away. Then 10 minutes for the salad/soup -- very tasty, but no rolls were delivered to go with and no sign of the waitress. One of the employees goes out the emergency exit door located directly behind me (BLAST OF COLD AIR) Only after finishing the first course did she bring the rolls/butter and didn't clear the dirty plates. Another 15 minutes passed before the waitress stopped by the table and cleared the dirty dishes. (THE HOSTESS COMES IN FROM OUTSIDE THROUGH THE DOOR WITH A BLAST OF COLD AIR) A minute later she came by and said our main course would be along in a minute and she proceeded to go out the door directly behind me. (MORE COLD AIR) The main course was delivered by a food runner. The turkey was tasty and just a little on the dry side and needed more gravy, but there was no sign of our waitress to even ask for more gravy. Eating as slowly as possible so as to have the opportunity to get gravy for the turkey there simply was no attention paid to us. (ANOTHER EMPLOYEE GOES THROUGH THE DOOR, MORE COLD AIR) Finally the waitress comes over and asks how was it, I explain that the cold air is too much to handle. THE EMPLOYEE WHO WENT OUT CAME BACK IN AND WE ALL GET BLASTED BY COLD AIR. She replies it is what it is and shrugs and walks away. She must have said something to the manager, because he comes over to ask how our meal was. I reply that it was just OK, that the food was good for the most part (he gave a shocked reply because I didn't say it was great) but that I was disturbed with the number of times the employees kept using the door to go outside to smoke. He seemed shocked to learn that that door was being used at all and said he'd put a stop to it. We said that we usually tip 100% on holiday meals like this since the workers have to give up a day with their family but that since the staff didn't seem to care as much about us, so we would not be doing 100% tip this time. I explained that we don't expect any kind of comp, but that he needed to know that his employees were making the dining room uncomfortable by using the emergency exit for their smoke breaks and social encounters. He said he was sorry for our experience and left the table. Our waitress eventually stopped by and we requested our pie packed to go. She delivered the pie and the bill at the same time. -- it isn't over yet. . . .  While in the process of signing the bill the hostess comes over to request the chairs at our table. I explain to her that we are leaving. She was very impatient and said she only needed a minute to take the chairs and I scolded her saying that we are leaving right away and to give us 30 seconds to sign the check and she can have all the chairs at our table she scuffed off to take chairs from an empty table and blocked our attempt to exit while she was struggling to move the chair she grabbed. We chose to exit through the main dining room and bar as should be the practice for all patrons and employees. Like I said to the manager, we consider ourselves to be fairly regular patrons of Atria's PNC Park, and Atria's Fox Chapel -- but this was the worst service I've ever for an Atria's Restaurant. I don't want anything for publishing this review other than people to be highly aware of the lack of common sense by the staff on this particular day. I'll eat at Atria's again but it will be with some trepidation and with high caution that they'll probably screw something up so I have to be on high alert to get what I pay for. Posting this on Facebook and to yelp and tripadvisor might help get the owner's attention. The place could be great if they just had proper training, rules and regulations for their staff and a dose of common sense.
As your standard restaurant, Atria's has no personality: the food is blah, the service is eh, and nothing is really all that memorable.  The patio and it's proximity to the ball parks are its saving grace.  \n\nNow, let's talk about when we reserved a room for a bridal shower...  We had a fixed menu for a group of about 50 ladies.  I understand that.  But when the bride asks for no tomatoes, you as a server do not say, \"No substitutions!\" in your meanest voice.  Lighten up, it's her day.  I ended up just taking the tomatoes off for her--and just chalked it up to another maid of honor duty.  The server also kept clearing the bride's drinks while she mingled.  This was annoying, but at least we had paid a flat fee for drinks, so it wasn't the hugest deal.\n\nOverall, the server for the bride's table was just awful and kept treating us like little children.  Yes, the table was the bridal party and the bride's cousins.  Yes, we are all under 30.  But we are also young professionals and the ones who booked the event.  The servers who waited on the rest of the tables containing the mothers, aunts, great aunts, and grandmothers were polite...even when my near-senile grandmother started yelling about bandits.  Later, another server apologized on behalf of our bad server and mumbled that, \"he just must be on his period.\"\n\nWhile Atria's is fine for a glass of wine before a Pirate's game if a table is open outside, I certainly would never book it again for a private function.
Located right next to PNC Park, so is a decent place to get a beer and some grub prior to game day. That and outdoor seating are main perks. Otherwise, food and prices are not worth a stop. This place will fill up on game day, but should be avoided when the Pirates aren't in town. It isn't a BAD experience. If you are siting outside and you have a view of Pittsburgh, it can't be that bad.
Came in late night during Light the Night, just for for drinks and a snack. Service was fast, but the salad and cup of soup were disappointing. The chopped salad had weird cheap ingredients like celery and carrot. I was excited about the crab bisque, but they must have been running low and it must have been half sherry because it tasted like I was taking a shot of cheap white wine with every bite. Hope the dinner fare is better.
Can't get an order right! 6 of the last 8 times we ordered they have messed it up.   I know, each time I forgive them and think they can't possibly mess up again, but they do.  Not only that, but they quote 45 minutes then take anywhere from 1-2 hours to deliver.  Wont be ordering from here again!
I lived off of pickles in college!  The only downfall was their delivery time.  It always took almost an hour and a half to receive my food, 10 minutes down the road. \n\nI moved, still in delivery distance, and had a terrible experience.\nI called my order in and had a total of 11 and some change.  I told them I'd be laying cash.  When the delivery guy arrived he couldn't stop complaining about walking up my steps and I would have to meet him downstairs next time.  When I handed him a 20 he told me, sorry I don't have any change.  So he walked off with a 9 dollar tip after being terribly late, rude, and forgot my drink.\n\nGood food, but rude service on the phone and in person. \nI have not been back since.
I tried Pickles tonight for the first time.  I called ahead to order a gyro calzone and was told 20 minutes.  I got there and was told it would be another 10.   It was another 20 before I got my food.  In a bad frame of mind, I tried my food.  I must admit it was good.  Not great, but good.  I didn't have an issue with the place or the other patrons.  I dig that kind of place.  But if you tell someone a time, you should be able to deliver.  The food itself warrents a higher rating, but the overall experience was a disappointment.
Don't do it! \n\nThe ribs are average at best. The sides are just as average as well. The bones are small and barely have any meat on them at all. The greens were decent and the macaroni salad was awful with tons of water in it. \n\nThis place is almost as bad as the now closed Mr Willie's BBQ in Squirrel Hill! I had such high hopes for this place. Oh well. That's what I get for trying to cheat on Showcase BBQ in Homewood. Now those are the best ribs in Pittsburgh and some of the best in the country! \n\nThey don't take debit or credit cards. Cash Only!
I have been a Steelers fan as long as I can remember. I love the Steelers as a sports team, BUT this week I am very disappointed. Tisk Tisk Steeler higher ups. This does have to do directly with Steelers policy not Heinz Field.\n\n I have a 9 month old daughter and I was so looking forward to taking her to her very first Steeler game! Now, she is a very very good baby and in social situations I have been able to take her everywhere. She loves people and loves to take in new and exciting experiences. The point of this is that she would be well behaved, laughing at a Steelers game, and most likely clapping with rowdy fans not throwing a temper tantrum and disrupting the game for others. I would take her out if she was upset, believe me I get it!\n\nI feel that The Steeler organization is trying to weed out the younger crowd by charging full price for a ticket and a seat that a baby can't even use. Most kid friendly places don't charge for Children 2 and under, that includes Aiirlines in the US, museums, fairs, Zoos, Concert Venues, Pitt games(at Heinz Field) Baseball games(PNC park), and many more less opulent businesses.  \n\nAs far as the Steelers are concerned even though your child won't be using a seat they have to buy a full price ticket. I asked about Club level seating and yes especially in the club. Which would be the best place to walk around and entertain a youngster if fussy. If you purchase non club seating then it doesn't matter where your baby sits if you have lower level seats. Getting 3 seats together can be much pricier than a pair and are harder to find. I asked why this was the policy and an unfriendly person told me that \"Steeler Policy states that gate operator is not incumbent to assess a childs age of 2 or under so they do not have the resources available for gate entry for people in line entering the stadium.\"\n\nSorry but considering the Pirates allow free entry under 2 and offer discounted tickets for children under 2 if they want to participate in the activities for children's days. So NOT COOL STEELERS!
My friend lives near here so I came to satisfy my deli sandwich craving. The inside is super dingy deli/convenience store, so I was excited for a real, down and dirty deli sandwich. They have a lot of weird items in their grocery section which can be kind of fun to look through.\n\nI got an Italian \"hoagie\" as I feel is the appropriate term for this ultra-Pittsburgh spot. It was bad. Totally skimpy on the meat, and it had American cheese and mayo, which don't go well with Italian meats at all...provolone and oil & vinegar would have made way more sense. The bread was a squishy white bun. I mean, I still ate it, but I didn't really enjoy it. It made me kind of sad. It was just a sad, floppy excuse for a sandwich. At least it was cheap?\n\nMaybe I should have gotten the chipped ham instead, since that's what they are famous for. I also suspect the location in the North Hills has to be at least marginally better...this Isaly's is clearly past its prime.
O my Pittsburgh Pirates.  What a storied history you have!  But the last time you went to the post season was in 1992,  and I remember it well.    I worked as a ticket taker at the old Three Rivers Stadium and I have such fond memories of working there.  I was 17 when you won your last divisional title and I don't think you've had a winning season in my entire adult life.\n\nDon't get me wrong, my Bucs!  I do love you so much.  In a way, I have to.  See, you're like the boy I knew in grammar school who was such a sweet kid, but he was constantly failing his classes--and he lived in a nice house!  \n\nLet's take a look at your records since 2000.  I warn you dear Pirates--it won't be pretty.  But it's something you have to come to terms with:\n\n2001:  62-100 (last pl)\n2002:  72-89 (4th Pl)\n2003:  75-87 (4th pl)\n2004:  72-89 (5th pl)\n2005:  67-95 (last)\n2006:  67-95 (5th pl)\n2007:  68-94 (last)\n2008:  67-95 (last)\n2009:  62-99 (last)\n2010:  56-101 (last)*     *As of 09-29-2010\n\nSo that's six seasons in last place, two 100 loss seasons, and this season has been the worst so far.\n\nYes, I'll still go to your games next season.  I'll still go with my husband, my co-workers, and my Girl Posse.  My dad and I will still have our father-daughter nights out here.  But like the parents of that sweet little boy in grammar school with the failing grades, you're really trying my patience.  And don't forget, the Washington Wild Things have been wooing me for the longest!
I wouldn't pay attention to the Trib's news coverage, since it's mostly far-right propaganda. Two stars for their decent sports coverage - Mike Prisuta and Joe Starkey are worth reading.
Although I've never had any of their other menu items except their gyro, I wish I would have gone elsewhere. Since I can only comment on their gyro; here goes... First, the meat is embroiled with fatty particles (it's fake meat or something), second; they don't include enough dressing, third; there are way, way too many onions, forth; there were only two very small slices of tomatoe, fifth; the feta cheese is not crumbled but in a patty, sixth; they just pile the stuff on top of a pita, - to be quite honest, it just tastes bad.
\"grossest hostess\"\nOkay, so you know when you go into  place and it's close to closing time?  You aren't sure whether the staff will be cordial and inviting or straight up rude.  Well my wife and I went into Millers at 9:15 pm for dinner.  The hostess was incredibly rude directly off of the bat.  she said \"ughhhh you know it's close to closing time, right\"?  my wife said, \"what time do you close\"?  The older, short blond curly haired hostess with glasses said \"we close at ten\".  TEN???  TEN????  They weren't closing for 45 minutes!!!!  This was the second time she did this to us and it will be the last because they have lost our business for good.  We even heard a phone ring at quarter to ten and she didn't even answer the phone, she just picked it up and snarled \"closed\" and hung up on the person!  Our server however, was spot on and the food was decent but the hostess or manager or whatever she was left the worst taste in our moths and spoiled Millers Seafood forever.  If you go to Miller's Seafood and you see her at the front, turn and run!
I have eaten here twice. Both times I thought the food was sub-par. The first time was a birthday lunch that was lousy, but I was feeling under the weather, so I gave it another try about a year later for dinner. It was just as lousy as the lunch. My wife definitely agreed, and although we can walk there in 15 minutes, we will never eat there again.
Okay so I tried this place twice before writing a review to give them a fair shot. Unfortunately, the second visit wasn't any better.\n\nI will start with the good. Service is pretty good.\n\nThe place smells of smoke. Why? Because you can smoke in the bar and there is an opening from the bar into the restaurant. This has to be a violation of the no smoking in dining areas in Pittsburgh. Gross. \n\nThe floor (carpeted) is so old that it is sticky and worn down. Walking on it with shoes on disgusted me. The walls have wall paper torn off throughout the place. Please, remodel! At least make me feel like the place is clean. If I feel like it is dirty in the dining hall, I can't imagine it's clean in the kitchen.\n\nNow for the food. I am pretty picky about seafood. It needs to be fresh and cooked correctly. Don't get the Salmon or Tuna Steak. Tuna and Salmon should be easy to get right if you just season and cook it properly. Both tasted very fishy to me. Salmon that tastes overly fishy, to me, screams \"this fish is not fresh\". Mashed potatoes are not made from real potatoes. Don't get them unless you are looking to eat boxed potatoes. I get it, you wanna have a mom and pop shop. But to do that you need to have great food.\n\nOverall, I just don't think this place is good, and don't want to go back.
I've been there twice, and they have yet to impress me. The decor is old and dingy at best, the seats are gross, and the carpet looks to be 30 years old and identified to my grandma's. My biggest issue was the food. I just assumed that a sea food restaurant would serve fresh fish, but I was sadly mistaken. Every meal I, or friends, have had here was poorly prepared, greasy, and clearly had been frozen for an extended period of time.\nThe only plus side of the place was that it was dirt cheap, but be prepared to get what you pay for.
I don't really mind dive places because there are times that they have really good food.  The place is dated and could use updating.\n\nThe waitress was good.  I think she knew we weren't all that pleased with our food even though we told her it was good.\n\nThe food....my daughter-in-law had the shrimp scampi.  We are pros at making our own at home, but when it was served, I told her that there are variations to it.  Her first bite she made a sour face.  My son and I then tasted it...understood the face after that.  Way too much lemon juice in it, soaked in oil and not quite sure what the seasoning was, but seemed like pesto.  The pasta was overcooked and the shrimp just sort of were there. \n\nMy son and I had the fried seafood platter.  Aside from overcooked breading and soaked in grease, the oysters were raw, and the battered fish had no flavor.  The breaded shrimp tasted weird too.  Needless to say, none of us finished our food. Underneath the food, the plate had a puddle of grease. \n\nOn the upside, the coleslaw, bread, and crab cake was good.  The make and cheese was edible, but seemed to comparable to Stauffer's.\n\nThis was our first, and more than likely, our last, visit.  For a $65 dollar meal, it wasn't worth $10. .
I worked at millers back in the nineties. The fish was fresh every day from wholeys, the bread was fresh everyday from mancini's, and the perogies were made by little old babushka women at St. George's down the street. \nIt was a great place to eat. People cared about the food and it showed. I can only attribute it's decline to a change in ownership. \nI stopped in to satisfy a craving for fish and was very disappointed by the grease pile I got instead. \nI used to be proud to cook there. Now I wouldn't put it on a resume for fear that people have experienced it lately.
We just moved in a couple blocks away and thought we'd try them out. Their prices are great but, seriously, worst customer service I've ever seen. I walked in and the guy had to finish his cell phone game before helping me. I get home and realize we were given the wrong pizza. When I called to see if they had our correct one the guy tells me that's what we ordered. I assured him we didn't, I was there when my girlfriend called the order in. He just said \"sorry man\" and didn't offer any solutions. So we just picked off the garbage toppings that we didn't order and threw most of it away. It would've taken very little effort to fix it for us. All this after it took them an hour to make the thing. I'd go back if I were desperate but it's seriously amateur hour.
Too much cheese on their pizzas, and the customer service is incredibly poor.  This is nothing new, we have been in Brighton Heights for many years.  My husband LOVES their buffalo chicken pizza, but after his last experience waiting over an hour for pick up, we would only order from Chubby's if every other local pizza joint was closed.
Kuhn's is really the only convenient grocery for where we live and they do have a great selection of higher end lunch meats, etc., but I had a terrible experience with their poultry. It took several minutes to sort through the grey, fatty boneless, skinless chicken breasts and when I finally found a package that didn't appear to have spoiled, I came home to find that the breasts had never been cut into breasts. There were several large pieces with a ton of trimming to be done. Drive the extra distance to Giant Eagle if you need anything from the meat department.
I like the double cooked wings, but they're like chick wings they're so mini.  The thing that turns me off the most about this place is they have cardboard disposable bowls for their complimentary popcorn - however they get upset if u try and use it to put wing bones or other things in it because they insist on wiping out & reusing the disposable bowls. Disgusting & totally unsanitary IMO. If they insist on reusing those, imagine where they are cutting corners behind closed kitchen doors. I'd go back for bottled beer, that's about it.
... Look... I hate writing a less than stellar review of a business. It actually makes my cold goth baby heart sad. No one WANTS to go somewhere and get bad service, thats just ludicrous. (Not Ludacris, close but not the same.)\n\nI have just recently moved to Beechview and the best part of moving to a new part of this wonderful city is giving new businesses a try! I have sampled so many tasty and amazing new food items and coffee drinks etc etc. I am always in search of a non-smoking bar where I can hang out, eat, drink, and get to know the locals. I prefer small bars with \"yinzers\" as they tend to be a true gauge of a neighborhood for me. \n\nWe have many friends in this area, which means that we got some great tips before we even moved in about different types of food, stores, laundromats, and bars. One of these tips, repeated from friend to friend, was The Huddle. As the name implies it is a bar where you can be certain you can watch a sports game of whatever sport-ball type you're interested in. It is indeed non-smoking, a handful of tables suitable for 4 people and a \"U\" shaped bar right in the center as soon as you come in. It is a cash only establishment with an ATM on site for quick transactions. The have free popcorn from a popcorn machine which makes the place smell amazing. It's been around quite a while which means that there is a great group of locals who frequent the establishment. \n\nThis is truly everything I need in a local bar. We had been in for the very first time for drinks shortly after moving in and happened to be in there on one of their two weekly wing nights. This are not the wee tiny wings, more a weird in between of some of the \"full\" size wings I've had other places that clearly came from giant monster mutant chickens (I mean maybe they were goose wings, who even knows... they were huge) and the teeny tiny wing night wings you find most other places. They have two options; buffalo (sloppy) and \"tanned\" which are buffalo then cooked again so they are drier and crisp and un-freaking-believeable. The prices are mega cheap and it's so filling and delicious we've been back more than once for them. I like this place so much we have even taken the handsome-boyfriend's mother there when she was in town for the weekend. (P.S. She loved it too!) \n\nMy dear sweet lovely readers, here is where I have to talk about something less than all of the amazing parts I've already mentioned. Tonight, both ravenous from too little food and too much work-day, we trekked up the monster that is Coast Avenue for beers and food and a chill environment (that would undoubtably involve pre-season football). We walk in the door and aside from an employee (other than the bartender) and a few people in the back at tables, we are the only patrons aside from one regular. We belly up to the bar on the far side and say our hellos. This is where I get a serious case of the sad. The bartender working seemed annoyed by our presence. Ok, I get it... I work sort of indirectly with the public I have days where I can't handle people. It happens! As customers come in and sit down, she greets them with a warmth that was clearly lacking. Ok. That's sort of disappointing but still fine. When we got to the point that we asked for a menu three times while she retrieved menus and took orders for the people next to us an hour after we came in... thats where I start to have an issue with the service. Eventually we decided to leave because I was tipping over the line to \"hangry\" and was afraid I'd lose my temper after the 3rd time we had asked for menus and didn't get them while she continued to warmly greet other patrons and provide them menus and take their orders while refilling our beers seemed to be an annoyance to her to the point of not even asking if we wanted another or the same beer and just taking the glass and starting to fill it (wherein I had to stop her because I hadn't asked her for another one and actually just wanted the tab cashed out).\n\nYes, of course I'll give it another try, I want this to be my local hang out bar. My service in sitting at the table or being served by the woman I presume is the owner has been great. The food is amazing. The prices are great. Don't let me down, The Huddle.
sushi was dry and unenjoyable. the place itself is clean and the decor was minimal.  I was not a fan and probably won't be back.
Well, finally tried the place with the Green door and High Step!  Always seem to be people going in and out.  Heard from one of my kids it was just OK, cause he had take out once with some buddies.  Well, we ventured in and ordered a few things so we could share.  General Ts0's chicken was  to be crisp and Ouch spicy...Well, the outer crust was crisp, chicken was hard..hard to chew, tasteless and somewhat sweet sauce???  The Shrimp Lo Mein was Ok but the shrimp was overcooked.  The Moo Shu Pork was forgettable.
Yeah, don't order from here, unless it's for dumplings. since they arev fast and the potstickers are really good. Everything else we had sucked. Shrimp and Scallop with garlic was bland as hell. The Beef on a Stick was liked eating a marinated shoe with a skewer in it. Yuk.
Brought the family to Tom's last weekend, and was disappointed.  On the positive side, the prices were excellent, much better than the canonical breakfast spots in the strip.  However, the food was heavy, greasy, and made from mediocre ingredients.  I didn't care for the spinach  / feta omelet, the kids' pancakes were heavy, and the home fries were greasy.  True, the place felt 50s, but kind of worn out.   We won't go again.
I know Tom's is a South Hills staple, but other than the convenience of it being open 24 hours a day, I'm not impressed. Even by greasy spoon standards this isn't great. The wait staff is hit and miss. Some are friendly and attentive (there's an awesome Greek lady there that I love), but just as often drinks sit unrefreshed for an entire meal and I can't get anyone's attention to prepare the check. The food is really bland (hard to make a boring grilled cheese, but they manage it) and priced pretty high for what it is. I've been there five or six times in an effort to find a reliably good menu item, but I've given up. It's just bad.
Tom's Diner is one of those places I really, really want to like. You see it when driving down the street and it looks like a cool, retro place that got picked up from the past and dropped in the present next to the chain stores and abandoned buildings lining the rest of the street. If only the experience here matched the charming exterior.\n\nI don't have a problem with the diner food, first of all; it's not great, but hey, for cheap eats, it's not bad. They make a mean French onion soup, I admit. \n\nMy problem is more with the maintenance of the place. The windows are dirty, seats are busted, tables aren't properly cleaned - those things really detract from the experience and make the place look run-down and a bit unwelcoming.\n\nThe biggest offense for me, though? The service. My waitress? It took her three trips to remember I had ordered an additional drink (yes, we reminded her), by which time I was almost done with my meal. Also: this diner does not have ketchup at its tables. This would be okay if the servers remembered to bring it out with all meals. They do not. \n\nSeriously, guys: you operate in Pittsburgh. Ketchup is mandatory.\n\nI may poke in for a quick bite again, but I'll be honest with my final opinion: considering how mediocre my experience was on a slow Saturday night, I suspect some fast food chains could knock Tom's out of the park on a busy day at this diner.
I came in and a waitress came to our table , took our order and then walked away. Another lady came to us and asked what we wanted , then the first girl came back and asked us again!!! The restaurant has 4 people. This is not good! Write it down you dumb blonde
Sorry, but our pizza was cold.  All nine cuts of it.  And the garlic wings didn't taste like garlic.  Maybe it was an off night?
There are only so many ways to make the American bastardized version of a pizza, but for some reason there are as many \"pizza shops\" as there are stars in a clear night sky. As they may be stunning to behold, from afar each one is pretty much the same thing. This shop is another place that tosses sauce and cheese on bread and serves it to their patrons. Ok, so they DO have a slightly different take, throwing the cold shredded cheese onto the pie as soon as the dough is out of the oven. This does not melt the cheese, and I do see how the pizza would be cold after heaping on the cheese.  Some customers may like it, me, not so much. I tried the Italian hoagie.  It was a good size and the meat was flavorful. But that's about it. They put oil on the sandwich, but no other dressing. I expected a nice tangy flavor to compliment the meat but was disappointed. My date ordered a hot sausage hoagie. I didn't sample it, he liked it, but it was way too messy. The bread got soggy and the darn thing fell apart. It looked more like tomato soup with sausage than a sandwich.  The staff did seem pretty nice, even trying to keep a smile while dealing with the stress of a busy crowded restaurant. The dining room is also a bit cramped. There are plenty of booths, but the tables are rather close together and hard to maneuver between. Hungry patrons also are constantly getting up to visit the soda fountain. When they are busy, it is a claustrophobic nightmare.
This is the kind of pizza where the toppings are added after the crust is cooked. Cheese included. It's a novelty, and for some folks it's their favorite pizza. The taste is good, if a little weird, but for me, it didn't satisfy my pizza craving.\n\nThis location was crowded and the wait was long, but the people were nice.
I tried the \"cold cheese and toppings\" slice that Beto's is famous for.  If you have heard about there style of serving pizza, and are wondering what the punch line is, there isn't one.   They make a big square tomato-sauce pizza and throw cold shredded cheese and other cold toppings on it, and that's it. There's no secret ingredient or special something  that makes it tastes like anything other than what you would get it you grabbed pizza fixings from your kitchen and forgot to bake them.\n  \n I guess a lot of people like it, and more power too them. But I don't get it. Ramblin' Boy didn't get it. I see zero reason to agree with people that say that this is the \"best\" pizza in the region. \n\n Maybe their hoagies will be better.
Canned green peppers!?! Way too much cheese. The yinzers seem to like it. The average BMI in that place was probably close to 30 and no wonder; the food is incredibly unhealthy. The pizza crust tasted like Pizza Hut. Maybe this place gets good reviews because it's a unique twist on unhealthy; loads of uncooked mozzarella.
Wow, just wow. That was without a doubt the worst \"pizza\" I've ever had in my life. Maybe you would like it. Do you like all of your toppings out of a can? I didn't even know you could get canned green bell peppers. Do you like your slices of pizza to be covered with a huge several inch thick mound of uncooked mozzarella cheese? If answer is yes, then maybe this place is for you. It is definitely not for me.
I don't get it. Cold cheese and cold pepperoni on my pizza? Why does Pittsburgh have to be so weird? I just got accustomed to fries and coleslaw on my sandwiches but a guy has to draw the line somewhere. And what's with everyone bagging up their extra cheese and taking it home? \n\nMy gut tells me this would be an awesome pizza if only they'd cook it.
The pizza was fine. My issue is that, if you aren't like other pizza places with your pricing, you should maybe tell me that when I call to order a medium with two toppings. We ended up with a $36 pizza that will take us days to eat, when I THOUGHT I ordered a medium with pepperoni and sausage on half. All young kids working there. No professionalism. No explaination of anything. 50 cents per slice for every topping? Well yeah we got 14 slices, so do the math. NOT a medium. Boxed up horribly, so on our 3 minute ride home, the box was leaking grease out of the corner. I was so upset over spending nearly $40 on something that I thought would be cheap and easy, I couldn't even enjoy the pizza. Its just whatever pizza anyway. \n\nSave your money and go to Slice on Broadway. 1/3 of the price,  staff is wonderful,  and they have a liquor license and fair prices. Slice should get half the publicity this place gets. \n\nNever mind that I've lived in Pittsburgh all my life and have never heard of Betos until I moved 3 streets behind it. NOT a \"Pittsburgh institution.\"
First off, had my boyfriend not told me that every topping on the pizza was cold (including the cheese!), I would have never known. They should really have an illuminated sign that advises the customers.\n\n I'm sure you have gathered that this pizza is kind of presented exactly like frozen pizza from the store except the bread is cooked. I think the appeal to this place is that it is different - Some people go to restaurants where you can cook your own food because it's different but the fact of the matter is that when I go out to eat, I don't expect to cook it myself and I don't expect it to come half cooked. \n\nHad this pizza been cooked, I feel like it would be subpar. The crust was very crispy and the sauce was a standard tomato (no extra hints of basil or pepper). The peperoni reminded me of the peperoni that comes in Lunchables - actually the whole pizza reminded me of a Lunchable (except a pie made of 28 cuts is $35.28 with $.50 per topping a CUT!) To be fair, each cut is $1.30 and you only need 3-4 to really, really be full.  They really lay on the toppings - about an inch of cheese, 20 slices of peperoni and a handful of banana peppers for just two cuts with toppings\n. \nI feel that you really need to be in the mood for Betos before you go there. When I am in the mood for pizza, I am heading for the flowing, stringy cheese and the flavors melting together before it hits my mouth. I would eat here again if I get the craving - some people in the restaurant had ordered other menu items that looked to be pretty good. I wouldn't take somewhere here as a Pittsburgh Destination though. \nThere is about 10 tables in the restaurant (booths/tables) ... clean/reputable.
Didn't live up to my expectations at all.  Waste of time and money.  Sloooooow service.
I can't believe this place hasn't been reviewed. If you are thinking about going here know this:\n\nIf you grew up in the South Hills, all the people from high school that turned out to be real losers will be hanging out here. (Hey, I've been there, so I am not throwing stones.)\n\nIt is otherwise your typical South Pittsburgh yinzer bar. There is always a seat, and there are free pretzels.
I've been to Cain's quite a few times, since I live right down the street.\n\n\nThe best times I have had at Cain's consist of myself going into the establishment with the predetermined mentality of spending way too much for drinks ( $7.00 for a Jameson and Ginger!!??) and already being three sheets to the wind. \n\nDon't get me wrong, if you like going to a place that mildly reminds me more of a mosh pit at times than an actual drinking establishment, you would love Cain's. Definitely, avoid going on the weekends.\n\nBut, I will admit that Cain's is an awesome place to post up at the bar, drink a few beers, and catch a Pen's game on one of their million TV's. \n\nBottom line : This place is not a place where you and your buds can go and get poopy drunk at. Cains is, at best, a bar where you stop during a bar crawl for a beer and a shot. \n\nNothing more, and nothing less.
This place is just average. The service is subpar at best and the waitresses always seem rushed. However, their wings and wing flavors are good, and they have so many tv's there isn't a bad seat in the house if you're there for a game. Now that the parking lot across the street is gone, good luck looking for a spot. I would go back, but only for the wings and the spicy cheese bites.
Been here twice. Hate to say it but nothing special. The usual breakfast items but nothing stands out either in preparation or presentation.
While the Dor-Stop is a cute place on a nice tree lined street, I'm not sure what the big fuss is all about. The food was only fair and they don't even have real cream for your coffee. It's that nasty fake nondairy crap. It also gave me the heebeegeebees due to the \"Christianesgue\" motif.
Folks this is very overrated.. they had Guy's Diners Drivein and Dives there only because Guy's parents knew owner. This is very avg food at best. Its nothing special.I wont go back.. Very small and uncomfortable. They have a large sign in window to play on Guy's visit a number of years ago. Dont fall for it.
Ok, so I know this place is somewhat of an institution now because of their Food Network exposure, but I'm going to have to go against the grain here and say that I did not enjoy my Dor-Stop experience.\n\nWe came here many months ago after hearing all of the hype. I'd never been to Dormont before and we were eager to check out this place and the neighborhood in general (side bar: Dormont is adorable! If it were a bit more convenient to where we work and like to play, I would totally live there). \n\nAnyhow, so we get there on a Saturday morning, and the place is packed. No biggie, most good breakfast spots usually have a wait on a weekend morning. I think we waited about 30 mins, which wasn't bad. We're seated, we order, everything is just peachy. Then things started to go sour.\n\nIt had been about 40 minutes since we were seated and we still hadn't received our food. Other diners who were seated after us had received their food and were finishing up. Our waitress hadn't stopped by our table in a long time. I had started to wonder if maybe our ticket was lost (ordinarily I wouldn't think anything of it, but the fact that people seated after us had gotten their food made me think something might have been wrong). Anyway, so the next time we see our waitress walk by, we flag her down and ask her if she knew when our food would be out. We asked politely. We weren't snarky, we weren't mean, we didn't roll our eyes or snap our fingers. It was a simple question, one that I think many would probably ask. And the waitress replied, \"Are you really hungry or just really impatient?\" No hint of a smile on her face. No twinkle in her eyes. It was clear that she wasn't joking (not that it would have been funny anyway). \n\nHmm. Are we really hungry or really impatient? Well, neither...we just wanted to make sure our ticket hadn't gotten lost. We sat in stunned silence, unsure of how we should respond to such a flat-out rude remark. The waitress left, and finally brought our food out about 10 minutes later (and then we never saw her again except for when she dropped off the check). By that point, our appetites were pretty much gone, and we just wanted to leave. So we scarfed down our food and got the heck out of dodge.\n\nI dunno. Maybe the waitress was having a bad day. Maybe she gets asked that question a lot (by actual impatient people) and is sick of hearing it. But we were very polite to her and didn't deserve to be treated like that. I don't care how good your food is (and for the record, the food was okay, but certainly not mind blowing for the all the hype), if you have lousy customer service, I can't support you. And it's a shame, because I really, really wanted to like this place (it looks like such a cute mom and pop place). With so many other great breakfast spots in the Burgh, I'd rather go somewhere that cares about giving their customers a good (or at least not a blatantly bad) experience.
We were in Pittsburgh from out of town and read the reviews so we decided on Don Campiti's Pizza. Urban Spoon rated 91% favorite. This pizza is not good. Honestly, it tastes like Geno's frozen pizza from the grocery store. The pepperoni was very good. The crust was super thin and tasted like a salteen cracker. I've had much better pizza and will be exploring other options next time I'm in the burg.
People really are nuts about their pizza in the 'burgh - this I'm learning. \n\nI ordered a pizza from here because it's in my hood (walking distance, even) and because someone told me it's been their favorite pizza since they were wee little. I think a lot of places in Pit have false-yum status because people are just emotionally attached to things they've eaten for so many years... I don't fault them for that, but this just isn't great pizza, in my opinion.
Disappointed after hearing so many good things. Pizza crust is like a cracker. Hoagie is pretty good, but does not remove the disappointment over the pizza. I think Molly's Pizza next door is a lot better....I won't order from here again.
I am not impressed.  The food was so-so and my boyfriend and I had a coupon purchased that morning from restaurants.com and they wouldn't accept it. I bought it that morning, sorry if it should have been taken off the website but you should honor it. I would not pay their full price for it, but with a nice coupon then maybe it could be worth it. The quality of the food was not good enough to outweigh the service.
Mediocre  Food  Service and Atmosphere.\nBetter to stay clear and save your money.  \nJudging from the empty tables the luster and joy of the Namaste we remembered is no longer.\n\nWe experienced the following sub par  dishes while dining after 8 pm on a Friday evening in an empty restaurant:\n\nBland reheated Samosas.\nFlavorless Malek Paneer. ( the cheese pcs were quite good despite)  inconsistent  and barely there flavors of certainly fresh frozen spinach mix. \nBarely reheated Naan. \n\nWe traveled to eat at Namaste specifically based on delightful past experience. Obviously that feeling is long gone.  The staff  were content to chat with friends and answer frequent texts and cell phone calls while we ate. \n\nThe loud thump of bass from modern indian music with the  electric din of the TV playing Bollywood extracts might have been a nice distraction in a busy restaurant.  Instead  when added to the ding of texts and cell phone calls the loud background noises detracted rather than added  anything to an already mediocre dining experience.
I was very excited to try this place since the closure of Maharaja left us without a good Indian buffet on the side of Pittsburgh where I live, and I wasn't crazy about the restaurant that moved in afterward.  The place was relatively deserted on a Saturday afternoon and we were soon greeted by a woman who asked us what kind of naan we wanted (onion or plain).  The food tasted fairly good but what really turned us off was the woman who worked there and her constant coughing, hacking and wheezing without even covering her mouth!  Clearly she had a nasty cold and should've stayed home that day!  I cringed every time she went back into the kitchen (we could here her back there hacking up a lung) or came over to our table.  It was so unappetizing that we hardly ate anything and got out of there as soon as possible.  I don't think I can go back there given their low standard of hygiene.  Ick, I'm cringing right now thinking of it.  On the plus side though, it did keep me from overeating.  Maybe I should have my husband cough and hack at me whenever we go to buffets from now on!\n\nAnyway, I hate to trash a restaurant but I had to voice my concerns.  I am very conflicted about giving the second star, but the food itself wasn't bad.  Try at your own risk!
Agree with chaitiyana. This place is pretty bad. The food isn't fresh. They have a Buffet even for dinner. I stayed at Days Inn for 2wks here and was forced to eat here a few times. The mango lassi was good, the naans (when fresh) were good, but mostly it all stunk.
I'm not about reviewing fast food places, but I found out this Arby's was the first in Pittsburgh. It even has the HUGE cowboy hat out front as a marker. \n\nIt has all the stuff you'd expect, Roast Beef sandwiches, and those amazing Jamocha Shakes Arby's is known for.
This is a very typical neighborhood Foodland.  It looks like it hasn't been renovated since the days of the Steelers \"Immaculate Reception\", but it kind of has a certain well-worn charm.  The place is crowded and cramped too, but not unpleasant.  The parking lot is very small, but as I was taking the \"T\", it wasn't an issue.   I stopped here last night because I was in the neighborhood attending a meeting at someone's house close by and I volunteered to pick up a treat. \n\nI'd say that this place is worth it for your run-of-the-mill staples and nothing else.
It's an IGA now.
Meh. At best. So I went to Bado's tonight w/ my dad and sister and it was a bit lackluster. I started out with chicken noodle soup (w/ no noodles) and a very spicy bloody ( I know. I know. I am an avid evening bloody mary drinker.) The bloody mary was pretty awesome for what I assume is a pre-made mix. I also got a grilled swordfish salad which was bland as hell! Iceberg lettuce, croutons, cucumbers, and dry swordfish. Lame. My dad got a meatball casserole which is something I would have never ordered...meatballs and casserole aren't a selling point for me, let alone as a package deal.  This meatball casserole dish was just pasta and meatballs...thankfully for my dads heart. \n\nMy sister got a salad (again just iceberg lettuce, croutons, cucumbers) with chicken fingers.  She also split a small mushroom pizza with my dad which was above average. \n\nI guess pizza is what Bados is known for so you should just stick with that if you go.  \n\nPro: Spicy bloody marys, decent pizza, cute waiter, wide beer selection\nCon: bland salads, noodleless noodle soups, not many healthy options, no dinner entrees besides pasta,
I went with my boyfriend and one of his coworkers to this joint for lunch last week. As the rating suggests - meh.\n\nIt wasn't terrible and the service was fine. I just feel like I've had much better pizza elsewhere around town. And for sure a better margherita. Theirs fell into the category that I find most end up in: a regular cheese pizza. Quite a few places seem to not understand the differences between the two, and this place was no different.\n\nNow, the cheese/margherita pizza they served me was pretty good, but it didn't stand out for me. The other two ordered sandwiches of some sort that they both really seemed to like. The beer selection was also a bit lacking for my taste, but that may just be because they didn't have anything I liked so I stuck with water (that's me when I go out to eat: alcohol or water ;).
I just want to like it due to its location and great beer selection, but the food is awful.
Got into Pittsburgh late this evening and this was the only place around that was still open and delivered after 11 pm. I give them a half star for this. \n\nThey have a few vegetarian choices on the menu. I give them another half star for this. I ordered what I thought would have the most vegetables, the \"vegetable calzone.\" \n\nThey ended up delivering a \"Mediterranean calzone,\" which was also vegetarian, but it wasn't what I ordered. The small portion of vegetables was tasty and most of them seemed fresh, so I give them another half star for this. I didn't bother to ask if anything was organic.\n\nThey told me it would be about a 45 minute wait, but it ended up being closer to 30 and the delivery guy was friendly. I give them another half star for under-promising and over-delivering. \n\nThis place might be great for people who love fresh made bread and lots of cheese, but it's not a vegan delight!
Cons:\n* Very cramped space, aisles are so narrow that you have to carry your case sideways.\n* Only a few items were priced with signs hanging above them.\n* No shopping carts.\n\nPros:\n* Decent selection\n* Chilled section
good selection of beers*, but the food is appalling. sysco-truk curly fries and run-of-the-mill hotdogs that don't even have natural casings. puh-leez. if you're gonna put \"dogz\" in the name of your restaurant at least try to serve something better than what you can get on sale at giant eagle. \n\nno joke: I prefer the O. their fries are made out of potatoes and their dogs have real casings. \n\n* and by \"good\" I mean \"good for PA\" where liquor laws are an absurd kafkaesque mess and a lindeman's geuze is about as interesting as it gets (for like $15, natch)
I'm over it. \n\nToo many instances of bad service. Though that one woman who I have seen working there for a long time is solid. But going back to what I started with; seems like the inmates are running the prison these days. \n\nThe beer to-go costs more here than it does in New York City or Brooklyn. Think about that people.\n\n(The Monroeville location is better, imo.)
Obviously the great rep of this place is their beer selection.  A lot of bottles.  Decent tap selection, though you are guaranteed to have a rather lopsided selection among the taps.\n\nFood is fair; I've yet to go there with others and have our whole meal come out at once.  Salad will come first, then a couple of dogs, then fries.  If you are polite and civil and believe in not eating until everyone is served, well, let's just say that no one ever taught the manager, cooks or servers here that lesson.\n\nNow, their service:  Really lackluster.  \"Entitled\" is the word I would use.  It pains me to give them 15%, because honestly, they don't earn it, even when I was a regular and knew some of them by name. Meh.
I was pleased that Candalina Bide ordered my gown as a rush and it did arrive in time for the wedding.  The downside:  the alterations were very expensive and very poorly done.  The hem looked as if a high student just learning to sew had done it and I had to make some repairs and press the hem once I got it home.  The alterations to the bodicve were incomplete and i ended up with a poor fit and lots of excess materialright across the bust.  I would order from them again, but definitely take my dress to a professional seamstress.
I only got a tear in my sweater sewn together, but my experience was far from pleasant, even expecting nothing special when I walked into the place.  \n\nI went to the dry cleaner out of convenience as I live right in Regent Square.  I took my sweater to the dry cleaner on 2/19/2013 for a tear in the seem, and they told me it would not be available for pickup on 2/25/2013 after 5:00PM.... almost a week later.  What? \n\nAlso, the staff was fairly rude and all had chips on their shoulders.  I'm not entirely sure how their cleaning/sewing process works, but it's slow as molasses and I don't have time for that.  Their lack of urgency coupled with their lack of customer service or even cracking a smile means I will never go back to this dry cleaner.
I just moved to the neighborhood and needed to find a dry cleaner close by. Regency Cleaners is fine for dry cleaning but do not entrust any tailoring or hemming to this place! I had the sleeves of my coat hemmed and the tailor (or whoever) did a shitty job (THANKS).\n\nThe owner (larger woman) is rude and dismissive of my questions.\n\nI won't be coming here again.
There's a reason why there are only two reviews currently for this place. Maybe it's that spending thirty minutes in the main bar area will make you spontaneously asphyxiate.  They seriously need to invest in an air purifier.  The bar itself is a huge space, though very few will ever make it into the back room.  It's essentially a dead zone.  There's a fancy back bar that remains closed so that two bartenders can roost on top of each other like Master/Blaster in Beyond Thunderdome and watch TV.  This kind of forces patrons to hover near the front.  So, uh, invest in a second TV, a nice coat of paint, maybe some dimmer light bulbs.  You know, gussy yourself up a bit Murphy's.  It will make you feel more confident.  Who doesn't want a new coat of paint? Huh? HUH? The reason that this place is a two, is that it has an unbelievable amount of potential that's just squandered.
Yeah, not impressed. We ordered the fried zucchini to start. It's great that it's freshly hand battered, but they seem to have forgotten something -- the FLAVOR. This stuff had no seasoning on it at all, so we have to pour on a generous helping of salt to get it to taste like anything. And for $8 that's disappointing.\n\nWe each ordered burgers. At $10 a pop I was expecting a nice juicy burger. What I got was dry and totally tasteless. The whole burger just tasted like nothing. Perhaps their salt shaker fell on the floor and rolled under the fridge or something tonight. It was accompanied by some typical frozen steak fries. Again NO SALT OR SEASONING. For a $40 night out I really shouldn't have to dump salt all over everything I order. \n\nThe service...meh. Our server was so meek I could barely hear her. Serving takes a bit of personality, no? When we asked what the happy hour specials were, she said \"Ummmmmmmmmmmmmmmm....it depends on the drink.\" What? What does that mean? Basically it means you get a random discount on whatever you order, maybe, perhaps. There is no list, no standard \"$5.00 well drinks\" or anything normal like that. It's basically \"order something and hope it's on our happy hour specials.\"\n\nRather disappointed. They need to either lower their prices or kick it up a notch on the food and service.
Dark, spacious, and neighborhood friendly is how I'd describe Dunnings, a fixture on Braddock Ave for years. \n\nI met my friend Jean here, she is a once a week customer. Lucky her living on Biddle Street, she lunches daily at different eateries on Braddock ave. One day the Square Cafe (read my review), one day the Map Room, another day D's Packs n Dogs. \n\nLooking over the menu, my choices were limited to a veggie wrap or salads. I chose a veggie wrap, sans cheese with a side of apple sauce. The wrap was nothing special, mushrooms, spinach, lettuce, tomato, and a side of canned applesauce.\n\nJean had a buffalo chicken wrap and iced tea. She complained the tea was weak, I never noticed. She said he wrap was good, a chicken breast fried, then drenched in buffalo chicken sauce, then drenched in blue cheese dressing and wrapped in a flour tortilla. \n\nDunnings is nothing special, it's a long time establishment that gets by on regulars. This day, the most I saw in the place was 9 people in the bar and dinning room. \n\nService was ok, out waitress seemed to be preoccupied with something or someone in the kitchen and it took forever for her to bring the bill to the table.
It's got it's ups and downs.  It's got a reasonably attractive interior, antique tin ceilings, a broad selection of dozens of beers and a tasty looking menu featuring daily specials.  So why my low score?  D's at the other end of the block puts their beer collection to shame offering 1000 beers,  Both times I've eaten here the wait to be served has been extremely slow (at least 30 minutes and up) the prices are a bit high ($10-$15 for a lunch entree) and most importantly the food is in general heavy and bland.  This is not a terrible place, but with so many delicious spots nearby in regent square like the green mango, map room, d's and the square cafe you should keep on walking.  That said, if you wanted a quiet spot to grab a beer with a friend, you could definitely do worse, but skip the boring food.
Average food, slightly above average prices for the quality/taste, average price for the location, lack-luster service.\n\nThis place (the location, the actual building itself, etc.) could be so much more.  I wish they would either step it up, or sell the business to someone that would let it achieve its true potential.\n\nUntil then, there are other dining options in Regent Square and they should be explored.
I really wanted to like this place, because it sounds like it used to be really popular. We heard the burgers were very good once upon a time, so we tried them, but they were just ok. Nice people though, and plenty of seating. Good place to watch the game probably (bar).
I am updating my review of the Oakmont store after my last experience consigning there. The store employee happily accepted all of my items- until the next day when I received a call that the owner rejected half of the items. This was the third time I consigned with Ambiance in Oakmont, and I only offered items that I thought were in excellent condition from high end retailers; even though I have seen brands in the store from Charter Club for example (Ambiance says they do not accept them in the consigning agreement). The employee was very apologetic and she said that she stood by her assessment that the items were of good quality, but the owner (who she seemed upset with) disagreed. So, get your stuff together Ambiance owner and either train your employees better, or only accept items yourself so that you do not inconvenience potential customers like me. Surprisingly, I did not receive the same return on this set of consigned items; not sure if that is coincidence or not.
Right, so......\n\nFirst off, hire employees that actually appreciate having a job.  Not ones that are there because they are forced to.  That way, maybe you can actually earn a decent review.  If you start off with a bad experience with an employee, you're not going to get a great review.\n\nI went here midday on a Sunday.  Thought that was a great idea, especially when I got there and there were no cars in the drive thru.  Pull up to the sign to order and wait for five minutes before I am even acknowledge that I am there.  Finally order and pull around, I wait another five minutes.  I could understand the wait if there was someone in front of me, or if the sit down area inside was packed, but there was no one else there but ME.\n\nI'd gladly tell y'all the employee's name, that is if where the name is suppose to be wasn't ripped off.  All I can really say is that she was a real ball of sunshine.  I was made to feel like I was interrupting her day and that I should have just went somewhere else to spend my money.\n\nYou know what really puts me in a tizzy (yes, I just used that word)?  Leaving the drive thru, driving the distance to my house, walking into my house, sitting down to feed my face and find that part of my order wasn't given to me.  *enter angry expletives here*\n\nI doubt I'll be revisiting this location again, I'll drive the further distance from my place the next time I'm craving a taco or two.
The drive through service here leaves something to be desired.  Not only was my order wrong but the lady was very grumpy.
While the shop is in a pretty great location, with cute decor, they only accept cash (which is annoying), and the friendliness of the staff varies significantly, from awesome to terrible. I could deal with either--and have, given my love of coffee shops--but I guess I need consistency. I want to know what to expect, you know?\n\nTheir coffee is pretty good--not awesome, but certainly drinkable. Their pastries vary a bit, as well; that they offer carrot cake cupcakes is pretty cool, but I think something's wrong with their fridge, making things stale half the time.\n\nKind of meh.\n\n(Note on \"outdoor seating:\" It's really no good unless you smoke, because there's one employee who spends half the day out there, smoking.)
I really want to see small coffee shops succeed, I do. Regent Square is full of small businesses and the community is really supportive. I believe this and the lack of coffee chains is the only reason they are still open. They are cash only, but so is half of all the other businesses on that street, so I don't hold it against them. \n\nIt's dingy. They don't use their space well. Coffee is brewed in poured into an regular old coffee pump pot. The desserts looked good, but there was one lonely cookie and two cupcakes (granted it was Saturday night). It just looked really sparse.
This is a depressing coffee shop. I went in on a wednesday afternoon to find the place dim, muggy, eerily silent (as in no music or talk, just shuffling noises), and filled with a sense of sadness.  I tried to sit down and enjoy some coffee, which was drinkable, but I couldn't get over the odd atmosphere, that is until the music started, so quiet I couldn't even tell you what it was, just that it was on. I'm giving it two stars for the awesome alternative energy posters hanging on the far wall.
Regent Square is a nice little area, and it certainly deserves a better coffee shop than Katerbean.\n\nWe just moved to Pittsburgh in July, and before we got the interwebs in our home, we would frequent Katerbean fairly regularly, at least 2 to 3 times per week in order to use their free wi-fi and have a drink.  Every time... EVERY TIME we went there, we left reeking of smoke.  There's no smoking inside, of course, but it always happened.  Maybe it's due to poor ventilation, or the fact that the employees were regularly outside smoking, but we always left smelling like we were in a bar.\n\nThen, the tables were usually dirty.  When we would order our drink, we would usually have to get ourselves a napkin, wet it, and wipe our table ourselves. Not surprising, as most of the employees I've encountered there (with the exception of the very nice older woman) seemed pretty put out when I asked for anything.\n\nIn any case, we have internet access at home now, and haven't been back to Katerbean since. I guess that is really the only thing this place has going for it.
Yeah, I agree with the general consensus of Katerbean. One of these days, I'm going to write an anonymous note that will include a copy of this review. I don't think that the owners mean any harm by leaving the wall painted sherbet orange, sans artwork, but may just need some guidance.\nYes, the place smells. A good carpet scrubbing would work, but tearing it up would be much better. The coffee is a step up from foldgers. The soy milk tastes like whole milk. Tables are often dirty.\nA little bit of interior design education, or change of management could make this place totally rock, especially with Root 176 and the Regent Theater right up the street. Regent Square is crying out for a good coffee shop! Could she be the one??? Hopefully someday? I am keeping my fingers (and toes) crossed!
Yeah, I'm not coming here anymore.\n\n1) They charge extra for whipped cream.\n2) They use canned whipped cream. If you're gonna charge me for whipped cream you damn well better make your own fresh whipped cream. Jeez.\n3) My hot chocolate was just gross. Like they use Hershey's chocolate syrup or something. Yuck.\n4) I saw how they keep their filters prefilled with ground coffee just sitting out on the counter to get stale! WTF?\n\nSigh. I hope the people at Biddle's Revenge open that place up soon and know WTF they are doing...
Cigarette smoke and ashtray smells combined with mediocre coffee and subpar customer service are not my cup of tea, and I never even rank the tea here. Thank the Flying Spaghetti Monster that Biddle's Escape opened and now I have absolutely no reason to go to Katerbean.
I have been a customer of the Triangle Bar & Grill for over twenty five years.  They have the BEST subs ever. \n\nBUT on this trip I was buying several to share with people from out of town.  They are cash only and more than happy to show you an ATM that charges you $2.50 per transaction.  The employees don't set the rules but have to live with them.  That $2.50 came out of their tip, they can hit up their boss for the rest.  Its 2014 and they still don't take credit and or debit cards.  Shame on them.
Pizza was fine but nothing special. The salad I ordered was wrong, though. And beware of the prices: What's on the website is wrong. And the manager and owner will say there's nothing they can do about that (except charge you the higher price that isn't on the website).
This is the closest grocery store to me, and I go out of my way to avoid it.  Finding a parking spot is horrible with stop signs everywhere right in front of the main entrance to the store.\n\nEverything is all out of place and it's hard to make a connection as to where a product might be located in the store.  Mind you there are in the middle of a remodel, so I may come back and make and addendum to my review at a later date after the dust settles.  \n\nAs prices go, they are the norm for the Pittsburgh area.  Variety, yeah, they got that covered.  Tidiness, they are working on that.
I really don't get Giant Eagle. They are nice enough, but pricing just makes no sense at all to me. It is close to my house so I'll drop in to buy a thing or two, but would rather go just about anywhere else for my weekly shopping trip.
I love that most of their employees make it known that they would rather be anywhere else but here. \nThe prices are higher than most other competitors but it's the closest store to us so it's easy to get to.
Please clean your floor properly.  It feels like Crisco under your feet.  Very dangerous.
Nothing special. Precooked meals that taste microwaved.
Worst Applebee's experience I've had.\n\nWe were seated and then waited 10 minutes to even be greeted.  And then it was only because we flagged someone down.  No apologies when we were finally taken care of.\n\nI needed to ask for water three times before I finally went up to the bar to ask for some.  It was then that our server came over with water.  We ordered soup and entrees.  He delivered one soup and an appetizer claiming that was what we ordered and there was no way he misheard.\n\nAbout five minutes later a manager came over and said something to the lines of \"I understand that you've had some issues\"  I then proceeded to very calmly explain what our issues had been.  You could tell he wasn't very interested in what we had to say and didn't seem to care that his server had issues.  His lack of caring was apparent in the fact that while we were waiting to be greeted and during one of the many asks for water, there were several servers and the manager standing behind the bar shooting the breeze.\n\nThe food (once the order was right) was good, but the wait and the mistakes make it highly unlikely we will never return to this location.
I told everyone that I wasn't feeling this. Should have listened to my gut on this one. We didn't make reservations for our party of 7, which I suppose we should have. They had to create space for us. Like really create it. Where we were all sitting in the walkway. Knew I was in the walkway when the waiter asked for us to move so that a little girl in a wheelchair could get around. But I didn't have a problem with that. What I have a problem with is all the nasty flies in the building. And while you're eating too...it's so disgusting. The place is so freakin crowded as well...maybe just because I hate being in crowded and tight spots. \nAs far as the menu, I wasn't impressed. It took me 20 mins to find something (partly because I'm picky). But I ended up with the chicken broccoli alfredo, nothing to rave about. I wanted more broccoli than what was provided, but oh well. The lime/kiwi lemonade was pretty good though.
They took their vegetarian meal off the menu.  They'll make one for you especially but I always feel demanding and would prefer if they had just kept it on the menu.\n\nPlus, this one is always really quiet.  Like, I feel guilty, like I'm troubling the staff.  And you have to drive through an apartment's parking lot to get there.  Very awkward location and atmosphere.
I have been going to Benihana's back when it was Samuri... I visit the Cleveland and Pittsburgh one frequently. The cleveland one is better but they are both going down hill at a very fast past. I keep giving them another chance and i keep getting disappointed. They have changed so many things in the past year and its for the worse. The shrimp the order they give you the food, the way the cut the veggies. Im becoming a Huge fan of Itchiban both the one in robinson and cranberry, Its cheaper and you get more food for your money . I hope Beni's changes. I even e mailed them and they didnt respond .
I have to admit, I kind of thought Benihana was fictitious until we moved to Pittsburgh... and then low and behold, there was one right near where we live. The food is okay. There are better hibachi options in the area. The service can be okay or awful. One time, we were there with our kids and had an absolutely EVIL waitress. One of my kids isn't a big eater, so instead of ordering her a full kids' meal, we just got a side order of rice and soup. The kids' meal her brother was having came with ice cream, so when we were done with dinner, we asked if she could get ice cream as well. I don't know if she thought we wanted the ice cream free (which we definitely didn't!) but she said no, we absolutely COULD NOT order ice cream separately. You either get it with the kids' meal or you don't get it. WTF?
Perhaps our mistake was going on a Sat.night in the summer .Who knew it would be packed to the gills with thirsty college students. \nLoud is an understatement. We were crammed into a little table the four of us elbow to elbow with the diners seated on both sides. \nThis already has put me in a bad mood.I never did well in Europe sharing my table with stranger and in the U.S it irks me even more \nIt took forever to get our drinks of simply water and soda. \nWe at last caught our waitresses eye and was told should would take care of us she guessed.....? What the heck she was the same waitress who took the drink order and was delivering the food next to us. \nWhen Ms.Wiffty finally brought our long awaited food it is totally the wrong order.We even considered asking if we could just keep it because we had waited so long, but no off she went to leave us for another 20 minutes. \nWhat we got at long last was so disappointing. \nIt tasted no better than Taco Bell anywhere in America.Think nacho grande with a side of Guacamole. First and last visit.We did notice on the bill she gave us the wrong check .It was for half the amount of food we ordered and was probably some poor guys check.We waved her over .Her reply was just leave the money on the table I'll come by and get it later................ \nSo we did.
Not a pleasant experience.  While looking at the menu, we ordered a margarita and a draft beer.  The beer came in a bottle instead of a draft and the margarita had a terrible funky taste - almost a \"plastic chemical\" taste.  Next we chose to have chips and dips/salsa.  We were able to choose three dips/salsas and the server brought one that was incorrect.  To his credit, he promptly corrected the error and brought the right one.\n\nNeedless to say we elected not to have dinner and departed after drinks and chips.  There is much better Mexican food and drink in the 'burgh.
\"Meh.  I've experience better.\" \n\nI find this fairly overpriced for the quality of food.  I think that the decor of the place and the witty menu drive up the \"like\" of this place b/c it's modern and fun... but it all comes down to the food, and it's not something I'd think about again when I leave, but I wouldn't object too heavily if someone asked me to meet them there again.  They staff is nice, when it's busy they're a little slow.  The food is spicy, like the guacamole and house salsa - I like spicy, but it didn't really add flavor, just made my mouth burn enough to get a second margarita (which was strong - good, but strong w/ low-end tequila, yuck.. paid the extra $$ for better liquor).  The pico de gallo, my alternative to the spicy salsa, was as bland as they come so I settled on \"virgin\" chips.  Everything is just mediocre and pricey... meh.
You have no idea how badly I WANT to like this place. They are incredibly vegetarian/vegan-friendly. I just haven't been impressed by anything I've ordered there. Even the chips and salsa aren't terribly good. I do like the bar-- they have great sangria-- but that's about it.
The food here is pretty good but the service was some of the worst I've ever experienced. Our wait just to place drink orders was almost 15 minutes, had I not been exhausted from my drive in from Columbus I probably would have left then. However we stayed the waitress was slow, forgetful we had to yell for her or wave our arms if we needed anything. At one point the poor people next to us who had also received terrible Service were asked by the waitress a full 15 minutes after she placed their order if she had gotten their orders. I probably won't visit this location again on my next Pittsburgh trip.
This place is okay. The waiter was horrible and barely checked on us. The food was also not too good. It was very bland and didn't have a lot of taste to it. I will not be coming back.
The food isn't terrible, but not impressive.  I lived in LA for 4 years, so I'm super spoiled when it comes to having good Meixcan food.  We got a burrito, which was just stuffed with fillers such as rice and beans..no thanks.  There was nothing memorable about the taste of it whatsoever.  Who seriously wants a huge burrito like that?  I'd rather have a normal sized one that actually tastes good and isn't filled with crap.  We got the steak fajitas, which were actually pretty decent.  The steak was cooked perfectly as ordered, which I appreciate.  We also got the chips with salsa and guac, which were good, but, come on, it's really not hard to mess those up!  Overall, I'm just not impressed, but I guess you can't really find that great of Mexican food options in Pittsburgh.
I think its time to sacrifice time and convenience. When we visit the area....this place always lacks the experience that we receive from ShadySide, Robinson, and Ross Park. Even though it closer to my Dad's House when visiting...its time for us to part ways. The food and service is never as good at this location. I love, love, love their tofu tacos...but this was just eh this time...it was as though the thick pieces fell apart and they were small and too crunchy and maybe just old...bleh. I couldn't even finish them, even though I cannot wait to eat them the 3 times a year I get to have them. Total Bummer.
I'm in from out of town, and I'm so surprised and disappointed about the level of we received here during a quiet Sunday lunch hour. Our waitress gave us indignant responses to every request, with visible eyerolls to things like sharing fajitas. \n\nWhen an order came out completely wrong, she said \"Sorry for the mixup, but I don't control the kitchen\" and made no effort to correct the order. Had she showed any effort or contrition, the error really wouldn't have bothered me, but she actually seemed to act like it was our fault. \n\nIt really disappointed me to have my dad treated like this on our family meal together on my final day in town. Please train your staff better and treat customers with any level of appreciation or helpfulness.
I attended the sushi class on Monday night.  The instructors were great:  friendly, funny, helpful.  The class structure was good, but certainly geared toward those who have never attempted making their own sushi before.  Everyone had their own station and was able to make three different rolls.  \n\nHowever, I seriously question the value.  The course was to be two and one half hours in duration.  After approximately seventy-five minutes, we began cleaning up to go home.  It should be noted that the 75 minute class time included a 10-15 minute sales pitch of Crate's products. For $60 per person, I was beyond disappointed.  It seems unethical and deliberately misleading to advertise the length of the class and barely run 50% of the scheduled time.\n\nThe bottom line:  good instruction, but you'll feel extremely cheated at the end.
A very oddly laid out supermarket. the Deli isle is not very wide, the the walls are closing in on you, and they put the DIY olive cart in front to make it more cluttered. Just a poorly laid out store which is showing it's age.
Had a beer and an appetizer, so-so.  Service was nice and quick, which is about all I need with the kids.  Kids seemed to like their kids meals, the usual Mac and cheese, grilled cheese, chicken fingers.  Huge line at Mad Mex on Friday night, none here.  I doubt we will go back, too many other choices.
Not up to it's previous brunch standards. Buffet has scaled back in variety and quality.   Still good but no longer excellent.
There's really absolutely nothing special about Max & Erma's. In fact I would say it's probably about the most boring chain restaurant out there. No wait, Ruby Tuesdays still exists... but at least they have a salad bar... hmmm. Anyways, the only reason I keep coming back is because my husband's family LOVES to use their back room for every occasion. Ugh. Can't we just have get-togethers at someone's house like normal families do? \n\nSo since we are forced to show up for family functions I've had cause to try much of the menu, and most of it is average or below. The only thing that has been consistently good is their tortilla soup. If you're not getting that, don't bother. I've heard about free cookie Wednesday, but come on, is that really going to drum up that much business? At Eat N' Park, free cookies are a staple. Get it together Max & Erma...
Received bad service today.  Got the wrong chase for my sandwich,  Got decaf tea instead of regular tea even though he was told black tea.  Usually you have to ask for decaf. \nHowever, lots of seats since the place was empty.  We left Einstein's because it was  crowded.\nThey Missed an opportunity to impress a new customer.  Guess it's back to Einstein's.
This Starbucks is in a strip mall at the bottom of Greentree hill and unfortunately has the unlucky fortune of being a hangout for the most obnoxious group of men who come into the store early in the morning, nurse a cup of coffee all day, take up all the chairs, and gobble up all the free samples of pastry that the baristas offer. It's really a shame too because this Starbucks has a fireplace with a nice fire working during the cold months. In the evening when the old man unemployment club leaves is a great time to visit. If not for the \"I can top that\" club that come in everyday and tell the same old stories over and over IN SUCH LOUD VOICES, this would be one of my favorite Starbucks in the Burgh.
I used to love Panera but as the years have gone by their standards of both food and service has declined greatly. It's a gamble if you are going to get good food and service or if the D team is working that day and they serve cold soup and sandwiches that look like Stevie Wonder  made them. I have to be deserate now to go there, like travelling on the Ohio turnpike and my other rest stop options are burger king and popeyes. Coprorate needs to improve and manage  their quality control,training, and processes. It's like they came out with a bang and now are just coasting.
Service wasn't very good, and their (advertised) delivery was not available (because the delivery drivers car broke down). Maybe as a sit in it would be ok but I was not impressed
Have mixed Vincent's.  My meal was good (spicy pasta) but service was spotty.  Another in the party had the homemade gnocchi and it was not good at all, \"tastes like dishwater\", was the quote.  Naw, that couldn't happen to homemade gnocchi, after a taste, I agreed!  Just goes to show, it depends on what you order.\n\nOh yea, the parking lot, very big but some customers parked in the entrance on both sides to make it one lane and of course when we were leaving we noticed that one guy was taping his car where it had be hit.
Overpriced, very slow service, food was decent.
Food is mediocre service is lousy. I'm sitting here right now and have been out of water and done eating for 20 min...
Service was good but probably the worse pizza I've ever had.  We couldn't eat it.
I went for dinner July 10.  Tight quarters inside but nice outside covered porch..Small inviting bar. Parking lot is full of potholes. It wont take much to fill with small stones but nothing has been done for years. It would be nice for customers to the fill potholes. \nFriendly staff . I ordered a Italian Hoagie and my wife had Spinach Ravoli. Waitress was nice but never asked to refill our drinks. My hoagie was dry with min meat. Bun was OK. My wife liked her salad. Both was very avg food in tight spaces and service could have been more attentive. Probably wont go back.
So how can you write a review for the turnpike? Everyone hates it...and unfortunately I drive it frequently. Word of the wise...drive this road in the daytime, when it's not raining. You will thank me later for this advice...\n\nAs mentioned by others, this road is not in the best shape. It seems like every couple of miles there's construction. Not anyone working on site...but hey, you still have to slow down. Another issue...most of the roadway is 55 mph. This drives me insane...because in certain spots it's 55, and in others it's 65. Luckily I haven't had any speeding tickets here...but my warning, be aware of your speed.\n\nThe toll booth operators are ok, for the most part. You will get those with the evil attitudes. Like, I'm sorry I disturbed you...but lady you're the only one open. I'll make sure to sign up for EZ Pass so I can bypass you.\n\nAnd lastly...the price. So back when I was in college I frequented this road, from Pittsburgh to Philly and back. I believe the amount one way was between $12-15. Now...one way? Goodness I don't know the price...but let's put this in perspective. I now only drive the Pittsburgh/Breezewood route...and it's  $12.60 one way. And this isn't even the halfway point to Philly. \n\nIn theory you can bypass the turnpike by driving I-80 but this road is impassable if it's snowing. And there aren't as many rest stops. So PA knows you have no choice...and will charge you whatever on the turnpike. \n\nFYI - prices are scheduled to go up Jan 1 2015. The toll booth operators are clueless as to how much the increase will be. One toll booth operator was snippy with me when I asked her. Oh well.
I certainly have stayed in worse places, but they generally didn't cost $100 per night. \n\nTo be fair--the place is clean. The temperature was good. It's just small and old. The carpets are threadbare, in places. There is no restaurant, and no obvious nearby place to eat--I ended up driving around for a while before I found something. \n\nThe people who work here are very friendly, and as the previous reviewer wrote, it's got a manager's happy hour (which I arrived right before the end of), and a fitness center & pool. You have to reach the fitness center and pool by going outside, though, and in the middle of February, that's not so attractive. \n\nThe mall that is nearby is not really a mall. It's got a Giant Eagle and a KMart, but all the other businesses seem to have closed. Even the ATM was boarded up, which is really not a good sign.
The rooms are laid out weird, and for the cost the rooms are not worth it.  There are also not many place to eat around the hotel.
I hate Olive Garden. It makes me laugh when they ask \"how is everything?\"  I wonder what goes through their minds when I say \"The microwave did an awesome job\". I'm in town for a few days, I'm hung over and don't know where else to eat. Olive Garden is just gourmet ChefBoyArDee. You won't find me at an Olive Garden back in New Jersey!
Being born and raised into an all Italian family, I'm pretty darn picky about my pastas and gravy (tomato sauce for the unknowing). My great grandmother's sauce was the first I remember, she never opened a can to make her sauces, always using tomatoes she canned herself in mason jars. She simmered her sauces until every seed melted away. My mother's sauce was a bit more thicker, using puree and paste as a base, later adding whole peeled tomatoes, garlic and fresh basil. Her sauce cooks down to a velvety pasta sauce that should be jarred and sold on super market shelves.\n\nSorry on to my review of Olive Garden. seriously? Really? No! I will admit it's good in a fit of really, REALLY needing a pasta fix, or if you want to eat breadstick and salad. But the sauces are overly rich, and I don't mean the tomato sauces. I mean the sauces they put over the pasta with chicken, beef or fish. And, let me be real Italian here, pasta is NEVER the main meal in an Italian supper, Pasta is normally the first course and NEVER served with meat, including MEATBALLS. Thats as American as fortune cookies. after pasta, comes the protein, that includes meatballs, then finally salad.\n\nOkay, I'm done being a snooty Italian who looks down upon Olive Garden, I got out all my frustrations on you, my readers. But seriously, if you want good Italian food, hit up a REALLY good neighborhood, family owned Italian restaurant. The service is better, it will be cheaper and it won't go to a big conglomerate who over charges on a plate of pasta, which is one of the cheapest food you can serve. Oh, two stars for a pretty good bowl of Pasta Fazoo (pasta and beans).
Hotel itself is adequate.  The 2 stars are for the hotel's internet connection.  I've stayed here twice in one week and both times were frustrating in terms of the Wi Fi. The connection drops numerous times in one session and connecting can be a chore. In terms of smartphones, don't even bother. My iPhone just refuses to fully connect and I've tried everything.  I stay at hotels continuously throughout the year  and this hotel has the worst internet configuration out of them all.\n\nThe staff is great and helpful but as someone who travels for business, the Wi Fi connection is crucial to my experience.
oh. dear. lord. i feel so bad for the tour group from japan that was here .... this place is the dumps.  we had 2 rooms: they were supposed to be on the same floor.  nope. 2 different floors, took 6 rooms before we had 2 rooms that were NOT dirty.  One bed was unmade each day. Drunk frat rats.  AVOID.
Place is ok but a little uncomfortable. There's water damage in some corners of the the ceiling and it looks pretty creepy. There are stains on the walls and ironing board but, overall, it's ok. The bathroom was freshly stocked, toilet and shower was clean and functional, bed seemed to be bedbug-free and is comfortable enough to lay your head at night, TV worked just fine as well. The continental breakfast was ok but a little lackluster. The place is pretty much centrally located & it does have great potential..overall, it was an ok stay and I may stay again after they've completed the renovations.
I stopped here yesterday morning because I was attending an off-site training session.  Typical Starbucks.  On the way back, I bought some of that new Starbucks VIA instant coffee to try at the office.  VIA does not taste like brewed coffee, so Starbucks loses one star for that.
Not exactly a fan of this location, however I tend to frequent it because of my work location, but I always leave unsatisfied.  The baristas are not friendly.  I'm always always always made to feel like I'm stupid (seriously?  i'm ordering coffee from you - who gave you a Masters Degree of all things brewed?)  and they're just rude.  Just.... rude.  I've never had an issue with my order being accurate, although again, just ordering coffee people.  I'm not asking you to recite the Gettysburg address.. in Latin.. backwards.  Just asking for a coffee.. congrats on getting it right!  I wwill also add that everytime I go in to this store, it smells.. bad.  real bad.  not like the delicious aroma of fresh brewed coffee.  No no.  You know those febreze commercials where they take the most disgusting atmosphere for smell and throw poor, unsuspecting victims in there to test the febreze-ee-ness of the area?  Yeah, it's like that.  Only with no febreze.  \n\nTo sum it up, I would suggest if you're in the area and need some starbucks in your life, take a few extra steps and go to the one on the corner of 6th and penn.  Those people are SUPER friendly (gave me a free coffee on new years day because I was on my way to work and realized I forgot my credit card after I ordered for me and my coworkers.. so nice!) and it smells like a coffee shop should smell - like coffee.  WHOA.. mind. blown.
MARKET SQUARE.....The slowest, most inaccurate Starbucks that I've ever seen....how can you write an order on a cup and still get it wrong....I saw 3 wrong orders (including mine) in the 25 minutes that I spent waiting...I was 4th in a line of 10
I wish someone had written a review for this place so that I would have not gone to it.  As a matter of background, I am originally from Los Angeles and have experienced some EXCELLENT nail salons there for much cheaper prices.  I don't know why manicures and pedicures are so expensive in Pittsburgh, but that's really a different path that I rather not venture into.  Anyway, this place is really small and they hardly have any nail polish choices.  It costs $15 for a manicure and $30 for a pedicure.  If you decide to go here, take my advice and take your own nail polish.  As for me, I picked out an OPI nail polish and they poured acetone in the nail polish to make it thinner!! I hate it when they do this, I guess its just their way of being cheap and not taking out a new nail polish.  The end result is that there are bubbles now on my nails and less than 24 hours later I just noticed that one of my nails has already chipped.  To make matters worse, their hot water was not working properly so they gave me my manicure and pedicure with pure COLD water.  The only positive thing I found about this place is that they accept credit cards.
regarding Shari's review: when i went they wouldnt even accept my debit card .  she was an older woman who i do not think knew how to use the machine so i ended up going across the street to pnc and using the atm.  it is not top quality work, they def over charge for the level of work they do...maybe that's bc their rent is high in downtown? it is about average price for nails though so doesnt hurt the pocket...but there are alot of places that do better for the same price.  its a convenient location so i would go back if i needed a last minute job, but def not my first, second, or third choice.
I, too, decided on MCN based on Yelp reviews after moving to Pittsburgh. Unfortunately, I did not have the great experience others did. I ended up getting probably the worst haircut I'd had in 10 years. It ended up a good 4 inches shorter than I discussed with the stylist. In addition, she took the fact that I work in a professional office to mean that I wanted an ugly, boring, mom-ish haircut. It's taken almost a year to grow back to the length it was before. I admittedly should have complained then and there, but I'm a wuss. \n\nAdditionally, the experience at the salon left much to be desired. I went in the late morning on a weekday. There was a little girl there (around 3 or 4) with her nanny. Apparently her mom was a regular customer. The little girl was getting a haircut and she cried and screamed for 25 minutes. I know kids will be kids, and I don't blame the little girl for being scared or cranky. I do blame the salon for not finding a way for the girl not to disrupt the entire salon - taking her to a back room, taking her outside to calm down, not allowing children in an adult, supposedly high-end salon, etc. Something that was supposed to be a treat for me turned into a headache.\n\nI will not be back here, but it seems like others had great experiences.
The salon is nice, and the people were great, but I was not impressed. The haircut was mediocre, but the highlights were much worse. They didn't even cover up all of my roots! I don't know much about hair, but the place I went before I moved always made great suggestions and chose highlights that were perfectly suited for my skin color and for the season. MCN failed to do this in a big way.
So...I was sold on MCN Salon about a year ago, and found it through Yelp reviews.  I really was sold at one point.  It's clean.  It's up-scale.  It's hip.  It's pretty.\nBut after my last haircut, I'm going to suck it up, and make the 45 minute drive back to my old stylist in Peters Township.\nBasically - I just feel like they're trying to up-sell you the entire time on products and more services.  For example, if I wanted my eyebrows colored, I probably would have added that to my appointment.\nTheir stylists are GREAT, don't get me wrong, but I just don't feel like I'm being pampered or focused on when I'm there.  The last time, my stylist was working on 3 different people while I was getting a cut and color.  Therefore, that left junior stylists to wash and dry my hair.  The time before that, the stylist was working on 2 different people.  I have no problem with that - I just don't know who to tip at the end because I feel like my main stylist, actually did very little in the long run.  \nPlus - I told my stylist on our very first visit - \"I don't want to think about my hair.  YOU are the STYLIST!  YOU are the DESIGNER!  Every time I come in here, I will want a different hair cut, but I want YOU to do it.  You will NEVER hear me say, 'just trim it up and do like we did last time'.  So please, I trust you to just make me look HOT.\"\nWell - the whole past year that I have gone there, I have sadly just been given the same haircut all 4 times.  I HATE THAT!  I'm not a hair stylist.  I know most people are stuck in their old ways and never like to change their hair; however, I am not.  I LOVE getting new hair cuts.  I love going from long to short...or from short to growing it out.  I like change - especially with the seasons!  Give me some edge!  Make me look sexy!   (I never feel this way leaving this salon).\nPlus, every time I have gone for a cut and color, I feel like it has gotten more expensive every single time.  I don't know what I'm being charged for...but my first session was a little under $120.  This past time it was up to $175 and like I said, I only go for a cut and color.  So I don't understand why my appointment is $55 more than it was 6 weeks before (and 6 weeks before I actually bought PRODUCT!).\nAfter 4 sessions, I can now say that I'll CANT WAIT to be going back to Stephan Szabo's in Peters!  That's worth the drive, the price, the experience, and the feeling of newness and pretty confidence!
I booked a hair apt here after reading some of the reviews on Yelp, hoping I'd find a place to get my hair cut after moving to Pittsburgh from NJ. Maybe it was just the hairdresser I booked an appointment with, but I did not have a great experience. I'm a nurse who works mostly day shifts, and I value sleep over styling my hair in the morning. I tried to articulate that I wanted a hair cut that required minimal styling on my part. The hairdresser immediately shot me down, asking me how I expected to have my hair look nice if I wasn't willing to put work into it. She then berated me for not using styling products-- again, I'd rather sleep. \n\nNow, maybe a few people feel differently about their hair, but all I wanted was a cut that allowed for minimal styling on my part. I wasn't asking for some trendy 'do that needed 3 different products, a round brush, and a flat iron in order to re-create it. I ended up getting almost the same exact cut I had going in there (just an inch shorter). Oh, and she also told me the cut I had coming in wasn't entirely flattering because of it's blunt ends--- funny, I ended up with the same thing. \n\nThis experience has definitely made me decide never to go back, for $50 I expect a little bit better service and a little bit nicer treatment. Oh, and somewhere that isn't constantly pushing products.
I mean...seriously? \nI should have known better given that it only had one positive review. My 600th yelp review, you think I'd've learned by now!\nI wandered in here looking for a pedicure. My first hint should have been the old crusty polishes on the walls - no Essie etc here. But whatever, I picked out my color and headed to the dilapidated pedicure chair. (I put my bag on the adjacent tray and it couldn't support the weight). They don't use razors here, which is fine, but I expected a thorough scrubbing of my callouses, and when she gave me a tiny little once over then unceremoniously threw my feet back into the water I thought to myself, OK there's no way on earth this is more than a $10 pedicure right? My heels still looked as bad as they did when I walked in. \nThen she painted my nails and sat me down at the \"dryer\" which consisted of two tiny fans pointed at my feet. For real. I had to sit there for over ten minutes, she proclaimed my toes dry, then I paid - $25?!!!! For $25 in Boston where I'm from I could get a legit pedicure. I was dumbfounded. I paid, walked home, and lo and behold two of my toes already had smudged polish. ARGH!
Hotel restaurant/bars are usually not known for being the best in town.  So when I had the opportunity to eat and drink at SoHo recently, I can not say I was surprised that I found the cuisine to be on the uninspiring side.  Is it terrible?  No,  but you know that better is out there.  \n\nThe blackened chicken wrap was boring.  The flavor was missing and the entire meal was just bland.  Also, white tortillas just do not do it for me.  Why does it seem that Pittsburgh wants to thrive on fatty, flavorless food?\n\nUpon ordering the caesar salad on New Year's Eve, I was told that the restaurant has no non- or low-fat dressing option...at all.  However, I can order a salad with FRENCH FRIES on it.  Seriously?  The salad was fine, by the way, and is a large portion but knowing  that tons of calories had to be consumed just to get a vegetable in me was disappointing.\n\nOn the bright side, the smoked turkey wrap, which comes with havarti cheese and cranberry sauce was ridiculously good.  The turkey was juicy and melded perfectly with the cheese and cranberries.  That I could eat again and it would  fill me up all day.\n\nI also sampled the buffalo pierogies and really just found them to be the Mrs. T's ones with Frank's Hot Sauce on them.  They were good, but uncreative considering the price ($8.99).\n\nThe drinks here are decently priced and pretty good.  Friends I was with sampled a few of the drinks on the interesting cocktail menu and were happy with their choices...they were strong drinks.  When my co-worker and I arrived though one night to dine here, we were not offered cocktail menus so I just stuck with wine until I was no longer in the mood for a cocktail.  \n\nService on New Year's Eve was apathetic.  Granted, the place was packed, but we had  to wait for silverware and had our food and drinks pretty much thrown at us.  Even when it slowed down we were barely paid attention to and were hardly treated with any amount of friendliness even though numerous drinks and food orders were made.\n\nThere are a ton of TVs here, so it is a great spot to watch a game.  Even during busy times, there is a space for you but it will take a while to flag down a server to seat you if you want to sit.  \n\nI think I would stop back here if I find myself at the Springhill Suites again, but I definitely would not go out of my way to dine here.  Can't win 'em all, right?  \n\nPro-tip:  You can not access the restaurant from the hotel it is attached to (Springhill Suites) without a key and you can not leave the restaurant to get into the hotel without one.  Want some good people watching?  Sit and watch people try to get from one to the other without realizing you need a key.  Ridiculous.  Since you can access each of these places without a key from other doors, this does not make any sense.  But, it is what it is so do not forget your key!
SoHo clearly relies on the Pirates crowd across the street, and Steelers and Pitt games. When there's a game, the place is packed. Other times, it doesn't seem so busy. The food has been OK. It's generally bar food, with an effort to be more. Execution is varied. \n\nTry the seasoned tuna sandwich with a side of parmesan risotto; just tell them how you want the tuna cooked because they don't seem to know and will overcook it.
A number of the reviews here giving off the \"eh\" vibe? That's because Soho is a kind of \"eh\" place.\n\nI visited for the first time yesterday evening. My boyfriend and I decided to stroll over the bridge to catch some Jazz Live in Katz Plaza (Roger Humphries - really good show) and then headed to North Shore for some grub. Now, I don't find any of the restaurants near PNC to be that good (see my Bettis Grill review) so I knew we weren't going to find anything spectacular. We settled on Soho because I'd never been there before and Atria's doesn't appeal to me.\n\nI did like the open layout on the inside of the restaurant. Looks like a perfect place to catch a game. Finally - a halfway decent TV setup, Pittsburgh! The bar is ginormous and they seemed to have an extensive liquor and beer selection. The draft selection was lacking, but they did have quite a few choices in bottles, if that doesn't bother you. I did not check their wine list, but I know they do have one.\n\nMy boyfriend ordered a chicken stir fry and I got a cheddar burger. My first thought: \"These two things should never be on a menu together.\" He said the stir fry was so-so. Ingredients were spot on, but it was lacking any real flavor. Someone mentioned this place as being a runner for best burger in town - huh?? There are a number of places I would put before Soho's: Winghart's, Burgatory, even Olive Or Twist! My cheeseburger tasted like a frozen Bubba Burger from the grocery store (you know the ones ... ). It wasn't terrible perse, but it wasn't particularly good, either. It was just so-so. The cheddar cheese on it was not very appealing - it tasted like one of those individually wrapped Kraft slices. Onion rings were tasty, but I've rarely, if ever, had bad onion rings.\n\nI would visit this place again if my focus were more so on watching a game and drinking than actually eating. Otherwise I say pass. In fact, skip into town over eating in the north shore at all.
We we're not impressed. The prices are high for what is bar food with no real uptake.\n\nService was neutral both visits (stayed in attached hotel).\n\nWould be willing to grab a cocktail but definitely better options around.
Soho was disappointing. Lunch was very crowded, so we sat at the bar, even though there was an open table for 3 by the window. We were just 4, but they wouldn't let us put an extra seat at the open table. It was also very loud for a weekday, the noise from other tables carrying easily.\n\nI ordered the french dip sandwich, with risotto on the side. To their credit, the risotto was delicious, but such a tiny portion, I inhaled it in no time. Especially considering the french dip was so boring. The meat and cheese was bland and the sauce had far too many herbs in it. Not to mention, the food is definitely over-priced. I don't think I'd go back, but if I did, I'd order the risotto and nothing else.
Bar next to stadium\nTypical\nbar next to stadium place\nWaitresses def looking for other jobs \nNot happy at all\nThis isn't even a game night
Meh. \n\nI always hope for the best. I did not, however get the best. Although I would have to say the pretzel bite appetizer wasn't bad. But I really don't think there's much you can mess up. The buffalo pierogies however, was a total miss. \n\nI do not want to make any accusations, but they did not seem to be freshly made, maybe frozen pre-made ones. And they were covered in hot sauce. It didn't look appetizing, nor did it actually taste appetizing. \n\nThey have half off appetizer specials for food and $5 drinks. But all the special drinks were mixed, and I knew they would probably be way too sweet and frou frou for me. \n\nI went with a glass of Malbec, which was a good choice. Actually, it was the best choice there. Maybe stick to beer or wine and you'll be good to go here.
Had the chicken sandwich,  my sister had the guiltless chicken. 30 minutes after ordering, our waitress came over to ask again what we had ordered because she had forgot to put the order in. Food was flavorless, plain. Was there a few nights ago for drinks after the game, waiter wouldnt allow 3 of us to sit at a 4 top table (but had a party of 1 sitting at a 4 top right next to the table we were going to sit at). Do they even have tables for 3?? 15 minutes later... he asked his manager and allowed us to sit there. Overall, its a close spot to PNC but given both experiences, wouldnt return.
Serviceable \"upscale\" chain seafood spot, with both traditional dishes and sushi.  Yes, it's expensive, but it's one of the few spots open late downtown.   The sashimi was pleasant, and it's hard to screw up oysters and seafood pasta.   Our meal basically met our admittedly low expectations.\n\nThe service is on par with your local crap-on-the-wall chain restaurant, so don't expect too much.
One in our party summed it all up:  \"When you're paying these prices, you should expect better service.\"\n\nThe food was good.  I had a sashimi platter with some additional pieces, which was perfectly average.  You can get the same thing around the corner at Sushi Kim...and I think the quality is a bit better and the price lower.\n\nAnother in our party had the rib eye.  It was cooked well and he liked it.  For dessert the cheesecake was good, although the blueberries were clearly from frozen (unacceptable in July when they're in season).\n\nI had to sit and wait 5 minutes after my food was brought out before I could flag down a server to ask for some chopsticks and soy sauce.\n\nIt's not that the servers aren't working...it's that they're spread too thin.  Understaffed.  All working hard, but covering too many tables.\n\nLong story short, I won't go back.  Walk over one block and go to Eleven!  Same price, better food and service.
- The bread was good and so was the spicy shrimp butter that came with it.\n- The lobster bisque had a very slight gummy texture to it, as if too much flour had been used.  \n- I had the lobster pasta and I was a little disappointed with the lack of sauce that accompanied it.  It was really more of a broth than anything, which made the pasta seem too soggy and also drippy and messy to eat.  My wife had the fillet mignon, which she said was one of the best she's ever had.  She thought the potato side was just so-so.\n- Each of us had a drink with our meal, which put our total at $115, including the tip.  I expect to be a little bit more wowed with a meal for that price.
I have eaten there several times.  This is an overpriced overhyped seafood restaurant.  The portions are not worth the price.  The Sushi is average at best.  The service has been poor almost every time I went.  We complained once to the manager and in the middle of talking to her she picked up the phone and totally forgot she was talking to us.  \n\nThe salads are small and nothing to write about.  The decor needs to be updated. If you ask me why I keep going back; it's not by my choice.  Usually we have several people staying at the Westin.
Came in for drinks after a conference and could not get service. Finally went searching for someone, who only came back with our order after we had nearly given up. And refills on water, coffee or soda? Forget about it.
Pittsburgh has good food.  Don't waste your time at the Fish Market.\n\nI stay in the Westin often and have had three meals at this spot in the past week.  The first was fine enough to get me to come back for a second trip.  The second time, our waitress clearly was in no hurry to serve our three-person group in the 50% occupied restaurant.  The third time, the chef's special \"coriander-crusted fluke\" came out as a couple slabs of tasteless fish coated in bread crumbs and oil and tossed onto a pile of dry couscous, and they served me the wrong salad.\n\nService: most of the staff here don't seem to respond well to ordinary social cues.  For instance, standing at the podium for two minutes probably means I want to be seated, not looked at and ignored by two different waitresses.  Or, when I go to the bar to order takeout, after I submit my order and wait for the server to tell me the wait time, I don't expect him to leave me and start washing dishes.  \n\nI may stay at the Westin, but I will exert extra effort to NOT eat there.
My experience may different from others because I am an attractive female who went in with 3 young African American males.  Good friends of mine who spent a helluva a lot of money in Pittsburgh that weekend - who work hard and expect good service for good money like everyone else.  We were greeted with reserved distant service.  The waiter said something nervously like \"It's all good,\" or something that people don't even say anymore.  A round of Patron Margaritas were horrible.  They tasted entirely like sour mix and we couldn't even take more than two sips.  Of course, when we ask that they be taken away and replaced with shots of Patron, we were got the \"oh, you're that type,\" look and it took a while to convince the waiter that there was sincerely something wrong with the drinks.  Being used to that look, black folks often stomach bad food just to not appear to be complainers, but these drinks were horrible!  \n\nSo in the spirit of good faith, we ordered the some appetizers. Shrimp cocktail, crab bisque, and two oyster samplers.  The soup was bland, shrimp were large, but had a wierd texture that didn't seem fresh or like they'd been scrubbed to hide something, and oysters were not evenly sampled on both orders. One appeared to contain mostly one type instead of the 8-9 different types.  We plunked down the $200 for the appetizers and drinks with a nice tip and said ciao - went and had dinner at Sonoma - which was much better... Fish Market needs some lessons on hospitality and diversity OR new management.
One of the only places open downtown after 10 pm mid-week. Terrible service, average and overpriced food, in a hotel lobby, doesn't make a good combo.
I've been meaning to go back to the Fish Market for so long. I remember the great crab legs I had years ago. I finally had the chance last week and was surprisingly disappointed.\n\nThe service was great. We sat at the bar and in no time both bartenders greeted us with smiles and menus. I guess my main concern was the food quality. I ordered the beet salad with warm goat cheese (was not warm at all) and shrimp and scallop linguine. Both were not unique in flavor or presentation. It was as if I made it in my own kitchen. My boyfriend enjoyed his lobster bisque and his seafood jambalya that was perfectly spicy.\n\nI do applaud the venue for offering a diverse and affordable wine list. And, with all due respect to owners, I think the atmosphere needs a serious update in character and aesthetics. Especially since other key hotels are more pleasing to the eye. This should be vital to one of the BEST hotels in the city! \n\nI'd like to return someday to give it another go. We shall see.\n\nP.S. Invest in better wine glasses. Ugly. Ugly. Ugly.
I was pretty disappointed by this experience. And I usually avoid hotel restaurants for this very reason, but I was tired and I was staying at the Westin, so here I am at the Original Fish Market...\n\nI sat at the bar and ordered dinner. The bartender was very friendly and made sure she was taking care of me. So props to her! I got a menu and a sushi menu. OK, I'm pretty sure Pittsburg isn't the most awesome place for sushi, but let's give it a shot! I started with the gumbo, which came out warm and kind of bland. It wasn't good at all. And then I had a roll, which was decent. And a spicy scallop roll. Now, everyone has their own take on spicy scallop, but this was by far the furthest from what I could imagine a spicy scallop roll could be. \n\nIt was a small roll cut into 6 pieces (maki). It had a very small amount of raw scallops, which didn't taste super fresh. Then the roll was topped with the \"spicy\". I can't identify exactly the spices that were on top, but I've had this type of spice combination on other Japanese dishes. So I know it's an off the shelf thing. Basically, this was the worst roll I could imagine.\n\nSo all-in-all, the food was sub-par at best. And the entire menu was overpriced. I would definitely eat somewhere else if I had any energy at all. I'm sure the room service would have been better.
Have you ever eaten in a place where the whole seems far less than the sum of its parts?  Believe me, the Original Fish Market fits that description.  I met my mom and dad here for a pre-concert (Bonnie Raitt) dinner and honestly I wish we'd gone someplace else.  \n\nTo be fair there wasn't anything particularly wrong with the food or service.  I've enjoyed seafood restaurants before and while my dinner was okay, it was only just \"okay\".  There wasn't anything particularly memorable about it.  Nothing that made me say, \"Wow\"!  My parents didn't hate their dinners either but they weren't impressed.\n\nAnd therein lies the problem.  The Original Fish Market wants to be a swanky hotel restaurant.  It certainly sets its prices high enough ($25.00-$45.00 per entree).  But the quality just doesn't match the price.
First time I've eaten here I went during lunch time. Not crowded but service was quite slow so I took off a star. My girlfriend ordered from their sushi lunch special and I ordered the bison burger. You're probably asking why order that when at a fish market. Well I originally planned on fish but I hadn't had bison in a while and it caught my eye. Well the menu is a bit pricey and I don't mind paying for good food so I had high expectations. He bison burger was mediocre (took a star away) The menu said bacon, but none showed up. No worries probably better for me. I felt at $15 for a bison burger this thing should freaking be awesome. Not the case. I would put it at $8.99-$9.99 price range I would pay since they gave me chips as a side. So they lost another star for over priced for the value I received. The girlfriends sushi meal was a bit over priced for a lunch menu. Two basic rolls and miso soup for $16. This would easy go for $14 at other places during lunch. So ultimately would I give it another shot? Yes, but only if it is convenient. I would not go out of my way or tell friends about this place.  \n\nHelpful advice for the OFM.  Actually have lunch specials. If you charge the prices you charge the food needs to be worth the price or you will lose return customers. Two rolls of sushi and a burger shouldn't cost me $33 unless you are going to blow minds!
I've been to the Fish Market many, many times over the last 18 years or so. It doesn't change much. They get maximum money for average seafood (or anything else). \n\nThe sushi wasn't great this last trip (last week), and didn't taste terribly fresh. The Miso soup was barely average. I did like the Tataki roll, but it was the only saving grace of the meal. \n\nOverly expensive for what you get, and service can range between average and terrible. \n\nOh, and the bartender that's been there for as long as I've been going is seriously crappy, and I'm amazed he's lasted so long - is that a union gig?
McCormick & Schmick's knockoff is the best way to describe this completely non-memorable place. \n\nI agree with the other person who said \"it's trying to be a swanky hotel bar/restaurant\". That may sound dumb but as someone who frequents hotels & their restaurants it can easily go either way. I've found you can get a great read on a place by the vibe of a hotel lounge. \n\nI hope for Pittsburgh this is not the case. Did I expect more from a Westin? Yes. Am I surprised? No.\n\nSub-par sushi. Tasted like takeout from Wegmans (holler, Rochester!). My Sauv Blanc was room temp & obviously an old bottle because it tasted nothing like it should (Kim Crawford is my standby so this was extra disappointing). Walk across the street & check out the Tonic Bar, I wish I had.
I am sorry to have to give the Original Fish Market a 2 rating, I could of given it a 3-4 but the service was pretty sad! We sat down for lunch after checking into our hotel room. We waited too long for the waiter to initially great us, and there may have only been 5-10 diners in the entire restaurant, so this is the main reason for a 2, hopefully it's a rarity because the food was pretty good. I had the Cod sandwich , it was hot and tasty, probably one of the better fish sandwiches I've had. So it disappoints me to dole out a 2 but service is important!
We checked this out for lunch, since we were staying at the Weston.\n\nThe sushi, I thought, was pretty good.  Nothing outstanding, and I probably wouldn't seek it out again, but it wasn't bad.  My friends ordered other things off the menu; the verdict was largely that the food looked good, but was bland; this was especially apparently true of the fish sandwich.\n\nThe attached bar is *small* with a very limited selection of beers and liquors.  Perplexingly, they also have loads of bar seating, but don't open that area for happy hour time.  It seems you could not get appetizers and hang out until some point later in the evening.\n\nSuper expensive too.  Go somewhere else for lunch, there are many better options in the area.
Went here on a Monday at around 7:00.  The bar was filled with the usual suspects; guys in Brioni suits drinking away the stress, unfortunate weather and reality they have to head home to the wives who just dropped 3-5k at pottery barn.\n\nThe drinks were solid, and very fair priced (based on NY and Chicago pricing)  The open(ish) floor plan would accommodate a happy hour very well.  The food on the other hand - absolutely horrible.\n\nWe had lamb, chili prawns, ahi, chicken (something) and Chorizo.  The 'fusion' southern Spain meets some Japanese influenced small plates works, but the execution was deplorable.  \n\nVerdict: Drink but avoid the food at all costs...
SO disappointed with this place! I've been wanting to try it for some time and finally did and boy...what a letdown. I had heard that it was one of downtown's happening Happy Hour places, but on the Tuesday night I went, it was 99% empty. The menu was pretty random and everything we tried was really average. The drinks weren't anything special either.  No innovation here in the food, drinks, or decor.
Girls looking for a sugar daddy, guys looking for a cougar, or if you're just a pretentious douche: Bossa Nova is the place for you.\n\nThe atmosphere is downright tragic for how hard it tries.  The bar prices scream to the proletariat: \"Let them drink beer down the street! We only want the bourgeois in here.\"  Even the DJ they had during the Gallery Crawl a few weeks back was tragic.  I mean I know that the DJ has to appease the sugar daddies and cougars but is every place in Pittsburgh required to have 80s music?  I'm sure it is in the liquor license application.\n\nThat said, the barstaff is generally friendly and very quick - most likely so you don't realize you just paid eight dollars for a beer.
This rating is for the drinks only and atomosphere, and based on my personal taste a bit ok  a big bit. This is definately a \"I'm a young professional pittsburgh business person and I've arrived.\" Status bar or \"I'm a young college girl and I've just had my first boob job care to help fund my nose job too?\" Bar , I did not try the food becaused I moved from a place where we have awesome brazilian restaurant where fresh meats melt in your mouth accompanied by tart sweet grilled pineapple, and real slow cooked brazilian beans mmmm. Soooo after seeing how pittsburgh does Mexican food I'm not willing to drop my pennies to risk the disapointment of pittsbugh attmepts brasilian. \n\nThe bar is roomy with nice lounge seating which is nice for those who don't want to participate in the round the bar meat market. The guys make for fun people watching, either all suits or in their pirates jerseys. Or the occaisional jersey shore look a like meat heat in his v neck t shirt who is too good to attempt so much as a toe tap to the beat of the music. Then there's the balding old man with twenty something on his arm who already looks like she has botoxed up her face in an attempt to mirror her idol kim k. There are few older gay gentlemen I would have liked to chat with who mad things a little more interesting. There was an awesome looking woody Allen meets Andy Warhol look a like with cool glasses, and an awesome white frizzy mane.\n\nThe women range from down to earth girlfriends in for chat, drink and dance to wifes and girlfriends grinding it up on the dance floor with their man to the cougars. Warning Cougar dance zone, these women looked decent though and I'll give it to em they weren't afraid to shake it. \n\nMy biggest gripe about this place (I know I haven't gotten there yet), the drinks are sugary syrup crap. You can only put too many sugary alcohols together before you get a tummyache, you might as well be drinking the syrup flavors starbucks puts in your coffee. Stick to something on the rocks or a vodka soda most places cannot screw that up too badly (aside from Bar louie) but I will get to them later. Price is lame also 8 bucks and up for a mojito and they use coconut rum in it! Yuck. Sorry my college days of only being able to handle coconut rum are over, it is was frat guys give girls with a roofie.\n\nAnyway moving on my biggest gripe was that there is a cop standing by the door, who looks like he just walked away from beating a non white person to death. I know I know cops have the hardest job and I will be the first to say it, but this guy has a thick energy so nasty it hits you in the face from across the room. The way he was looking at the non white people who were a little to \"loud\" for his tastes, no louder than the booming music mind you. Made my stomach churn. Also they used him to close at 1:15am on a saturday. Thats pretty lame for a downtown bar just because they were not packed. Bars in Salt Lake City Utah do that, come on BossaNova this is pittsburgh aka  drinkersville, not mormondryville. Just sayin....
I've been going to this bar randomly over the last 5 years. It's definitely gone downhill.\nMy last experience here was when I was trying to plan a birthday party during happy hour on a Friday during the summer. When I called to reserve some space, they told me they only reserve seating areas for people who pre-purchase food. Which, the pre-purchase options were about $10-12/person. I wasn't about to pre-order food for a casual birthday get together. So, figuring they'd probly be very busy on a Friday night, we got there around 4:30. There were MAYBE 6 people around the bar. No one in the lounge seating area. I sort of felt undervalued as a customer for not being able to reserve space when no one was there. 5:30 came around, the bar got a little busier, but no where near the packed house crowd they painted as a picture for me when I tried making reservations.\nOur waiter was sub par. People sat without drinks for 20+ minutes, and some people just didn't get to order, because one person would order a drink and the waiter dashed off, leaving others to call out after him (to no avail.) He would basicalyl take 1-2 orders, and run off, not to return for 10 minutes. \n\nThis place is average in food price and quality. But the attitude of this place could be better. Go to Six Penn instead. They have outstanding service without the pompous attitude, and in the summer they have a roof top patio with a bar and lots of seating. Best in town!
First impression:\nThe guys here were borderline rude to me when I dropped my car off. I thought I had talked to someone on the phone and made an arrangements. It turns out there are two Monro Muffler locations on Penn Ave and no employee at either shop thought to bring this up (then, or at any point), as I had called the wrong location (I found out days later).\n\nService:\nThey took my car in anyway and said \"they'd get to it tomorrow\", well tomorrow became the next day and the day after... \n\nGot a call that the mufflers I bought for the car turned out to be the wrong ones so I called around, tracked down the right ones, and dropped the correct ones off there within two hours of the call.\n\nQuality of work:\nAll in all it took a week for them to get the work done and I was under the impression they would be welding the whole system together. It turns out they just use clamps and bolt stuff together. I asked them to make me some tail pipes for me with bends over the rear axle and they couldn't do it with 2.5\" pipe, turns out they are incapable of bending anything over 2\" pipes there. Instead we agreed it would be easiest for them and cheapest to install short turndown pipes. So really it wasn't a terribly difficult job to be done.\n\nOverall impression:\nI gave two stars instead of one because they didn't actually break anything or lose my car or burn it down or anything. Pricing came in just over what we had agreed on because of the addition of the turndown pipes. I could have saved a lot of money and time and done it myself.
Don't bother. \n\nWe were kind of desperate to find a place that wasn't too pricy and close to our hotel on a Monday night. We saw this place, with the low lighting and witty name (although we weren't sure if they're cleaver enough to make the theater reference or if it was simply a mistake).\n\nThey boast a new menu and I got the pasta with goat cheese and almonds. I didn't have high expectations but this was like family meal before your serving shift. It was boring and flavor free. My boyfriend got a steak sandwich that looked punny. Oh, and the grocery store wine was way over priced.\n\nBoo!
I only went here to have a few drinks, and talk with a friend who wasn't sure if he wanted to eat or not. We were escorted to a table and were cool, the waitress was friendly and tentative since our conversation was rollin'. Long story short we were there for 5 hours, just drinking, and if our waitress could of re-worded her words, our experience wouldn't have been so sour. She came over and stated \"I'm leaving here is the check, if you would like to stay you're more then welcome to order from the bar.\" So we continued to talk not thinking anything of it, or someone was going to pick up her tip. WELL not two minutes later she comes back to us and says \" IM LEAVING, I need you to pay your check.\" At this point me being me, gets a little annoyed, as my friend is looking at me like no she didn't! So he paid as a gentlemen do, and we continued the night, as they dimmed the lights and shut off the music we got the hint we've been talking way to long. If she could have been a tid more polite, it would have been a good experience. The atmosphere was great, the food looked good, but your sour mouth ruined it all.
I get it. It gets busy when you're a bartender/waitress sometimes. I've been there myself. But you can explain why things are late or why it takes nearly half an hour to pour a glass of wine without being incredibly rude and cold, and if you even say it with an apologetic smile, most customers will understand. Food was fine, won't go back for fear of the server.
The genius of the \"Olive or Twist\" name got us in the door here, but we didn't have the best experience with their mixers.\n\nWhile here, we sampled the blueberry mojito and the cucumber basil martini.  The blueberry mojito had an overpowering taste of rum. As a strong drink, it was good. However, the rum killed any blueberry or mint flavor in the drink. For the cucumber basil martini, the basil is the primary flavor in the drink and kills any undertones of the cucumber. The sole basil flavor of this drink made it unappealing.\n\nIn addition to a cocktail menu, they also offer a reasonable selection of beers including microbrews.
In town on business and I always try to find places like this.  Wow, a martini bar not named the Blue Martini?  OK, I'm in!\n\nSo I strolled over and walked in.  First impression was it was a cool, cozy, and trendy joint.  Liked the exposed brick walls, lighting, etc.  Only problem is, I don't go to a restaurant or a bar to eat and drink the atmosphere!\n\nSo I grab a table in the bar.  It was about 5pm and there might have been 15 people in the whole place.  Two bartenders made eye contact with me so I figured they would be waiting on me.  I figured wrong.  I sat there for a good ten minutes and was getting ready to get up and leave when the younger tender came over and said with a \"deer in the headlights look\", do you want a drink or something????  Well hell, what was your first guess?  I refrained from quoting Foxworthy and saying \"here's your sign\"!\n\nSo OK we were off to a bumpy start.  I didn't have a martini, however there was a few options on the drink menu.  I was just here for a bite, so my review is based on that.\n\nA few minutes later the other bartender comes back with my water and gives me a menu.  I ordered some turkey wrap with a fruit salad for a side.  I say \"some\" turkey wrap because it was really that unimpressive!  \n\nIt seemed to take forever for it to arrive.  Given the fact that it wasn't busy, it did take a long time to arrive.  When it did, it looked OK.  The fruit salad looked as if it was ready for the trash, so I bypassed that.  The wrap just had zero flavor and was loaded with lettuce........way to much.  The only flavor that presented itself was blandness!  It was very disappointing.\n\nAll in all, I think this is probably a way better bar to have a drink in then a restaurant.  I will return to try a martini, but I will pass on the food.
I was really excited when I saw the menu for this place because they had some vegetarian items that sounded delicious. I liked the decor, with exposed brick walls, soft lighting and we went there on a night with live music. But the positives stop there. I had the veggie burger. The burger was the typical veggie burger that a lot of restaurants are trying now - with all of the veggies in the patty - and people continually make it mushy. The mushy texture made me nauseous so I didn't finish that. I got the side of garlic mashed potatoes, and I'm pretty confident those came out of a box, though that ended up being my favorite thing. \n\nMy date got nachos, which are advertised with lots of goodies on top. Lies! They were covered in melted but cold cheese, a sprinkle of diced tomatoes and a scoop each of guacamole and sour cream. Neither one of us ate more than 3 chips. \n\nFinally, I ordered Patron with Rose's line juice. First sip... Completely bitter and disgusting! So I asked her. And she said, oh right, we don't have sweetened line juice, he probably just used lime juice. So I asked for her to add some simple syrup, which she did. And then it was drinkable. But come on. She should have thought of that upfront! \n\nDon't go here for anything but the walls and music.
So I decided to surprise my fianc\u00e9 one night by taking her here(because we've been talking about doing so for a while). We both got martinis and the nachos and buffalo spread apps. The martinis were just ok, and the food was very basic and nothing special. I will give the place another try and get some non appetizers next time and hope the bartender is a bit better at mixing the drinks.
Visited with a party of 8 last weekend for a friend's birthday. We walked in the door and could see no apparent host stand, so we tried the door next to the one we entered. This ended up leading to a private party. Can you say awkward?\n\nWe went back in the main door, clearly confused. The bartender looked at us but kept pouring drinks (rude!). Not even sure how we discovered it, but the host stand was in the BACK of the restaurant. How were we supposed to know this? We were seated, and had to wait awhile for service.\n\nFinally, the server came and took our drink orders and suggested a very strong drink for me. He was obviously trying to get me drunk (and succeeded). Caution: The Vesper is a strong *ss gin martini that is just okay. You pay 11 bucks to drink a shot of gin slowly from a fancy glass. \n\nHe then took our order...and did not think to write any of the 8 requests down. Yep, you guessed it. He screwed up our orders and bills, then proceeded to be rude about the situation. \n\nThe buffalo chicken dip is awesome, but be prepared, there is no chicken. We had one chunk in the two orders. The deep fried pita chips taste like donuts and are muy excellente. \n\nAlso, prepare yourself for bartenders squeezing caramel into glasses. The sound is reminiscent of flatulence. Over and over. So much flatulence. \n\nI was too drunk and full of pita donuts to eat my dinner. The two bites of my pork belly sandwich were pretty alright though.\n\nJesse from Bob Evans down the road is far superior to the condescending server here. We highly recommend Jesse.
Fares keep going up. Another service cut this month. I think I'd rather walk to work in the middle of the night!
Oh, PAT buses, why can't I quit you?\n\nHere's the deal: I 100% blame Pittsburgh's bus system problems on Port Authority.  Between the winding bus routes, the inability of buses to show up on time, and the outrageous money spent on retirement plans, it should be disbanded.  The city needs to take over and reconfigure the entire system.  The Post-Gazette has printed some great pieces that explain how the system could be overhauled.\n\nI've been a bus rider since birth (I still never drive), and it's only gotten worse over the years.  Some routes are great (outside of rush hours), others are ridiculous, and some good routes were recently cut.  Until transfers are free (which they should be within an hour window, in my opinion), it was insane to cut the 500, which added $10 a week to my bus tab just to get to work.\n\nIt is usable?  If you don't care about being on time.  I shouldn't have to show up 10 minutes early to catch a bus that should be coming by every 20 minutes according to the schedule.  I shouldn't have to stand in the middle of downtown traffic to flag down the 28x Airport Flyer when I'm standing at the stop and have an enormous purple suitcase.  When I'm going to work, I look up when I should be arriving...And then go back 1-2 time blocks to make sure I'm on time since I can't trust the bus.\n\nBus riders understand not all buses use the exclusive bus lanes, but maybe Port Authority should build the delays that happen every day into the schedule.  For example, there is not a chance that an inbound 71B takes a similar amount of time during the morning rush hour as it does mid-day.  I know this from experience.  Why doesn't the schedule know this?\n\nThe buses are so bad that now that I am two miles from work, I walk to and from every day.  In fact, I often BEAT the 71B home.  That means as I stroll two miles down Fifth Avenue, not a single bus passes me.  On the busiest section of the busiest non-highway street in Pittsburgh (data according to me).  How is this possible?\n\nFinally, we live in Pittsburgh.  It's cold or raining or miserable most of the year.  I would gladly take fewer stops in exchange for heated bus shelters.  It would also be nice if these imaginary shelters could have bus arrival information.  Pitt's on the right track with their bus shelters at the Cathedral--take note.
I would give it a \"1-star\" review but the caption under \"2-star\" is more like it, \"Meh.  I've experience better.\"\n\nI have a love-hate relationship with PAT.  The buses are unreliable timing wise and a majority of the drivers are jerks.  From having to be 10 minutes early (I shouldn't have to play it safe!) to being prepared to wait for a couple buses since rush hour means over crowded buses ... PAT is like a powder keg.  You just never know when its going to blow up on your commute.\n\nI do ride the bus daily.  And yes, it would take me the exact amount of time to drive in/out to work.  So honestly ... I treat PAT like I treat Airplane travel.  I get there when I get there ... as lone as I get there safely the on-time part is something I have learned to stop prioritizing as long as I'm riding a PAT bus.  ((Seriously tho, there's something wrong about having to make that concession!!))
I don't even really know where to begin with this review. I guess the most sensical thing to do with such a nonsensical transit system is a pros and cons list. (If nothing it will be the quickest and least painful for me and for you, my dear sweet reader.)\n\nPros -\nIt is rare to find I can't get a bus to a place I want to go. Truth be told I don't leave the city a whole lot, but anytime I want to get somewhere with some leg work I can find a bus to take me where I want.\n\nMy morning bus (especially the insanely early 5am 86 from Bloomfield to work and the gym downtown) is almost always on time. \n\nCons - \nIt's a known fact that the last 54 from the Southside to the East End/Oakland/Etc rarely to never comes and the \"last one\" is NOT late enough to be considered an after the bars options to get home.\n\nIt's pretty common for the buses to either be a full 15 min early or 10 min late.\n\nI've seen more than one person pee themselves.\n\nI've had a bus driver just plain ignore my request for a stop and then ignore ME while I'm telling them as much.\n\nPACKED buses and constantly cutting routes and trips.\n\nDirty buses. I've seen a dirty diaper or two.\n\nI don't own a car so it's really my only mode of transportation since we can catch cabs here like in a normal city. I'd be lost without it, but it could be much much much better.
Well, it does get one from point A to point B in Pittsburgh.\n\nBut it's expensive, at least compared to the Metro Transit in Minneapolis that I'm used to. On Port Authority, it's $2.25 for a ticket, and an extra $1 for a transfer (which only gets you on one more bus, not all the way to your destination if it requires a bunch of transfers.) Coming from a maximum of $3 for two and a half hours of bus rides (express bus during rush hour), Port Authority is steep. I had to grab cash a couple of different times just to make sure I could keep paying fares throughout the days.\n\nThere's no day pass. Boo. If you're traveling a lot throughout the day, it adds up fast without some sort of pass.\n\nAlso, the 28X doesn't pick up passengers coming from downtown into Oakland (or drop them off in the reverse direction.) Very frustrating, especially with a Megabus terminal only three blocks away from one of the stops. (There's also Greyhound and Amtrak downtown, if I remember correctly.)
A BIG FAT DISAPPOINTMENT\n\n\nI am concerned with the future of Port Authority, will Pittsburgh continue to have bus service as we know it?\nPort Authority constantly causes me a great deal of anxiety.  I have been riding the bus for as long as I can remember. We never had a car in my family. Now I am starting to feel like I've taken the bus for granted.\n\nI have a license but I choose not to drive...because I work Downtown and the cost of renting a parking space Downtown is HIGH!!! \n\nAnyway Port Authority to sum it up, is a hot damn mess.  How could I have forgotten? \nI have been shut in bus doors by ignorant, rude, nasty bus drivers Twice!!! \n\nAnd when it happen the first time, the bus drive wouldn't even apologize to me, \nThe bus drivers are a miserable bunch, just down right rotten,
As a car-less denizen of PGH, I rely on PAT buses to get from Point A to Point B.  Living in Oakland, PAT offers buses to many places I need to go (downtown, the grocery store, the airport, etc.). As a PITT employee, the price (free) is right.\n\nHaving said this, I have several gripes:\n\n1.) Buses almost never run on time, and there's no way to know when the next one is coming other than asking the other people at the bus stop how long they've been waiting. Come on, it's 2014--a GPS-enabled device should be in every bus so you can check to see where it is, or there should be a SMS alert system.  Singapore had this for their buses in 2010!\n\n2.) Some drivers can be surly or just downright ignorant. More than once, a bus has passed me when waiting at a stop for no apparent reason, or has failed to hold on for 5-10 s. as I huffed and puffed to catch it. For whatever reason, the outbound 28X seems to be especially problematic.  True story: Last time I rode it, the driver didn't know where she was going, and we ended up crossing the Liberty Bridge, despite pax telling her this wasn't the route. To make matters worse, this was the last 28X of the night, so due to this detour, I didn't get home until after 1am.\n\n3.) Regardless of which route you ride, the clientele can be a bit sketch. Some drivers will also let homeless people ride without paying/a voucher out of pity. On one occasion, a pax regaled the bus with nonsensical poetry (not sure if he was under the influence or just mentally incapacitated...), and the driver did nada about it (though it was amusing).\n\n4.) The system of when to pay is nonsensical.  Despite having a terminal degree and having lived in PGH for 3 years, I still haven't figured it out, and have to rely on cues from the bus driver. While I understand the reason behind it (the free zone downtown), there must be a less confusing solution.  Get on it!\n\n5.) For those who don't have a PITT or CMU pass, fares--including monthly passes--are expensive ($2.50 per trip). Pro Tip: For a round trip, when you pay for the first leg, ask for a transfer and use it on the second leg--this shaves $1.50 off your fare.\n\n6.) Even in Oakland, where route options are better than in most areas of the city, there are no direct buses to some areas I'd like to visit (e.g., the Strip). Also, other than the P1 from downtown, buses serving the East Busway only run during rush hour on weekdays, and even the P1 only runs hourly off rush hour.\n\nI've ridden public transit in other cities, and for its size, PGH should have a better system and lower fares.  For starters, the T (light rail) should be expanded to run east-west along the busways, given that it's currently a line to nowhere.
4.5 stars????   Really?????  Based on what?   The food is okay, but not great; standard breakfast diner fare.  The staff is friendly.  The prices are all right for what you get.  What I found most annoying was the uncomfortable seating.  The seats at the counter were torn and tilting off the base.  The booths were fast-food style: hard and tight.  It's as if they designed the seating to be uncomfortable so that you wouldn't linger.
Here's how you can make your own Primanti Bros Sandwich at home:\n\nTake two slices of Italian Bread, between them, mash together bland cole slaw, fries, some assorted meat, tomatoes. And at your fingertips is Pitt's pride and joy.  I'm not from here, so maybe I don't share the love. We weren't really drunk when we were eating here, and it was in the middle of the day. \n\nThe service was pretty slow, but when our order was taken, the sandwich came out very fast.\n\nIt was a good sandwich in terms of having really hot meat, and cold tomatoes and cole slaw, but I didn't think its as tasty as it could have been.\n\nI think the bread should be buttered and toasted/grilled texas toast, and they should use seasoned fries. Use some sweet North Carolina style Cole slaw. \nI came, I saw, and I conquered, but I'm giving it back. I probably won't be back ever again.
I was out of town in Pittsburgh, and I was told this was the place to go to get the PA experience.  The meal started off pretty well with $2 Yuenglings and amazing chili, cheese, sour cream and bacon fries.  However, things took a turn for the worse when the famous sandwiches came out.  Two of us had the turkey and one had the colossal fish.  I thought the turkey was slimy and tasted weird.  The fries added almost no flavor to the sandwich, and the cole slaw was gross.  The bread was terrible, and overall, the sandwich made me nauseous.  Totally not worth it, unless you just go for the fries and drinks.
I'm gonna get slaughtered for giving this place a bad review, but whatever. \n\nI was told by several people that I absolutely HAD to check out Primanti Bros while I was in Pittsburgh. I was excited about visiting this institution during my stay... but it really didn't deliver for me. \n\nYes, this was a huge sandwich with fries and cole slaw in it, but the sheer quantity of food didn't make up for the fact that it was really bland. Maybe I just got the wrong thing (the Pittsburger Cheese Steak - which is somehow their #2 seller...?). My friend liked her sandwich, which was eggs and bacon, I believe. Maybe we just went to the wrong Primanti Bros location. \n\nI would give this place another shot if I'm ever in town again, but my first impression wasn't a great one.
Alright, I heard about this chain on Man v. Food and we just had to try it out. And honestly, we were quite disappointed. The sandwich is tasteless unless you douse it with condiments or get a particularly flavorful filling. I got the cheese one and my boyfriend got the colossal fish (both vegetarians--its not so friendly for us...fail). Neither sandwich was impressive--in size or taste. I'm a 5\"4' and 120lb girl and I finished mine no problem. Just incredibly bland. The bread tasted like cheap white bread, the fries were just incredibly greasy, the cole slaw was hardly cole slaw and more like wet cabbage. The cheese on mine was basically tasteless and my boyfriends fish was definitely from a box of something frozen. Very disappointing.
Okay, I'm a heretic. I'm prepared to be stoned by the fundamentalists.\n\nA native sent me here, an apparent Pittsburgh landmark. My wife and I are not cole slaw fans, so we ordered our hot sausage sandwich sans slaw.\n\nWhat I got was a very dry and tasteless sandwich. The fries were lifeless and the hot sausage was not not. The bread was devoid of texture and flavor.\n\nSo, yeah, I didn't order it The Way It's Supposed To Be. Maybe if you're into cole slaw, this is the place to go, but if you don't, keep walking. Service was indifferent, at best.
My first time at Primanti Bros in Pittsburgh, PA.  I was not impressed with my sandwich there.  I've only been once so maybe I ordered the wrong thing but it just wasn't blowing my skirt up.\n\nI ordered the corned beef sandwich with the fries and slaw and it tasted a little bland to me.  It needed some sauce.  I think with some mustard this might have been great.  It was dry.  I did enjoy the cole slaw.\n\nThe service was fast and the server we had was very friendly and attentive.
I'm with others here - not a lover of Primanti Bros.  Sandwiches are fine (I have ordered the turkey and cheese) but the service is horrible.  Rude, arrogant, and just nasty.  Plus when is the last time a broom has been taken to the floors?  (I'm reviewing the Monroeville one here).
Decided to try the place since I heard about it and is listed in things to do in Pittsburgh. This place is really connected to Pittsburgh itself and Conan even mentioned it in one of his shows as a place to eat at.\n\nOrdered the \"2nd most popular\" item which was the cheesesteak that was very, very plain. Nothing great about the patty. The thing was HUGE and stacked with fries and coleslaw which I found didn't work well (although there are others out there that do it with success!)\n\nYou can't deviate and ask for it without the coleslaw either and their menu stated it as \"All of our sandwiches come with...\"\n\nThe portions are huge, one order can feed 2 average appetites.  \n\nThe fries were the only upside of this place.\n\nThe service here is horrible.. there was 2 people running the place and our tables werent clean and it takes forever.. I don't blame it on the servers but whoever manages the place.\n\nI don't think I will ever go back again.
When I told people I was going to Pittsburgh, everyone recommended Primanti Bros. I went and was underwhelmed. It was a big sandwich, but the flavour was not amazing. I also ordered a bowl of chili which was too spicy for me. As a Chicago native, I feel it's the equivalent of people recommending Giordano's or Portillo's. They're not exactly the greatest places in town, but they're well-known and popular for one reason or another. Do it just to say you did.\n\nI don't like coleslaw.
eh.\n\nGo here once to say you did. You'll get a sandwich with soggy fries and coleslaw on it. It will be pretty huge. That is all.\n\nI might go back to check out the nightlife. I'll update my review then.
It wasn't bad, but it definitely wasn't good. \n\nAs soon as we walked in the door the place was jammed back with people who were not interested in seating anyone or telling anyone they would be seated. On one side of the restaurant there were literally two girls working, and one of them was pregnant. You can imagine the chaos. I wanted to have this \"Pittsburgh\" experience that I've heard so much about but honestly I was more than underwhelmed. \n\nAfter being seated, it took the waitress 10 minutes to get around to actually saying hello to us and in between that time a large group of people decided to squeeze in a booth behind our table making my friend having to get up every time a waitress or another person needed to squeeze back there.\n\nThe sandwich at best was mediocre. The coleslaw was a bit too vinegary for my tastes and became sickening after the first half of the sandwich. I needed a lot of ketchup to even finish the sandwich. Not to mention I got a nice souvenier of vinegary smelling hands afterwards. \n\nIf you're a tourist, go do it to say you had a colossal sandwich and lived the \"Pittsburgh\" experience. Apart from that, I don't know why you'd return.
Woulda been a 1 star review if not for our cute & courteous waitress.\n\nThat said: YUCK!   This was my second supremely dissapointing Primanti's experience in nearly a decade of living in this fine little city.  I guess the fascination with this place must be that it it 1. has a bar 2. you don't have to order a side of fries or coleslaw because it's all gonna be slathered on your sandwich.  Bleh!  On my first Primanti experience, I ordered a corned beef sandwich as it shoud be, no fries or coleslaw on it.  So I was served 2 slices of bread and about 1.5 slices of corned beef.  What a rip off.  2nd experience, today, equally as awful.  But as i said... waitstaff was great.  I ordered a \"Pitts-burger\" with coleslaw and fries on the side.  Seriously, the quality of the burger I was served made 7-11 mini mart burgers seem gourmet.  I guess you really see what their overpriced, crappy sandwiches are truly made of when you strip off the fries & coleslaw.  Their fries are also soggy and gross.  Not a whole lot goin' on here except for cutie/attentive waitresses.  \n\nIf you want a decent, GIANT-sized sandwich and a real PGH experience, go to Peppi's.
I understand Primanti is a historic institution here in Pittsburgh but other than the name I don't think it has much going on unless you're in the mood for quantity versus quality. I got reeled into my experience because everyone said to try it when I moved here. Really simple menu as you just choose the meat you'd like in your sandwich. I went with pastrami which was good but the combination of the cole slaw, tomato, french fries and bread was just okay and made it soggy as I finished the second half. The sheer size of it all was just too much too. I wouldn't return again, though if you're visiting and into doing Pittsburgh touristy stuff I would say you would need to experience Primanti to judge for yourself.
I walked in, sat down, and ordered an IC light. Looked around, and realized that this restaurant looks awfully like one of the restaurants I saw on the food network where the guy goes around and eats these ridiculously large meals. After eating a Pittsburgher (the second most popular dish) and trying the colossal fish sandwich, and a capicola sandwich, I've decided that the best part of my meal was the IC light. \n\nMy friend's colossal fish was the best of the three and it's best eaten as two meals. My Pittsburgher was the pitts and I wouldn't order it again. Unlike your pitts on a 90+ degree day, it was really dry. The sandwich was only salvaged by my grotesque use of hot sauce. The concept isn't that ridiculous either. Just get fries and coleslaw and put it in your sandwich. The chili cheese fries were mediocre as well, but the portion again was hugemongous.\n\nI'd come back here if I were in Pittsburgh again because its just a nice place to chill at on Market Square. But the food is only serviceable. Substituting quantity with quality can only get you so far.\n\nThe ambiance, service, atmosphere, and tradition makes this place pretty unique, but it don't make the food taste better.
Maybe the expectations were too high, but I had a pastrami sandwich and I thought it was quite bland. The only flavors were vinegar and pepper. It was better with hot sauce, but I expected better.
I heard from everyone that the Primanti sandwiches are the quintessential Pittsburgh food. \n\nWe scored a nice seat outside and indulged in some Iron Hill beer that was on special for $2 for a  20 oz beer. The sandwiches were fine and were inexpensive.\n\nBe warned that everything here comes with french fries, even the salads.
Primanti's is a Pittsburgh institution.  The original is in the strip district just outside of downtown proper.  They are famous for large sandwiches with the fries IN the sandwich, not on the side.  Idea was born out of truckers wanting a meal they could eat on the road.  Yes, if you are in PIT you should probably go once just to say you've been there.  That being said, I have been a number of times and tried a number of different sandwiches and to be honest they all were fairly bland.  Lack of flavor really hurts them in my opinion.
Primanti Brothers is definitely a Pittsburgh institution. If you are traveling through, you definitely have stop here, at least for the novelty factor. Overall, food is good for a... well, for a sandwich shop... But in the end, I didn't leave with a sense that I really had to come back. \n\nThe real novelty at Primanti Brothers is that all of there sandwiches include french fries and cole slaw inside that sandwich. And to that I say... \"who cares\".  I personally didn't care for the fries and slaw inside my sandwich, but I am also not a huge french fry or cole slaw fan. (I like the good ones, but I can easily pass on average,) I will say that their cole slaw, which was vinegar rather than mayonnaise based, was quite good. And there fries were above average, but not as good as somewhere like say, Five Guys. \n\nThe ingredients in the sandwich were all pretty good. I had the Pastrami and my friend had the Angus steak. The bread, meat, cheese, etc., were all good quality and were distinct when tasted individually. The sandwiches also seemed to work OK as a package, but for some reason for me--aside from the novelty factor--they didn't stand out. I think that maybe with the fries and slaw in there, there is just too much going on and those two tend to dominate the whole sandwich. It really takes over and you hardly taste the quality of the other ingredients. \n\nOn the plus side, the sandwiches average about $7 each, and for that price, your get a pretty decent sandwich. In the end, Primanti Brothers is a definite must try if you are passing through, but I don't see myself craving these babies any time soon.
I really don't know what the hype is about.  I was quite underwhelmed with this restaurant.
Prior to writing my review for Primanti Bros., I put on my helmet, tooth guard, started my car and prepared to run away once the angry hordes of Pittsburghers read my review...Why you ask?   Get ready for it....deep breath...\n\nI...don't...like...Primantis...\n\nGasp!  Choke!  Faint!\n\nYes, yes, I know.  As a born and bred Pittsburgher, I am committing blasphemy by admitting I don't like Primantis.  I don't like their sandwiches, I don't like their nachos, I don't like their soups, salads, wings or fries.  I find the whole idea of a sandwich containing 3,000 calories worth of Italian bread, cole slaw, meat, and fries just too over the top.  The fries are a soggy mess, the slaw has too much vinegar, the meats are cheap, and the bread is...well the bread is actually ok.\n\nI know it's a Pittsburgh institution and it even served a very pragmatic purpose back in the day, but now it's just kitsch that gets the city featured on Food Network on occasion.  I've eaten there numerous times and have done my Pittsburgh duty of taking all out of towners to the (in)famous Primanti's, but always with the caveat that, \"It's not that good.\" and usually an apology afterward.\n\nSo there you have it.  I do feel like a giant weight has been lifted off of my shoulders.  I no longer have to carry around my terrible, terrible secret.
I was very excited to go here because of all the buzz about this place.  To be honest this place was not that good at all.  The sandwiches, although unique, were not that good. It was all french fries and very little meat.  My husband and I were almost mad at how little meat was on the sandwiches.  We won't be going back but at least we experienced it.
Underwhelming is one word that comes to mind. The meat tasted cheap, the fries were soggy and the sandwich as a whole was pretty tasteless.\nMaybe my expectations were just too high, I don't know. I went bc I had to, but I definitely will skip next time I'm in town.
Boring sandwich. Period. I fell for the \"hype\" and while it was filling for $7 bucks, it just did not satisfy a craving...I had the corned beef.
We did the obligatory Primanti Bros stop on our recent first visit to Pittsburgh. We can understand how it's a novelty to have fries on everything. But if they're not seasoned well and crisp...what's the point? When a place gets talked up so much, you can't help but have big expectations. We were disappointed...\n\nHere's the thing, when you sit down at a restaurant and the table is filthy, the menus have food all over them, and they bring your drinks in Solo cups...Without a doubt, if I were still in college and needed to nurse a hangover, this would probably be a go-to place. \n\nMy husband ordered the Italian Sausage, which was obscenely big, with good flavor, but again the fries were mush and flavorless. Luckily, we had ordered an additional side of slaw, because that's truly what made the sandwich, which was very tasty. We also ordered the \"vegetarian\" soup which was good, but I ordered a chix salad because a MASSIVE sandwich with fries and slaw on it was just not calling me. Little did I know, the gimmick of fries on everything meant fries on everything....including my salad. It was really gross to have these tasteless grease piles on my salad which I couldn't even eat. Although we were dining there, the salad came in a plastic to-go box and pre-packaged dressing in a packet. The chicken was like tasteless rubber. \n\nWe checked of the \"Primanti Bros\" box, but won't be back.
Disappointed, big time.\n\nLocal info lauds this place as an institution.\n\nI say: pass.  The sandwich was soggy, bland, and just all-around not good.\n\nI didn't get sick from it, so that's a bonus.  \n\nChoose wisely.  Go to Meat & Potatoes instead, and order a sandwich there.
My sister-in-law, husband, and I visited this Primanti Bros from all the hype we'd been hearing about it. I have to say its overrated. I wasn't impressed with my sandwich at all. I ordered the chicken breast, my hubby got the fish, and my SIL got the steak. It had thick white bread, an overload of cole slaw, and fries. I don't think the \"meat\" you order makes a difference in the bland taste, as it's overpowered by the slaw and fries. The bread was dry on the crust and yet soggy from the slaw/oil from fries. The wait staff wasn't friendly either. They seemed to have the \"I don't need try to so hard because we're busy no matter what\" attitude. We had to go up to the bar to get refills on our drinks after waiting over 10 min. for the waitress to notice we were out. The place was constantly busy due to the full bar and nostalgic feel of the restaurant; it had it's own local charm. I'm glad to say I tried it, however I probably wouldn't go back on our next visit.
If you like sandwiches with french fries piled on them, go for it.   But no good sandwich needs nonsense like that.  These are not very good sandwiches to begin with and adding soggy fries doesn't help.  Not to mention the bread is not fresh and is just a thick, bland wonder-bready thing.  \n\nI appreciate that they're not aiming at  customers like me.  Big sloppy sandwiches are fun for a lot of people so I hate to be a party pooper, but I don't think the quality is there.
This place holds a nostalgic appeal for people born and raised in Pittsburgh who grew up eating here. If that experience is what your looking for, please visit. If you're looking for a tasty meal, go somewhere else. 5 stars for history, 0 for food quality and flavor.
Returned to Pittsburgh, Ate at Primanti a 2nd time:\n\nI stand by my decision: Pass.
Had such high hopes for this place on our visit to Pittsburgh.  The presentation of the sandwiches were making my mouth water, there's a lot of good things going on in the ingredients...In theory, this should've resulted in a bold flavor taste explosion, but I found myself severely let down by all of the bland ingredients piled high in front of me.  The pastrami was terrible, the coleslaw weak, and the fries were bland, dry, and flavorless.  Still bummed, my guess is that this place I more of a tourist draw now than a legit sandwich shop.
I ordered a fave of diners, the Pittsburger. cheesesteak.  It's a burger with cheese coleslaw, French fries  all piled between 2 thick pieces of bread. Looked ok.  It, however, didn't work for me. \nThe coleslaw was great though!!\nIt's not much of a cheesesteak. It's a weird burger. That burger seemed like a fried frozen burger. Not much cheese either. \nMy crew had the kielbasa sandwich and the ham sandwich respectively. They looked great. \nI don't think fries on my sandwich works for me either. I can't hold it against them though. \nI chose poorly. I think they are probably good though. \nMy motto: eat food you recognize.
Alright so being from Texas I'm used to lots of seasoning, lots of flavor, and lots of heat if things are supposed to be spicy.  This sandwich shop lacks all of those things.  This was my first shot at local food (I think it's local, that's what I was told), and definitely nothing to write home about.  They did have some decent draft beer options but no one in my group of 10 said they would come back.  Try another \"local\" joint if you have an option.
Highly disappointing. While sandwich is unique it was totally over cooked and under seasoned. No flavor
So an honest review.  Bland.  Service good prices cheap but food very bland and pre made.  I ordered the new black bean burger sandwich.  Bread not toasted, burger tasted a lot like my morning star black bean burger that I get frozen.  Cole sale was a lot better with the hot sauce I smothered on it.  The best part was by far the fries which weren't all that great.  I am glad that those were home made.  I picked all the bread off ate mostly the fries and was not very impressed.  The beer makes everything tastes better so order at least two beers before eating.  I'm not a big foodie but I like my food taste better.  I still ate because I was hungry and it's not uneatable, just bland and kinda of boring.  It's still a must do in Pitts so go ahead and do it at least once, but skip the rest of your stay.
